Anything more to add?Australia seems 40% British, 40% American, and 10% Scandinavian to me. Obviously with regional and ethnic variations. But the political and cultural influence seems to have fallen along those lines.I'm not sure that's how it works, or if that matters if you're very poor.The sushi was up there with Sydney prices. There seems to be a big difference between rich and poor, or rich and average.Hmm. I agree with all of that. I'm an Australian, I'm not sure if you were referring to Australia. 

Having lived for small amounts of time in Germany I'm not sure which has a stronger safety net, or "social contract". There's much I admire about German politics, but I would lean towards the social safety net being higher in Australia. 

Germany still has private healthcare, and respect for privacy and to how one wants to do things is paramount. In Australia, perhaps engagement with strangers, and adapting to others is more important. 

Beyond that, Germany and Australia have a great many things in common. That's the essence of why Australians don't need guns. The police show up, and do the right thing. That's so naive. Just about everything works in this way, at least somewhere in the chain. Everything from the military to air traffic control, to the fact your couch won't release toxic fumes if burnt, and your electricity comes out at the right voltage. 

Folks who think they are outside of society are like a fish who sees a bubble and thinks they're outside the ocean. Most of those rankings are based on networking and collaborating on research, which favors universities in large population centers. 

I did a masters degree in a small/low ranked country and a large/highly ranked university - the quality of education was far greater in the first. You're correct in some fields. I know an Italian and American mathematician visiting at Melb Uni, the research there they consider the best. Thank godThe problem is they are real cute. I'd never shoot one. Oh no, my front garden!It's something I've gradually gotten used to over the past 20 years... Germans and Australians generally agree more than disagree! Rubbish. If you want an unregulated, capitalist society, go and live outside the capital city in Somalia, or somewhere between the various front lines in Syria/Iraq. Everywhere else is highly regulated.Haha, that flight is brutal. Enjoy doing it twice for nothing Troy.His freedom of choice was taken away from him :)Refinement of the ice idea for Mars structures... using dust or rocks or somesuch?Don't start this argument, it's like climate change, they'll never admit it's True.Cool in no social groupIt's about the same per capita rate as in the US. Just /r/killedbywildlife would be interestingno. city beaches are always pretty busy, and shark attacks very rare.that's when they eat fishDon't encourage themPrevalent animals?The death penalty is for developing world loser countriesThirding or fourthing inline images... even if they're hosted elsewhere.

No limits to offline use, too. They exist. Unlike other continents, where they just exist in picture books. I'll have to check it out! Thanks!!That's actually quite good!Def. Even Han and C3POWow. Not much love for Luke, Han and LeiaI've always wondered if Yoda thought, "Obi-wan is a useless ghost. The Empire have killed every Jedi but me. I'm in a swamp and pretty damn old. I may as well throw another Skywalker into the mix, even if he is hopeless. It can't get any worse." Leia would have been a fine Jedi. 

I'm sure they had some kind of Jedi meditation, and meditation calms all that impatient and angry stuff down - in a few weeks - even in *real* life. 94% in Australia and New Zealand... come on over! 

I think I can even see the trailer from here ;)If you meditate in real life, you can recognize that feeling if you go to "holy places", like temples in the Himalayas. It's like an echo of something you have uncovered within, but on a larger scale. 

So something like that - Luke noticing the strong Force feeling everywhere there, and recognizing those same feelings he's felt before deep in himself also.  That was a pre-poster poster, I believeJJ's married and Fisher is a wildcard he doesn't need right nowHaha. Gold  Is there an ELI5 version of this?From the little I know about zen monestaries, the monks don't go around "trying out" talking like the master to each other. It would quickly become showing off. They are instead very humble about their practice, mainly quiet, and - if talking -sticking to commonplace language and necessary things ("have you finished with that", "do you want me to clean the steps?", etc.)

"Talking zen" is reserved for formal sessions with the master, rare and very private. 

Here, we have people trying out "master talk" all the time, and it can't help but come off as wrong and ridiculous. 

It's like the difference between seeing a *real* Yoda (somehow), and someone dressed up with pointy ears at a Star Wars convention. One is a bit magic, the other is a bit childish and clearly make believe. Agreed. I'll never forget buying one of his books at random, taking it home, and - pow! Nothing quite like it in print. The world has a competition about who has the best results from their prison system and Norway wins every year. It's based on things like murder rate, how many people are in prison, and how likely people are to reoffend. The US is pretty much near last place. Donate the 2 to a Syrian refugee family with nothing, and ask him to make do with a 1. Wow. "Painting the baby room" (pink, yellow, blue) is almost a pre-baby ritual in the West. Well, what continent is New Zealand and Fiji in, if there's only 7?It was also the most successful tourism TV campaign in history. I forget the numbers but they absolutely skyrocketed. 

An analysis of why they worked was they didn't only focus on beautiful beaches, landmarks etc. Instead they instilled the subconscious idea that you were invited (and would be welcomed) by a real person. You almost *had* to go, and even though far away, it would be easy once you were there. It's actually a windAustralia's coastline is also about the same length as the Equator!Thanks for the racism. But there are plenty of other multicultural countries in the West. None have anything like the US's incarceration rate, and nearly all have less than a quarter, say, the murder rate. 

It has nothing to do with race. http://LMGTFY.comOh cool. I thought you were arguing for /r/zen style "wise sayings"That's what I'm talking about! Thanks so much for posting. Those windows really help :)A person in America's West will drive his wagons into a circle if attacked by a tribe of native Americans.Meat, generally. We eat something called a "cow". Cute!Canada's public swimming pools are apparently free entry, too. I'm interested in either. One day someone is going to invent a beautiful, open source design for poor people, and I'd love to see what that is!Thanks so much for this!That's a myth that was started after the Revolution by early politicians. The British sent convicts wherever they wanted, and there were locals petitioning the king not to all over the East coast. Pennsylvania is a famous example. I'm telling you it's absolutely incorrect. If it was correct, you'd see American level murder rates in other developed countries with the race you're trying to blame. "You've left your room in a terrible Islamic State"in part of Australia it's a holiday today - *the day before* a football game.

this is to let families relax and get ready for the big game.Most, if not all, of Australia's (now ex) mass murders are celebrities. I can recall many of their names and faces as easily as pop stars. 

Yet it has not caused any further mass shootings. The thing that worked was improved gun laws.Disney carpet cleaning and furniture removal
We don't. There hasn't been a single public mass shooting in the ~20 years since gun laws were tightened. 

This was a man shooting a *single* police officer. Mass shootings are generally 3 or more people killed. Well saidWe banned the type that can kill lots of people quickly. That may be why he was only able to kill one person. 

There hadn't been a single public mass shooting since the laws were changed ~20 years ago. It was a police officer, too. Just as tragic, but the laws do keep the public safe. "Latest at time of posting"Wrong sorry hun. No public mass shootings since we changed our laws. A policeman and the perpetrator. So rare it makes world news. A police employee - police have been told to take their guns everywhere, even if popping out for lunch. They knew something was up. Police were told to take their guns everywhere, even popping out to lunch. They knew something was up. 

Credit to everyone who still turned up to work knowing that. Always two there areIt can't be ninjas, they saw them coming inA civilian employee of the police department, apparently leaving the building. Sugar hips, that's not True at all. You're 22 times more likely to shoot yourself or a family member than an attacker. Guns make everyone less safe. 

Australia hasn't had a public mass shooting since we tightened our laws, and Swiss and Canadian laws are nothing like American laws. 

The killing of one police officer is #1 national news in Australia because it is massively more safe than the US.It's not yearly - America just had its 994th mass gun attack in the past 3 years alone. 


It's an over 400% higher homicide rate generally, too. I have to correct you there. 

America still has to add another 200 million guns and *then* you'll really see things turn around!"How was your day, dear?"

"Oh, not great. I said something stupid on the internet and they all laughed at me."

"Sorry to hear that darl. Maybe this internet thing just isn't for you."The number of blow jobs is also really highIt's a dog whistle comment. They shoot abortion doctors over there. It's a way of saying it's deserved, because it's "an eye for an eye".

Australia still has respect for common sense, and we don't need that type of lunacy over here. The person whose job it is to make sure only people of good character are given visas. Oh that's a really nuanced and intelligent response, thanks. 

One interesting thing Australia had (when it had many mass shootings) was copycat shootings that came from the UK and US media. So you're right, these things can really spread. Not reporting suicides is also a long standing practice to cut down on copycats. I'm not sure if they know if it's fame, or the incident per se getting on the news, though. In an effort to escape the effects of hangovers we've learnt to experience time backwards. Oh my god... new low /r/worldnewsFalse. They have started to find minute samples of pigments. Feathers on one were forms to be black and white (source: my 4 year old nephew's dinosaur book from the museum)Enlightenment is the removal of illusions, not adding new ones. It's good that you're exploring and assessing various options for your condition, though. There are various "rainbow body" practices, I guess the closest we'd have in the West is astral projection. A physical experience of bodies other than the purely physical. As others have said, it would be useful to find some sort of objective verification of what you are doing somehow. Know thyself. 

*

My religion is kindness. 

*

Help others, or at least do no harm. 

*

Be a lamp unto yourself. You sound like a nice person. And someone who is exploring things in a very sensible, trial and error way. The most important thing in any practice is that it works for you. 

Trying out Buddhist classes shouldn't be a big deal, and should be probably done in the same great spirit as the rest of your practices. 

You've said you feel a connection to Tara. Take a look at http://FPMT.org and http://Rigpa.org for a center near you. Both are trustworthy organizations, with beginner classes for Westerners, and no obligation of course. Try one of each and see which you like the feeling of. 

Best of luck. I read this. It seemed a very angry, passionate opinion piece, perhaps despairing at what America is doing to itself. I'm not sure how much time was spent before sending it to print. 

Australia has obviously got the gun laws balance somewhere near right. But I also think most Australians have much more respect for our American brothers and sisters than this article would suggest.As an Australian who also despairs at America's gun violence, I think this article leaves out the great respect Australians generally have for Americans. 

The tone of the article, and a few phrases, really doesn't capture the spirit of friendship - or the many things Australians learn from America (technology, green energy, culture, et cetera). Let's properly weigh fears of *possible* negative things happening, against the actual greatest humanitarian tragedy since the end of the Second World War, shall we?They're all moronic:

"It's the blacks' fault"

"It's the Mexicans' fault"

"It's too late now, we have too many guns already."

"Let me tell you about your country."

"We can't change the magic law in the magic book."

"Guns are the only thing that's stopping the nazis taking over."

etc etc etcThere's no evidence that not reporting the shooter's name stops future attacks. 

It's a theory (and a nice theory). But we don't have any data... say from other countries... where this has been shown to work. 

I support trying it, as it might help some. But I don't think people should get their hopes up that this is a solution. 994th mass gun attack in the US in the last 3 years

http://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2015/oct/01/obama-oregon-college-shooting-routineSure. It's just a fluke this happens 1,000 times* in the country with the weirdest relationship to guns in the world.

(*994 times in 3 years)Developed, Western countries of course. I don't doubt there are war zones where people are as committed to them.Beautiful, thank youThere you go. It's like talking to the 1950s. Exactly. Sounds like a revolver too - what's the legitimate civilian use for that... urban roo shooting?Gun violence is highest in states with higher amounts of guns. UnTrue. It was cultural in Australia too until we (happily) took away guns from anyone who didn't need them. Australia didn't *try*, we succeeded. Zero public mass shootings in ~20 years since the law changes. There will be celebrations in Australia on the anniversary of those laws. 

Britain is very safe too. I'd love a source for Rian doing the treatment for IX and Colin writing it. Both are rumors at best as far as I know. And if True it would be alarming - Colin has no half decent writing credits that I know of, and both of his films had average scripts. 

I would certainly hope they have excellent screenwriters doing IX. Kasdan's son (no decent writing credits) is writing the young Solo movie, with his dad's support. Kasdan chose it from all the options but got pulled into VII duties. 

No confirmation on who is writing IX yet. I hope it's not Colin. Try to be someone like Bryant, and get the guns Bryant had, today. There is a reason why we haven't had a public mass shooting since the laws. Looked at the rushes from a few weeks ago, and need to reshoot? It was unusually early in proceedings - might have looked a bit hacked together. There will probably be no more Sith, trade disputes, extended politics, thin weaponized robots, or anything else bad from the prequels, except in a "look how confident I am, I can put this actor in here" kind of way. A signature is a way of claiming who came up with an idea. A nice thing to do, but I'd be super pissed if I saw someone signing a copy of one of my works. With the Falcon's rear shields gone, Han flips his ship around into an "attack" position against the enormous Imperial craft. The disbelief amongst the officers at such a turn of events, and their struggling to change tactics. Then, the Falcon is suddenly off their radar, and the inevitable Vader recriminations follow ("apology accepted"). 

The next scene is that classic shot of the little limpet-like Falcon, hanging on the back of the massive destroyer. Leia's admiration kiss, and the nice little DIY/teamwork moment when Chewie releases the ship manually, to float off into space. 

All that, and that someone has already predicted this, of course...

I also like it when Leia turns an annoying C3PO off, and Han yells "THANK you". Han and Leia slowly becoming more similar to each other, which is nice to watch. I don't think they did, punishment was a local matter. History buffs might correct me. Other sources give the numbers as remarkably similar in each of the colonies - somewhere between 100k and 150k sent to both.

It was only the Revolutionary War that meant a change in destination.  It's a False analogy. Americans would cry blue murder if Swiss gun laws were introduced. Or even Canadian ones. National restrictions have a positive effect. The murder rate is still four times higher than most developed Western nations, though... long way to go. I read that as bath mold speakingYes, but there is no source. Saying "it was reported that" without indicating where does not fit Wikipedia's referencing guidelines, and should strictly speaking be removed. 

Unless you can work it out from the date and add the source to the claim?Oh of course, it would go up and down the chain for sure. It doesn't mean you can give it to anyone to do though. You still need some spark of talent, not just a committee. 

The Jurassic World script had plenty of people checking it, including Spielberg, and it was terrible. Ditto Terminator Genisys, the Avengers films, etc etc.  Old enough to be one of those people who handed in a rifle.Carbon is looking that way, tooTo respect your fellow artists, I'd encourage you not to sign it in the future. (It's not up to others to guess how artists feel about their work being used.)

The usual procedure is to write: 

"With apologies to Chris Wahl", or "with thanks to Chris Wahl", to acknowledge the original artist.Sigh. Hard to see reality through all that myth

http://paleofuture.gizmodo.com/britain-sent-thousands-of-its-convicts-to-america-not-1707458418Aw, Hark a Vagrant's alright, she doesn't update that often :)

Well done thoughIt was all across the British North American colonies, not just Georgia and Louisiana. Britain didn't care what local opposition there was (eg. the Pennsylvania example)

That source actually under represents the figures, Wikipedia says it is as high as 120,000 - close to that in Australia. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Penal_transportationI just check http://beatonna.tumblr.com/ once a day, and get slightly miffed if there isn't something new ;)Nope. None in public with over three killed (the usual definition for these things)&gt;  Jaffa and Silver

That's exactly the type of thing I'm worried about. "Jurassic World made a lot of money, so..."We are trying to compare like to like. The Australian laws were put in to stop the occurrences of mass shootings in a public place, which strike a particular type of terror into a nation (and beyond).

&gt; Cairns stabbings (2014)

Not a gun massacre

&gt; Hunter family killings (2014)

Not a public massacre

&gt; Quakers Hill Nursing home (2011)

Not a gun massacre

&gt; Hectorville Seige (2011)

Not a public massacre

&gt; Monash University shooting (2002)

Not a mass killing

If you want to add in US stabbings, domestic murders, and instances where only two people are killed you are looking at many thousand cases a year.Mass shooting: an act where a perpetrator kills three or more people (FBI definition)

Public shooting: an act where a killer goes to a public place (school, theatre, church, mall, workplace), often to kill at random.

The Australian gun laws were aimed at analysing the type of weapons used in the above situations in Australia's history, and removing their availability from the type of people who had perpetrated such events in Australia. 

They were *not* aimed at decreasing the general murder rate, arson rate, the overall number of guns, or anything else. They are aimed at stopping the above cases. How to reduce the above cases in America is also the direct question under discussion.It's a really bad idea to lose perspective because of isolated events in the media. Tens of thousands of refugees enter annually, and contribute positively in their new lives. He was born in IranOur laws are probably why he only killed one person, not 10. And the murder rate is almost one fifth.

Even with just one loss of life this will be massively investigated (a coronial inquest), and changes most likely made.&gt; The ABC understands Farhad's sister Shadi went missing on Thursday. Her family told police she had taken all her belongings. It is understood she flew out of Australia on a Singapore Airlines flight bound for Istanbul, and may be attempting to reach Iraq or Syria.

Shit. So she probably knew in advance. And this poor guy was killed

http://www.abc.net.au/news/2015-10-03/parramatta-shooting-victim-curtis-cheng-a-gentle-man/6825410Waiting for a NRA goon to argue your gun definitions in 10, 9, 8...Thanks for your level headed response! 

I'm interested if you can see if your world view is cultural (the result of being born in the US), rather than independently "correct"? 

Most countries don't have this same world view... nor the US's gun problems. 

I really wonder if it's possible for people to see that their world view might potentially lead to harmful results, if shared by enough people.Australian (ex) gun owner here. Our laws were never aimed at people like you and me. They were aimed at getting semi automatic handguns and assault rifles out of the hands of city kids. To stop them killing 10 people instead of one or two if they go nuts. 

It makes our use of them respected in a way, so that's why many gun owners in Australia are pro our gun laws.Working guns owned by farmers and sports people are protected in Australia (as they should be). 

That's very different from allowing an inner city kid with a concealable anger management issue from owning a semi automatic handgun.Australia has nearly *double* the immigration rate - and double the proportion of immigrants - than the US does (Australia 28%, USA 14%).

And **Malawi, Sierra Leone, Liberia and Senegal** have a fraction of the murder rate than the US.

You can stick your abhorrent race-based logic.We're talking public mass shootings here, which are absolutely a "white" phenomenon, and don't happen anywhere near as much in Europe.Anyone who doesn't need one for work (farmers, wild animal control, etc.), have a reasonable hunting rifle and licence, or is part of a certified sporting club.You should have decent healthcare. But in Australia we still had crazy guys shoot strangers. What stopped them killing multiple figures is cutting down on the types of guns out there.Nope. We have that just as much in our country. The difference is anyone wishing to copycat can't find a gun that will kill in the double figures.The NRA would also go postal at Canadian style gun laws in the US.Chris Rock is *always* rightJust copy the Australian laws and be done with it.

(Actually, the Australian laws are in constant revision, according to the latest events and research, but you know what I mean.)It was a *manual revolver*. I know I'd rather that coming down my street than a semiautomatic handgun, and pockets full of mags.Relevant Far Side

https://osiangrifford.files.wordpress.com/2014/01/laugh-at-me-will-gary-larson1.jpgRight. Australia has had two terrorist attacks in the past year or so:

\u2022 One terrorist had a shotgun - the suspect shot one person, and was killed himself.

\u2022 One terrorist (?) had a manual revolver - the suspect shot one person, and was killed himself.

That's actually what *successful* gun laws look like today. It could have been so much worse.Australia is one of the most racially tolerant nations on earth. (So is the US, for that matter.) 

http://www.news.com.au/travel/travel-updates/australia-among-the-most-racially-tolerant-countries-in-the-world-data-mapping-shows/story-e6frfq80-1226645175923I blame Mags. That guy is trouble.Australian people with mental health issues also get obsessed with mass killers they see on the news overseas. The difference is they can't do as much about it.Four or five times the murder rate than similar countries is horrific. 

That's tens of thousands of unnecessarily grieving family members and friends every year.There is over a billion people in China. And it's ridiculously much more safe there than in the US.True. And crazy people in America will kill people four times as often as in similar countries.Not True. It is very difficult for a terrorist, crazy person, etc. to get a semiautomatic gun in Australia. 

Two tried, in the past 12 months. Both could only get hold of guns that killed just one person - before being killed by police. Right on. Only you need international level border control between the two sides.

Or the anti gun crowd can move to Australia*.

*Yes there are guns there, but of much more limited types.Fellow Commonwealth person here - exactly. 

How people can fail to see that all different kinds of people will take advantage of weak gun laws is beyond me.Lol, you mentioned my two favorite crazy person fantasies: the invading Russians, and the armed superhero saves a cinema. Thanks for reminding me!If you have shot dozens of people in a public place you are BANNED FROM OWNING A GUN FOR LIFE!

They have tough laws over there.On average, any gun you buy is about 22 times more likely to be used to shoot a good guy than a bad one.Some half decent school unicorns could have impaled him too.If guns were limited to the minimum type suitable for hunting, sports shooting, and farming, it would probably reduce gun crime by about 75%.How does that go down (serious)Why not limit the number of guns you can own, and the type of guns you own, to the minimum that is required to successfully do the job you need it for?

Eg. if you need it for hunting, then a bolt action rifle is sufficient. If you need it for self defence, then a manual revolver is sufficient.

I highly doubt your average mental cases would be anywhere near as efficient at killing innocent people.

Red herring. We have good free healthcare in my country. People still *try* to shoot lots of people. They just don't *succeed* because they can't get those types of guns.Or grenadesIn Australia you are generally only allowed to get a type of gun that minimally does the job you need it for (hunting, sports shooting, farming).

So with the types of guns bat shit crazy Australians can get, they generally only kill 1 or 2 people maximum.It's changing. Even on Reddit people are getting more reasonable.No, we need to hear your depressing ass news over and over and over too...People produce much more books with computers.Swiss gun laws are completely different. I'd *love* to see the US institute the Swiss gun laws.Yet some people say the US should add *more* guns to solve the problem. I disagree. You have to turn around a boat going in the wrong direction *some time*.

If you haven't visited the UK much, I'd strongly suggest doing so, given your interest. I have been to both the US and the UK quite a bit. 

As the center of the largest empire the world has ever known, London is an amazingly diverse place. It has around 10 million people, from every culture on Earth. Completely integrated cultures, completely unintegrated cultures, rich and poor, and everything in between.

Yet it has one fifth the murders, and negligible mass shootings. The unavoidable fact is, limiting guns to those who need them, and to guns that have to be manually loaded, works.There was a study that found the most common mental health "issue" behind gun violence was simple, everyday anger management issues. The same type of thing that the classic road rage guy has, and probably a good proportion of any group of people has.

There are hundreds of thousands of Americans that could probably do such a horrible thing - at a school, job, or cinema - given the right set of circumstances. 

It's much more effective to limit the amount of bullets those people can fire at people, than to try to ban perhaps 10% of the population.I can really help you on the Australian example, because my family are Australian farmers, and we had long discussions when the guns were being handed in.

Yes, 80% were not handed in. But these were largely of certain types - such as the bolt action 22 that had been on a farm for generations. (Guns that are no use in perpetrating a massacre, and there's ample good use for, such as putting down injured stock, keeping down feral animals, etc.)

Those 20% included the following: handguns owned by city dwellers, who never went hunting in their life. Semi automatic weapons, and guns with magazines.

This small 20% made all the difference. There's even a law 

&gt; The Pareto principle (also known as the 80\u201320 rule, the law of the vital few, and the principle of factor sparsity) states that, for many events, roughly 80% of the effects come from 20% of the causes.

You only have to start at the most lethal end, and by doing that inconvenience the fewest, and have the greatest beneficial effect. It doesn't matter if you have a lot or a few to start with, the impact will be felt when you do.1. It was not "hard" to remove 650,000 guns from Australia. Confiscate is too strong a word. There was a change in the law, an amnesty, money was paid to gun owners, and they were generally handed back willingly (our family handed back a family heirloom).

2. I can't see why 20% of Australia's guns is of a magnitude more difficult than 20% of America's. Yes, the numbers are bigger, but so are the resources available to achieve it. This just really means McDonalds have carved a little bit of most stores off and called it a "McCafe".

In fact, large coffee shop brands have been an abject failure in Australia. Companies like Starbucks have failed, because of such a love for the many small, privately owned cafes that produce excellent coffee. 

Today's international artisanal coffee culture started from these places. Actually there's a study that said this is the most common contributing factor (besides guns, gender, etc).

Unfortunately it's so common it's practically unusable as a screening method.Think of someone who "intentionally, offensively" kicks a car during a road rage incident. 

Folks can snap under extreme conditions, and be pretty much normal for the rest of the time.Interestingly, more American civilians have died from guns just since 1968 than all the US soldiers in all the wars in America's history.

http://www.politifact.com/punditfact/statements/2015/aug/27/nicholas-kristof/more-americans-killed-guns-1968-all-wars-says-colu/Largest proportion of gun ownership.

Largest proportion of gun deaths.

Yes, only in America.They offered Lazenby a contract for seven Bond films I believe, but he didn't want to do another

&gt; Lazenby grew a beard and long hair. "Bond is a brute", he announced. "I've already put him behind me. I will never play him again. Peace \u2013 that's the message now."

So sixties!I'm quoting the differences, so please correct me if I'm wrong:

\u2022Swiss males are allowed to keep their firearms after the end of their military service at age 30. The fully automatic weapons must be converted to semi automatic before they can keep them as civilians.

\u2022Switzerland has universal gun registration on gun ownership.

\u2022Switzerland has universal background checks on all gun purchases.

\u2022Switzerland requires universal reporting of firearm transactions, whether commercial or private transfer of ownership.

\u2022Switzerland's carry laws are highly regulated and very restricted. Other than militia members transporting their firearms on their way to militia training, very few people are allowed to actually carry firearms. And they cannot be loaded.

\u2022Despite the militia requirement in Switzerland, the rate of gun ownership (by percentage) in the United States is much higher than in Switzerland.

\u2022Males between 20 and 30 years of age are required to own firearms in Switzerland because they are the nation's well regulated milita. Switzerland has no standing army. 

\u2022The vast majority of militia members are not even allowed to store ammo at home. And for the 2000 or so--that's right only 2000--militia members who do have ammo, it is sealed and inspected regularly.

\u2022Switzerland's gun violence rate is fourth highest in the world.

http://www.dailykos.com/story/2013/03/01/1190586/-Some-Truth-About-Switzerland-and-Guns/s or no /s?Have you seen Rian Johnson's films?(For Americans, this is like the Australian Superbowl... lots of eyeballs watching screens.)I like that edit the most. Something about the pacing.Someone in Australia filmed their TV (so bad quality version)

https://www.reddit.com/r/StarWarsLeaks/comments/3nbssk/tfa_tv_spot_just_aired_in_australia/

actually it seems the same as the Korean version

https://www.youtube.com/watch?t=30&amp;v=M-VTdsCKLggThis is rubbish. If the name *was* not renewed by Google, it would be picked up on backorder by any of hundreds of automated systems, long before it was available to be registered manually.

This is a glitch Falsely showing availability, and nothing more.

Get on board! Looper and Brick are amazing. Ah wow. I'd put Brick equal to Empire Strikes Back, and self funded and done with friends and family. Each to their own!Interesting. I like the Colin is busy point. Rian has never written with so done else, so I'm not sure about that last point. I love filmmaking docs, I will - thanks!I just mean a more normal relationship with guns will probably bring the murder rate down to the same level as similar countries to the US (Canada, UK, Australia, etc.), which is about 20% or 25%. 

Stopping murders must be up there as a top priority for all humans. It's Dzogchen practices designed to temporarily or permanently convert to a nonmaterial body made of light

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rainbow_bodySince when is Oregon, United States separate from the World, learning from other examples, and rational thought?The Second Amendment is a gun control amendment.

There is nothing *well regulated* militia about who owns guns. The founding fathers would be horrified their very clear words were used to continue these sorts of events happening.The US has a unique, emotional relationship to guns, and a murder rate 400% - 500% higher than the usual first world level. 

With a more logical, less emotional gun relationship, it makes sense that that would probably drop down to something like normal levels.

Also, the Second Amendment is a gun control amendment. It calls not just for a regulated militia but *well regulated* militia. There is nothing well regulated or militia-like about this guy who killed people in Oregon.I've never seen a Hudson, but forgot about Gloria Jeans.

Never support them btw... owned by Hillsong and the *worst* with their profits

https://thatsmyphilosophy.wordpress.com/2012/06/11/why-i-boycott-gloria-jeans-coffee-and-you-should-too/You're correct... mass murderers *have* used other methods before, but they are much less common.

The easier things are to do, the more they are done. Firing rounds at people is easy. Running 20 people over, or getting close and stabbing 20 people, is very difficult (physically and much less abstract).

It's a really good way to get the numbers way down - both in how often it happens, and how many people are usually killed.&gt; I actually think your point about other nations is very important because I think something unique is happening... I think the Internet is having a real impact and I think there will come a time in America where we collectively decide we don't want guns anymore.

I really like your level headed thinking. You remind me of my time spent in the States quite clearly, and it feels accurate.

What I noticed is that the US media is so big, that all I could see on the US news was a US perspective (with the isolated story about the Middle East etc).

The reverse of that is that we, too, get US news and perspectives much more than you would think. So weirdly, ten people being shot in Oregon affects us in Sydney almost as much as one or two being shot in Perth.

In fact, we had the "contagion" thing you have, where we had local copycats killing people in ways they saw on TV from America (this is pre our tighter gun laws). Same guns, same clothes, same messages, same targets, etc. Luckily all that was stopped (although you can see that happening with Islamic terrorism today).

Hopefully we will take the best things from all places, not the worst. It really is a fascinating time, where millions of people are talking to others around the world... not just on Reddit but places like Facebook and Twitter. I agree the world in 20 years time will be a very interesting place to be.Interesting, is this in 2014? I wonder if they still make political donations for anti-gay causes? (2011)

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gloria_Jean%27s_CoffeesFor sure. I found it really funny and pretty accomplished on a low budget.

We should at least see some great chase scenes in XIII!

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v_6s22L1GrQOh I think this is exactly such a case! 

My family work on the land, and have been "pro gun" for generations (it's a valuable tool when you have feral animals on your land). And I can tell you, a lot of pro gun, gun owners in Australia are right behind the Australian laws. Our laws were written and brought in by conservatives.

The thinking goes - what would you rather - responsible hunters and farmers (that only need a single shot to take down an animal) being the model of a gun owner? Or an urban kid - that can spray dozens of bullets in a few moments, and wouldn't know how to hunt animals if their life depended on it?

Australian gun owners often see our laws as valuing and protecting responsible gun ownership, and they connect guns to good outcomes. 

So, the definition of being "pro gun" might be one of the things that gets developed and discussed across countries.Thanks for that. I've read your text and will go back to it in detail.

Perhaps I'll put it this way. Even amateur, done-in-the-West meditators report objective out of body states. I find it inconceivable that Tibetan masters didn't know about these types of states, and use them. They seem very similar to Tibetan stories about monks leaving their physical bodies to travel for teachings by their teachers (who were otherwise inaccessible).

Either through Eastern or Western means, I think it's entirely possible to experience mind outside the body, which goes a great way to reducing a nihilist fear of extinction.Aw god, that photo is terrible. So young.He actually let a lot of ISIS guys out of prison when the moderates were close to taking control. He uses ISIS as a propaganda tool and supports them in some cases.&gt; Art's all about collaboration

I disagree, not always. But we'll see! 

Rian has talked about liking the *idea* of a co-writer, but just that it never works out that way. &gt; http://crimeresearch.org

That's the *worst* type of website: one purely designed for propaganda, and pretending to be neutral, objective, and research based to do it.

It's made by a Fox news columnist, who has written books titled "More Guns, Less Crime", and (ironically) "The Bias Against Guns". Such dishonesty reduces the reliability of the internet as a whole.

The US has had **994** mass gun attacks in three years. 

The US has four times as many people as Germany (the biggest European country). Germany would have to have had around 250 mass gun attacks in three years to be comparable. In fact, they are very rare. I cannot find a single example online from that period (there may have been a couple I'm not aware of). 

In fact, one has to go back five or six years to find one of comparable scale to those that regularly occur in the US. In other countries it's 10 or 20 years between large events. This is broadly True of Canada, the UK, Australia, and just about every other Western country.There's too many to list... it's everything from helping ISIS to aiming at moderates. This is one example

http://www.theguardian.com/world/2015/jun/02/syria-isis-advance-on-aleppo-aided-by-assad-regime-air-strikes-us-says

This gives broader context

http://www.aljazeera.com/indepth/opinion/2014/03/al-assad-fatal-strategic-mistak-201432910353132476.htmlThat's absurd... the data says there has only been 487 American fatalities in mass shootings in *14 years*.

There has been much more than that just since Sandy Hook, less than three years ago!

http://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2015/oct/01/obama-oregon-college-shooting-routineYour comment history is showing, bud.Not at all, thank you too. 

(I know what you're referring to - I was just looking at mass *fatalities* events - 142 since Sandy Hook - and multiplying that by four (the minimum killed to qualify) - to get 568 killed. It's no doubt higher.)

We all get smarter when we debate things with an open mind :)Australia takes almost double the refugees than the US does, per capita. 

14,000 to Australia versus 70,000 to the US - with Australia increasing that by 12,000 and the US 30,000 (the US is 13 times bigger than Australia).I don't know if you're being sarcastic, but they are. This was one police killed, not 10. There hasn't been a public mass shooting since the laws were introduced ~20 years ago.Not True. The US is only 3 times bigger than Germany, that has very little gun violence in comparison.The Australian gun laws were ONLY designed to stop public mass shootings, as other things weren't really a significant problem.

In the ~20 years since, there have been ZERO public mass shootings.We only banned the type of guns that had been used to kill 4 or more people in public at once. 

This approach has had a 100% success rate over 20 years.The Australian laws weren't aimed at homicides or violent crime, as they were low anyway. They were aimed at ending public mass shootings (100% success rate over 20 years)This will be massively investigated and changes made. 

Only one person died though, not 5 or 10, so it's still a successful system.Yes it is, actually. Around 30% of Australians are immigrants, and Australia has a very low murder rate, with nearly all of its cities scoring in the top 20 most liveable cities on the planet.&gt; Whose citizens have a hard time defending themselves against someone with a knife, club, or group of friends

Strange, as the murder rate is 20% the US murder rate

&gt; red states. More guns, less murder

Debunked. More guns = more gun deaths. The US as a whole should be enough to show you this.

http://qz.com/437015/mapped-the-us-states-with-the-most-gun-owners-and-most-gun-deaths/Please, *try your best* to stop everyone with a "mental illness" getting access to a gun.

Only agree that if this fails, you will stop everyone having unnecessary, semi automatic weapons.You can do both.It can be both. Inequality + guns = gun murders.Millions of Africans in Sierra Leone, Malawi, Senegal and Liberia, and they have a much smaller murder rate than the USA.

Millions of Hispanics in Spain, and they have a much smaller murder rate than the USA.Cool. I stand corrected. Have a good day.&gt; Italy (0.6), Ireland (0.6) and Greece were under-represented

Lol. You do realize that Italians, Irish, and the Greeks were all famously once the most vilified immigrant groups in Australia - with all the same arguments for inherent criminality aimed at them - in some cases just a generation ago?
That's a good point. 

Why do it then? Why not spend your time on Reddit supporting the actions of a democratic country... like Germany, Italy...or even Slovenia?Australia has about double the ratio of immigrants to locally born citizens than the US does: 14% to 28%.

It's also ~5 times safer than the US.Australia's laws were just aimed at stopping *public mass shootings* (4 or more killed - FBI definition).

This aim has been 100% successful now, for 20 straight years in a row.Interesting. Do you come from a Russian-speaking background, out of interest?Australia - low murder rate

Germany (3x bigger) - low murder rate

America (3x bigger again) - high murder rate

China (3x bigger again) - low murder rate

There is no evidence that population size is the cause of US gun violence.Interesting. I'd read there was some race-based connection there, but it's hard to understand as an outsider. 

I can't think of an equivalent anywhere else, that has a different language but some sort of deep alliance. Is it perhaps like the connections in the Nordic countries? Or North Korea and China? I know France has some Russian historical connections other Western European countries don't share, also.

Interested in your perspective.There will be a pretty thorough judicial inquiry into that, I'm sure.&gt; Australia has less than 10% of the U.S. population, that alone presents two extraordinarily different societies... I don't think those touting... Australian gun policy... understand just how fundamentally different the two countries are, even just in terms of population.

Population size is the only reasoning you've mentioned for the US's gun violence. You might have some other reasons privately, but unless you type them out, we can't read them.Russia has pretty low debt levels. A different type of debt, but it could be worse.The Australian gun laws were designed to stop random public mass killings. The Hectorville murders involved:

(a) a rural guy with a shotgun (shotguns are legal)

(b) the shooting of neighbours he knew well (over a dispute about a dog)

(c) less victims than qualifies for the FBI's definition of a mass shooting (not enough victims)

(d) not in a public place

Care to revise?I'm interested in what his cousin will do, that he's also always worked with. Obviously not the soundtrack (JW), but some mentoring role? Sound effects? Special effects?

I'm interested in the "first new Star Wars for a while" with JJ, but doubly interested in XIII - it'll be really deep and unique.It's also clear that "militia" had some kind of social, military and/or civic element... it wasn't some kid alone in a bedroom, a baby boomer scared of his shadow, or a guy on a street corner selling drugs.That's like someone in the 1940s saying "I don't care if they have penicillin in the UK. We're talking about what to do about pneumonia in America."Paranoid people get fixated on an old law, and lose the ability to adjust it to maintain public safety. 10 people get killed in one of the daily mass shootings that occur. People in other countries point out the insanity of the situation, suggesting common sense solutions, which are quickly dismissed.

Close?Alright. Russia versus America just seems like a little bit of a dick measuring contest... with 194 other countries to criticise/ compare/ learn from/ discuss.

I'd personally be more interested in a Slovenian perspective on international affairs.I look after hosting and domain names... a pity you don't have an "annual" option (no one wants to get a $0.83 bill every month for a domain name!)&gt; There are also other mass shootings on the wiki page, include a university shooting in 2002. And that is really not a complete list.

Total death toll of that event, 2 people - *half* the minimum number necessary to be called a mass killing (4+) - and that was 13 years ago!

Even that was too much for Australians, and it resulted in a further tightening of gun laws. 

It *is* a complete list of Australian mass gun killings, and there have been **zero** after the Australian gun laws.

It's very obvious you're trying to inflate a Wikipedia page to fit your belief, not adjust your belief when presented with new facts.
Interesting, I've heard Slovenia is very beautiful. And it escaped the conflicts of the 1990s well. I've met nice Slovenians, and would love to visit.

Maybe a US/ China debate would be also interesting. China's economy is about 5 times Russia's, and about to be the world's second superpower. Interesting times there also!Ooh, mysterious other special country differences. So special that we can't even mention them out loud. If you're not a pro gun nut, you'll do until the pro gun nut gets here. Same reality distortion field every time. Pink Floyd?October 31 is my personal get out of Berlin deadline, it gets pretty cold in November!Interesting! What is it that tires you about SE Asia? And how many months there did you last before you felt you needed something else?

Something many of us think about, I would guess.I would probably change it every year! I visit Australia a lot. But it is handy to keep in mind for booking advance tickets, etc. 

I know the weather is good, and I will have a good time, if I'm at any of those "points"Lovely. Skiing in Japan still seems like the ultimate extravagance, even though I know it makes sense financially over some other options :)Lovely. What cities or town do you stay in in Japan? I've always wanted to add that in, but so much more expensive than SE Asia.Beautiful artwork. Who did it?Death penalty? No&gt; Australia should be concerned with its own shootings.

Australia is terribly concerned about that, as we speak (it's one of the biggest news stories of the year, and a massive investigation/ re-evaluation). 

And yet just *one* person was shot. That happens 9,000 times every year in the US.Haha, I understand. Fortunately there's a place somewhere for everybody!Thanks! Great workMind blown a little bitI hear you. But are you worried about losing your access to medicare? 

I've heard some horror stories about people staying away too long, and then being on their own when something bad happens?Funny. I'm currently building a little cabin in the countryside in Australia. 

I quite like Australia, as long as I have an onward ticket, and it's free (no accommodation bills) once I'm there.

If you haven't been to Romania, check it out. It's the closest I've come, I think!Fortunately it's family land. The only way it works, these days!

There is still $8,000 land in Tasmania, though.I'd really look into it. It may be a 1, 3 year wait living in Australia before you're eligible for Medicare at least. I don't know about the private healthcare rules if you haven't been living here. 

I know a woman who married a French guy, stayed out of Australia for a few years, and then was horrified she wasn't allowed to visit her (lifetime) family doctor when she came back.

&gt; paying $xx,xxx per year in income tax

With all your work travel expenses surely you're down to paying very little tax? (A different thread issue maybe.)Oh myIf you're a member of a militiaGee, I want to make baby formula out of industrial waste, but all of these *darn laws* are getting in the way of my free tradeMaybe they want big government gun stores?Lol. According to that logic there is no freedom and liberty outside the USA.Seeing the average gun is 22 times more likely to kill a "good guy" than a "bad guy", there's no need for private guns *anywhere*. Outside of hunting, farms, or sports clubs.

*Source in comment below&gt; And that context is that the US was never meant to having a standing army, as the founders were intensely mistrustful of standing armies after having been occupied by one.
&gt; The US was meant to have a citizen militia.
&gt; The second amendment is directly related to this, which is why they state "a well-regulated militia" in the opening half of the amendment. It's there first because it's very important for the context of the entire thing.

From aboveApologies, I had both my glass eyes in todayWhat militia are you part of, under which your gun ownership is protected by in the Constitution?I don't care how "well run", "well regulated", or how good the finger food is. What militia are you part of? How often do you meet?No, I'm saying I'm happy for you or the Supreme Court to define "militia" however you or they want. Except "old guys sitting at home", "young guys selling drugs on a street corner", or "angry college kid whose only friends are on 4chan""A gun in the home is 22 times more likely to be used to kill or injure in a domestic homicide, suicide, or unintentional shooting than to be used in self-defense"

Source: Kellermann, Arthur L.MD, MPH, et al. \u201cInjuries and Deaths Due to Firearms in the Home", Journal of Trauma, Injury, Infection, and Critical Care 45 (1998): 263-67So women, and men over 45, aren't constitutionally protected to own a gun.Serious question: 

Wouldn't it be an agreeable compromise that gun ownership be tied to active militia membership (and regular attendance), in a program overseen by patriotic and current armed servicemen, used to dealing with new recruits? 

This way gun safety, individual weapon ownership, national defence, and mental appropriateness for the role can be properly assessed? 

I can't see the average gangbanger, angry 4chan-er kid, or angry jihadist staying the course. I also have a hard time seeing how the Founding Fathers would be against such a system.Ok, well then shouldn't they... like meet and train and stuff?A matter of degree, not fundamental differenceMy family are gun owners in Australia. We like that there's not low-lifes running around killing people by the busload. 

It also means we're not tarred with the same brush as folks that couldn't hit a target in a feral animal in a month of Sundays.Ditto, it's interesting that (with a different Supreme Court decision), that legal protection perhaps runs out when you're 45I've read *Catch-22* and skimmed through *Something Happened*... the insanity of war, do you mean?You're aware that idiots, with little concept of real odds, buy powerball tickets though right?The two things I mentioned are really good things we didn't have before: 

\u2022 proper respect for our responsible attitudes and civic mindfulness, and 

\u2022 safety for our kids from low-lifes in the city

A good trade for meeting up with some folk I'd like to meet up with every few months, anyway.I think having to turn up and learn about civic duty and responsibility each second month would help the violence part though.Respect for being a civic-minded gun owner, and safety for our kids at school, are two good things for gun owners to gain, though.That's crazy, to say the Second Amendment explicitly protects the right not to use a trigger lock.Cool. Just make it compulsory for gun ownership, then. Problems solved.\u2022 Idiots buy lottery tickets, as there's a 99,999,900% chance you're throwing a few dollars away, than going to win a million dollars.

\u2022 Idiots buy guns, as there's a 2,200% chance you're more likely to see someone you love die, than an intruder.

I think the first group is smarter, as the stakes are lower.Lol, really?BaliThat clip is so funny (watch to the end if you haven't)Explanatory comedy clip:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8TSRVgI15OQBecause that means Switzerland is a Third World CountryIssac Newton's dog was called Diamond. Einstein's was called Newton.ErrFive words, succinctCunt, but otherwise correct.Same with the US*Bipartisan, and broadly popular, gun buy back, you mean.A bit obvious he was a foreign cuntPer capita shows the same thingAllowing a revolver through customs was certainly a fuckupLol. Just about every city is in the world's most liveable, and it has double the immigration rate than the US.Still 500% higher than most developed nationsI'm not sure how to make it clearer.

(1) They didn't have the two things.

(2) The change happens.

(3) They get the two things.Haha. UsernameThat's ignoring all the negatives, though.That's an average figure though, and well meaning, kind, and valued by their family "idiots" will always exist.I imagine any decent sergeant would kick the average school shooting up psycho out of his militia quick smart, and with that the ability to legally buy guns and ammo.

Actually, this one was a boot camp dropout: http://abcnews.go.com/US/wireStory/terrible-day-killed-gunman-oregon-town-34193930No biting necessary! It's a good and interesting discussion

&gt; Clearly we stop selling guns. Okay, got it. 

Not at all. There's something called The Pareto principle (also known as the 80\u201320 rule) that states that roughly 80% of the effects often come from 20% of the causes.

This means leaving 80% of the guns in place and/or gun owners unaffected may reduce gun crime to around 20%. Stronger mental illness checks would be one start. A simple statistical analysis of the guns used in crime/massacres may show you the most efficient types of guns to remove. Manually loaded guns, such as are regularly used in hunting or farming, would likely be in that 80% that stay.

&gt; What about the MILLIONS of guns already in the world?

As above, only a small percentage need to be removed to have an effect.

In Australia, these types were removed with a combination of a gun buyback scheme, increased penalties for crimes committed with a gun, and regular amnesties.

&gt; Clearly the criminals will listen and take note of this new law making it illegal to not only use the gun, but also to have it.

Guns and ammunition are much easier to block at national borders than other contraband, such as drugs. They cannot be broken down into small parts, are more easily picked up by metal detectors and x-rays, and remain a liability once bought. They can be made greatly more expensive and risky for the average criminal to access.

&gt; Seriously, how is more gun control (whatever that means to you) supposed to do ANYTHING about stopping this problem? I get it, other countries have strict gun rules, and don't have this problem. Well, we can't jump in a time machine, so what are the steps we should take?

Hopefully the above ameliorates some of the concern about the need for a time machine, at least.
Per capita. Corrected for population size.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_intentional_homicide_rateAh me too, our family works on the land. 

I thought handguns were banned, unless they were within a recognised sporting class.It's generally considered the best measurement we have. 

Homicides from all causes is useful, as many argue gun bans just lead to the same number of knife, strangulation etc. murders.  That sucks. Anyway, I hope they can cut back on that happening.Er, most of the murders are committed with guns banned in Australia?That's not how the law works though. It tweaks rules and regulations all the time, to get the best possible outcome.*Clicks fingers* damn, I thought I'd invented somethingHi Daniel,
Can I ask how you could go about offering a work visa, since they are notoriously difficult to get in the UK? (Candidates have to be able to do something no one in the EU could do.)

Asking because I really hope this works out, and I'd like to do something similar for a good organization in the UK, too! :)That's what I thought... but I can't think of how.

Eg. there's no way she's getting offered US$231,362 to moderate an online forum.Right, I saw that too. 

It was hard to post multiple links... there were others where they were saying they were trying to employ her, and have her live there (jokes about the office conditions, etc.).

Still a mystery then.ok, you've talked me into it.

what's your favorite resort, mountain or town to stay in?I'm not sure if you missed the point where I said that our family were Australian gun owners, and (like all our peers) agreed we were getting a good deal.

We were on the "you" side.20% of all guns (mainly semi and auto) were handed in, so I'm not sure where your compliance rate figure comes from?

The positive takeaway is you don't need to remove 100% of guns to get a good result - just the ones misused the most.Aw, thanks so much. I think you maybe just started me on an up ramp to a Japanese ski obsession!Oh man, I'd love to be a slowmad, as it takes me some time to get settled to be productive. 

How do you solve the visa issue?&gt; https://www.flickr.com/photos/sobri/sets/72157643811181554

Haha, I was sold already.

Beautiful photography.You're a star, I've never heard of such an option.

Is this something that's just possible in SE Asia, or is there a European version (eg. in East Europe)?

You could have quite a popular blog on this topic!I thank you now, but will probably more in a year or so!Is this comedy or sincere? It's hard to tellI find it sad, it makes viewers think "I can't go anywhere else, as I won't have any freedom."Thanks for posting this! 

I think I saw some other ES songwriting tips here

http://rocksongwriting.com/elliot-smith-songwriting-technique/It's random funny quotes bot spam, I think... 

Only not that funny if it's automatic. A bit like canned laughter.Classic feedback loopNot sure if satire or notThere's an epidemic of shooting unarmed civilians there at the moment, so perhaps. It'd be funnier if it was done by hand, thoughlol, word salad. My head hurts. Why does a bot link to other threads within the same subreddit?it is a deep bond between our peoplesFound the person without a passportI would love to see a show where they fly Fox people over to Australia, reality TV style.

"What... it's basically the same. What gives?"The evidence is the opposite, of course

http://www.slate.com/blogs/the_slatest/2015/10/02/gun_control_by_state_tougher_laws_mean_fewer_deaths.htmlThere's a bot posting random quotes to every post in this thread, it seems? It's hard to tell if it's meant to be humorous or it's some real life weirdos doing it. ah cool. i couldn't see any reference to archiving, so assumed it was spam. thanks!With respect, I don't think people will be telling their kids in 40 years "let me tell you about when I went to see Planet of the Apes (the remake, not the sixties version) in the cinema", like they do about the original three Star Wars.

"Solid but forgettable" is more of a danger than even an occasional brave miss, in my opinion. It would be the Spider Man III fate for Star Wars.thanks, got it now! I clicked on the "info" link and it was like trying to read sense out of the Matrix.The idea of Alex Jones being a refugee for no good reason is strangely soothingThe idea of someone so vocally pro and anti democracy at the same time is hard to hold in your headThe dinosaurs would have survived if they weren't hamstrung by big governmentPolice are more like a garnish"Hey guys, I just looked up democracy in the dictionary. You'll never guess what it says!"No, it's an important mission. Someone has to defend democracy from democracy. Thanks Adolf, your views have been noted in the minutes.Ah, this is the type of thing I thought might be out there, but hadn't heard of. 

Does this happen at all often?Lol. All he wants to do is pull down traffic lights with his truck, and all you democritards have to go and jump all over his liberty. Um, yeah. About the same size as my country. (Meta) My god, what a therapeutic subreddit. I feel like I've been pulling my hair out to variations on all of these, in my own, for years. If you rearrange the letters of "Stalin" and "Hitler" you get "Swimming Pool Freedom Party". Whoops!Bipartisan. The guy who brought it in was our most conservative leader for decades. Not sure if making a point or a legitimate question. But just in case, it had nothing to do with the constitution, besides basic things like who makes certain laws, and if people get compensated if government makes things illegal (yes, and fairly).That sounded a rhetorical question so I'll just let you be. Yeah nah. See how we go. What ya reckon.Poorly. But excellent at catching shrimp. These bots are getting realisticLol "let's throw more petrol on the fire, it'll start to get cooler sooner or later!".

To understand how to get out of this mess, requires undoing some catastrophic thinking. 

All Australia did was withdrawal the fastest killing 20% of guns, to stop all public mass gun killings. There was no "take every gun", nor of course would there be in America. 

Chipping away at just the types of guns that kids kill 20 other kids with isn't an insurmountable job, isn't burning the constitution, and isn't an overly large civic burden. Dude, take your pick. You can either live under what the people want, or under what the inevitable dictator wants. There ain't no magic hidden third school lunch option.You've *nearly* hit the pi\u00f1ata, but not quite. A simplification, but the Australian ban was largely on semi and fully automatic guns, of whatever type. 

These were the type of guns that meant an amateur could kill in the double figures, without someone jumping on them as they reloaded.  

Fortunately, 80% of Australian guns weren't of this type, and so farmers, proper hunters etc weren't affected. 

The great thing about it is, we've had plenty of attempts at public gun massacres, but these laws have made them all unsuccessful. Tell me your magic third option then. Ugh, and you think without democratic checks and balances this is going to maintain itself?

What you're describing - in reality - is either an extreme plutocracy, or a warlord like situation like pre-democratic Afghanistan.*Especially* handguns, unless you need them for sport. 

The central point is that self defense is not a valid reason to own a gun, because 

(a) the average mugger or home invader doesn't have them any more and you *honestly* don't need them, and 

(b) the police respond professionally and really look after citizens. /r/shitnazissay

Funny America has a higher murder rate than Malawi, Sierra Leone, Liberia and Senegal. It's hard to tell satire from crazy opinion these days, but you might be right. I disagree. Swing for the fences: Fury Road was great because of some really brave choices, like a movie from one chase scene, and the hero Mad Max choosing to support a stronger female character. 

The choices will be different, but I'd rather a mix of amazing and failed experiments, than marvel-like competent but forgettable. Oh that's an unfortunate rule :(

I would have thought the upvote and downvote system would make sure of qualityIt's such a stupid quote - that's exactly how a plutocracy works. 

A democracy is hundreds of thousands of constantly updating legal checks and balances, in service of the highest formal authority, the Constitution (an idealistic document).

Better is Winston Churchill's (often attributed) quote, "democracy is the worst form of government except all the others that have been tried."&gt; He has been summarising his results in a series of blog posts on his wife Jo Nova\u2019s blog for climate sceptics.

Nothing to see here. News.com.au is the Fox News of Australia (both owned by Murdoch), and there's a climate change denial article or opinion piece most weeks.He's some idiot whose wife has a climate change skepticism blog. This is the Australian equivalent of Fox News, it's rubbish.I'd love to see them drink a litre of that water for us, live on TV.UNODC approved figures, which give both higher and lower rates than America, across different African states.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_intentional_homicide_rateLooks great! I like to hang around in each area a little longer, but some nice choices.

What's your cheap short term accommodation options, in Canada/US?That comes from being born in a context with a high murder rate. Your views would no doubt be different if you spent some time living in a country with a low one.Lol. Humans have tried that low governance liberty thing... it ends up slavery 100% of the time.Give me one past example of "Liberty" without democracy, in the history of mankind - any era since the invention of nation states. No, you're arguing that it's possible to have a nation-wide system that doesn't involve democracy, and that isn't monarchy or tyranny. 

I'm arguing that such a system has ever existed in modern history, and your idea only exists in the realm of science fiction. 

If you can give me a concrete example from real world history - not just a daydream built from a day in the USA when you didn't see a postman or police officer - I'd happily admit I was wrong.It helps if you look in the messy margins, IMHO, not the safer center. Spielberg and Lucas were once new blood outsiders. Peep Show is greatAfter you, MelHaha. Have fun with that, uh, friend!There's also that whole "you're in slavery and no longer have any control over your life" thing. It's ahistorical, the complete denial or ignorance of history. Wow for the first, and wow for the traditional Chinese medicine connection. If you look away from the screen, Mario will be at all places at the same timeThat photo is dopeIsn't this approach leapfrogged by the Australian quantum computing discovery?That voting thing seems about as accurate as a BBC documentary on volcanosThat's pretty coolActually, farm suicides went down something like 64% in Australia, and that was after we just reduced 20% of our guns. 

An imagined "quick" and "painless" method certainly increases the incidence.Just because rubbish is said a lot of times, it doesn't make it True. 

Australia's gun laws completely met their objective, of stopping public mass shootings.Where are you from? 

Because it would be embarrassing if you were an American trying to give Australia advice about potential gun massacres. Half way between burning the gays or not is maybe sending them on a Miami holiday for a week. Nope nope nopeSo are all nouns. And verbs. And adjectives. Or worse, yoga and meditation spaces that young people actually become really keen on and get benefit out of. Honest Australian perspective, American wildlife is totally frightening - no contest. Ethical if you're a tinpot dictatorship or poor-ass developing countryYou should go to Saudi Arabia. You and the religious police would probably agree on a lot of things. Americans, Nazis, and Muslim terrorists seem to be the main onesStill a barbarian attitude that long ago died out in the Western world. Hey, that actually makes a lot of sense.I liked that lotus thing. Elegant and someone at the story group has been doing some serious decent research, not just hacking space sounding things together. Grinds my gears grinds my gears*Rearrange*

*Put through cryptogram*

FONZY*Blip bloop! Put it in your calendar lazy bastard*

I am a bot | ContactYou're right, but medicine is always evolving. Eg. It's only recently acupuncture was able to legitimately drop the "eastern" from eastern medicine after some studies. Beautiful. 

For bonus points, "I've never had a passport. But..."You guys have Lego too?I read an American say something like that today, and was going to post it here. It's funny because most if the world (outside war zones) doesn't think about guns that much. Not sure if you're joking, but the Australian outback is unusually quiet, full mainly with sleepy and cuddly marsupials and birds. More people die of snake and spider bites in the US. 

Maybe you know this though, hard to tell jokes on the internet. 

Amazing. Unless you go 2,000 kms north, there's nothing that would eat you in the Australian bush. I can't imagine what that's like trying to sleep!I originally wrote that, but couldn't bring myself to press submitOk, just realized I'm talking to a high Dennis Hopper. See youI've heard that one actually. They never let you also take the urban areas out of the European states though. It's actually higher than a few African countries (Senegal, Malawi, Liberia, Sierra Leone), which really makes their racist heads spin for a second. We don't play table tennis in the USA. But if we did we'd be the best. The boring truth is animals are rare everywhere. Except maybe pigeons and kangaroos in the cities. I'd love to see some of those things. I bet if I tried they'd all have "just been here last week."

Where were you in Australia? I'm interested in what you ran into all the time.YouTube/Reddit Australia is about as accurate as The Avengers movies USA.  Oh man. I gotta see! Those battles must be distracting when you're trying to work :PI hear a year is 10 months. We can't possibly fit all the things that happen in a big country in 10 months. "I give full credit to Europe for birthing the greatest nation in the history of the world. Every mother wants their child to succeed, and indeed Europe's child has exceeded all expectations."Sorry, I'm on Alien Blue and they don't keep to Eastern Standard Time in whatever non American country I'm in. 

I'll change it over whatever time they have morning here. Dennis Hopper or Scooby Doo villain - it's hard to tell which. The tree of Liberty needs to be regularly washed in the blood of a New World Order.All data *wants* to be US data. But we have enough freeloaders in this country. Some countries in Africa have a lower murder rate than America (Senegal, Malawi, Sierra Leone, even Liberia)Military intervention is also a loose-loose situation. The US has a higher murder rate than African countries like Liberia, Malawi, Senegal and Sierra Leone. 

Do you think they have better access to mental health treatment over there?Freedom from logic is True freedomHow much do you know about how hard it is to start businesses in other countries? Eg. Singapore, for instance?Outside perspective?It's not on his laptop screen versionNopeThat's not what that photo is aboutNot True. And funny I chose that as an example of people not being able to recognize contexts change. There's a link with context there, or you could just go to the source!Of course a draft (or two) is finished. This was posted as a joke as to who has the best Star Wars memorabilia. It has nothing to do with the shooting order in Ireland (which is all about permissions, weather and logistics). That's a silly argument about Japan. Illegality makes a huge difference - guns are a negligible problem there. The murder rate is not double or triple but 16 times higher in the US than Japan. 

Even Liberia, Sierra Leone, Senegal and Malawi have lower murder rates than the USA. Expat Americans told me somewhere in Asia was the fastest place to open a business. I can't remember if it was in Hong Kong or Singapore (or both). 

The US is actually pretty un free in this regard, they're the strictest about what it can be called, if you can use your business name for different products, and even the colors and fonts you can use in your logo. This is possibly the dumbest conversation I've had on the internet. 

This image has nothing to do with when the script was finished. This image has nothing to do with where Ireland is in the script. What you're talking about is irrelevant. I second this!Welcome! As others have said, you don't need to "convert", it's the closest to "psychology" that could have existed 2,500 years ago. Just take what you find to be True or useful from the experience of others. Debate and a lack of untested dogma are important qualities in Buddhism. 

To get your head around all the different types of meditation, a great place to start is http://MeditationInstructions.com.  And many people have found "Mindfulness in plain English" is a great first book.You are doing as much when you buy pasta or a bottle of wine - as thousands of insects die for you to have these. Who is to say which is worse?

IMHO the best thing is not to waste food, have a good motivation when shopping, and make the greatest effort towards enlightenment while you can. As one of the Buddhas said, worry more about the big lump of wood in your own eye, than the small piece of wood in someone else's. Exactly. She is right it's a sign to her, as all meaning is relative and subjective. Rainbows are definitely pro gay marriage alsoI can see a future where someone from snickers and mars are paid to come and post comments like that! Now I really want either. I agree, except for the second step. Marbled beef?Ok, try setting up a shop called apple that sells computers. I'd go further. If someone posts something harsh, be thankful. They are being your best teacher for today. It will also make the biggest difference in transforming your mind. Apparently Americans have less access to their representatives (especially Congress) than a lot of other countries, partly just due to size. It's not as easy to book an appointment to push their views. 

Protesting like this might be a reaction to that somehow.From that thread: "Guns feed families"Per capita dude"(continued) They all own multiple weapons, and it is just natural to us. No one thinks it is strange. Actually, if an American asked another American how many weapons they owned and the person responded, "I only have two", the other American would think they were weird. 

There are a few weirdos though, that think no one should own any weapons.""Gangbangers" is one I hear a lot.There we go. I thought it wouldn't be too long before Conservatives admit that the Second Amendment can be worked around, and removing guns has a positive effect."In a self defense situation, there's a very, very real chance"

Either (a) there is no real chance of needing a gun in a self defense situation, OR (b) you're living in a shitty place and should get out. 

In most places in the world people have no need to ever think about guns, knives, or any other weapons.Er, Australia ("too small to compare us with", if the discussion is gun violence) announced it's accepting an extra 12,000 Syrian refugees at the same time.

America is supposed to be HUGE

&gt;USA is huge. We have a huge population. America is as large as the entirety of Europe. Living in USA and walking around USA, I feel very safe. Come on, people. Really, it's very safe. USA has 50 States. Europe has 50 countries. They are about equal. USA should not be compared to other countries. USA is more like a comparison to the whole of Europe! Our States are about the same size as European Countries. Our one country is equal to at least a "Europe" size continent. Seriously. USA is huge. We are HUGE.Any other developed Western country, and most of Asia. Even some places in Africa are a lot safer.If you seriously think your life is at risk going about your normal business, then of course you should leave that area, at least. I've lived in Germany, the UK, and Australia, and worked for periods in Asia.

Seriously, there is no need to live somewhere where you worry, or even think, about your safety that much.Whatever your views are on the inherent nature of people, you can turn off all of effects with smart gun laws, and no other changes.

Case in point, Australian public mass killings, before and after their "worst 20% of guns are banned" laws:

http://personalshoplifter.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/06/mass-in-australia-graph.jpg

It has now been zero for 20 unbroken years in a row.I have lived in all sorts of suburbs in those places, and I've never thought "I need a weapon to safely live here". 

In Germany and Japan, for instance, I honestly never thought about my safety once.There are some weirdos though. Seriously, America is HUGEHaha. You should link to the comment though, so we can see it in action.So what would you say the chance of needing it to save your life would be, in (say) a 5 year period?The 2002 one wasn't even an urban mass killing. The US threshold is 4 or more killed, 2002 was only two. 

It's included because even two people killed resulted in tightened laws. Not more than 2 people have been shot in public for 19 (almost 20) years, since 1996.My usual reaction is:

- someone needs to fix a certain education system

- a lot of people need to spend 3 months living abroad for some perspectiveI love that he started off the sentence with so much confidence, then trailed off as if it's unknowable.Or just tell the supermarkets to close and turn off the water and electricity.

What are we even talking about...I think he's talking about that Stephen King novel where they run a lotPersonal safety, paid vacations, maternal and paternal leave,  a social safety net, quality affordable college for children, and good public transport are all highly sought after by the world's professionals. 

Often referenced for these types of considerations is this city/country ranking:

http://www.economist.com/blogs/graphicdetail/2015/08/daily-chart-5Lol, probably not. Or have them shooting at you.

Although I have read some really interesting takes by US military personnel who have gone abroad and it's changed how they think about things. 

One guy even lived in the Middle East afterwards (spent time in Jordan, I think).Ah, that's a common misconception. Australia's laws were *only* designed to stop public mass killings (with the lowest possible disruption otherwise). It's still pretty cathartic, even (or especially) after a tragedy.I'm trying to understand. Apparently the last two groups are weirdos.This is awesome. They'll be unsalable (not even worth the cost of the land) soon though, anyway.Germany is amazing on renewables, you drive through fields of solar AND wind together on the autobahns. 

All this will do will remove the oldest and dirtiest sources, it's good.Never, I say. Never!"Well regulated" meant "well run", and "militia" meant "lonely middle aged white guys at home" DURRPapa?It takes a villageApparently because they have more transparent sentencing than other statesGood answer: "Do you guys just forget what happened in the news every few days and start over?"You can start with your gadgets now with this neat little concept

http://www.fastcoexist.com/3048930/this-outlet-adapter-lets-you-run-all-your-gadgets-on-solar-powerYou name it, a smart engineer somewhere is solving it. 

Even just painting turbines pink cuts it down dramatically

http://cleantechnica.com/2014/11/19/painting-wind-turbines-purple-will-save-wildlife-make-opponents-angrier/

Coal kills masses of birds, of course, too.I don't mean physical problems (always), things like software bugs, bad design choices in iTunes, etc.People could give constructive tips, sure. 

But the focus would be more towards humor than endless "can someone please help me my itunes doesn't recognize my iphone i bought a new cord..." type posts.Ah no, my apologies. I didn't mean that, and appreciate the intelligence and effort in your posts.

My online discussing style tends towards discussing one point at a time, and moving on once we agree. This stops it becoming endless walls of text talking across each other and, in my experience, increases the chance of an actual useful outcome for both people.

So, I was correcting one small point of yours:

&gt; Here are two other graphs that indicate gun regulation has had little to no effect on homicides.

&gt; http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-Wch1iM2hiJ8/Uh_aTo_r8aI/AAAAAAAAG9k/KsgoGyZOVJQ/s1600/Screen+Shot+2013-08-29+at++Thursday,+August+29,+7.32+PM+1.png

I was pointing out actually that's *not* a conclusion you can draw from that chart. In fact, you should draw the opposite conclusion if you compare it to my chart earlier:

http://personalshoplifter.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/06/mass-in-australia-graph.jpg

The Australians removed *only* the classes of guns that had been *historically* used by people to cause *multiple casualties in a short amount of time in a public place*. Hence why removing them was so effective in ending mass shootings. They were looking for the low hanging fruit. For one small issue.

They were not looking at solving a general homicide problem, because Australia doesn't have a general homicide problem the public are particularly worried about (it's about 5x lower than the US rate - only a couple hundred a year - and mostly by people that people already know).

*If*, say, (hypothetically) Australia had a general gun homicide problem, it would probably have come up with a *completely different* solution. 

I'm guessing, but it would probably start with studying the guns that most were used in homicides. And perhaps things like storage, where they were bought, potential domestic violence solutions, etc.

Australian governments love science backed, evidence based policy. It's much less partisan than America in that regard. Left wing governments do right wing things and vice versa.

Legislation *does* reduce criminals from being criminals - it just has to be backed up by research, smart, iterative (modified based on how it goes), etc.I'm sure material cost, supply and material innovation are huge on companies' lists, especially as prices rise. 

This is capitalism, after all.
It's been a tough week thoughThey can do what they like, I'm just looking for an answer : /&gt; The 13th Dalai Lama... instituted many measures to modernise Tibet. These included provisions to curb excessive demands on peasants for provisions by the monasteries and tax evasion by the nobles, setting up an independent police force, the abolition of the death penalty, extension of secular education, and the provision of electricity throughout the city of Lhasa in the 1920s. (Norbu &amp; Turnbull 1968, pp. 317\u2013318).I had dinner with a Swiss guy last night. He was telling me they all own these ancient looking old rifles, and Switzerland has an epidemic of young men blowing half their face off, because they impetuously try to kill themselves but can't reach the trigger. 

Facial reconstruction is a relatively big thing there. Myth. Switzerland has old guns, and higher gun violence than it ought to. When was the last German one? Ages ago, and the US is only three times the size of Germany. Yet the US has one every week or so. No, your opinion is poorly argued and not as valid. Compare the US to other developed Western nations, there's no comparison. Higher the guns, higher the murder rate. Lol, the old "it was the blacks" dog whistle suggestion. 

Race is another thing that can easily be discounted. The USA has a higher murder rate than Malawi, Sierra Leone, Senegal and Liberia, in Africa. 

And the UK of course, as head of an ex truly global empire, one of the most diverse places there is. It's not, the FBI standard was/is four. Like the rest of the West outside the USA, Germany hardly ever has mass shootings. You have to break that chain of personal paranoia. Unnecessary legal guns leads to unnecessary illegal bad guy guns, which leads to more legal and illegal guns, etc etc. 

Guns are actually one of the easiest things for governments to control. They can't be broken down at the border like drugs, they get picked up by metal detectors and x-rays, they age (become obsolete), unlike drugs they remain in a house and remain a liability, and they need a supply of ammunition. 

Most Western countries with common sense gun laws have around a five times lower murder rate, and you never have to think about guns. It's a fantasy. No one "comes at you" in a normal society, with common sense gun laws. Yeah, but has any other sub ever planted a flag on the moon? I rest my case.u go broYou could put it in the sidebar, and warn people if it got snarky. I think it could be fun.Nonsense. Humans have laws to change the behavior of "humanity as a species". Even if the aim was to fix things, I think public would be more effective.

But honestly, sometimes it's just nice to have a good-humored laugh.take the cats off the wind towers!Really?? You honestly think if there were no laws against murder, rape and stealing, they wouldn't go up? And bans on everything from RPGs to radioactive materials make no difference?  

Nuts.And she's a babyIt's great you've written this. This used to be the official Western medical position, but is now around 10 years out of date for some conditions.

I mentioned it as an interesting fact that many people still aren't aware of.I agree.

IMHO manual rifles and revolvers (not semi or auto) could be one of those steps. Still within the Second Amendment, and as Australia shows, it really cuts down on the mass shootings (and suicides).

Folks could feel protected from "a guy climbing through my window", yet we don't have these kids getting shot at school, theatres, etc.  &gt;  Do you think any law can stop someone from shooting up a school or movie theater if their mind is set on it? Because it simply won't.

Well, it's a broken record discussion, but yes, actually they can. The Australian laws have stopped people shooting up a school or movie theater if their mind is set on it. 

It has gone from a US copycat style epidemic, to public mass shooting free for 20 straight years in a row now

http://personalshoplifter.com/the-effectiveness-of-australian-gun-lawsJust great. The perfect response to people who think a domestic holiday is just as different an experience as an international one. 1. "I like my guns more than gun control, so I'll post it". 

2. "I like not being picked on my the nation's media, so I'll take it back, if that makes you shut up". 

Sounds about right to me. Australia's allegiances will be torn, and partly due to FOMO will fight for both sides simultaneously. When left wing magazines go extreme, they don't go batshit making things up, like the right. 

It's a different style. They go "tricky convoluted criticism of the left to look clever and prove a different left wing point". The real idiots are those who are such poor shots they need auto or semi auto weapons.Great. I'm so sick of rhetoric over substance. 


\u2022 Gun control is "tyranny", but making it impossible to live my life without thinking about guns is not. 


\u2022 Anti racism is "political correctness", but telling me how to treat a flag is not.

 Etc etc. We ally with the buffalo wings in the evening, and the maple syrup pancakes in the morning. They've been hallucinating through windows for years. This is deplorable. But I always think it's strange your homeowner has *no* say about median strips, Plantings, parking etc straight outside your door. 

As long as it looks nice and is fairly consistent, no one else really minds as much. Did anyone here see it?Thank god it's not as horrible as the title implies... but still pretty horrible. I reckon he can do what he likes, mate. No one is telling me what race I should hang out with in my spare time.That's everywhere in the world pretty much. People are busy and don't stop to reshuffle their social lives when someone else comes along and needs it. Hey there - Korea fan here. Please have some Mapo BBQ for me as I'm sorry I'm not there at the moment. 

You will have a good time. I found Koreans *very* lovely to me. You will find people generally friendly (at work), and mostly leave you alone/busy in public. Socially it's up to you, but there's lots of clubs and things if you like that, and Koreans (students, church types, etc.) if you want to stay amongst expats. 

Australia has an unfair image in a lot of areas abroad. The drunks/bozos might be louder than other places. But they are pretty rare. 30% of Australians are immigrants, and it's a very multicultural place. I hate it when I put $100,000 as my upper limit (eg. for land), and it shows me $1,000,000 places. All. The. Time. I'm living in one. If you care about an accurate result, it's actually a far better system. 

Older Republicans tend to vote much, much more than poorer Democrats, which pulls both parties' policies to the right.Isn't that story apocryphal?Meta, but can we give ELI5 answers to newbies, please? I feel we give overly complicated and jargony answers all the time to people like this. Unorthodox answer. 

Bad things happens to good people. Think of kids being killed in the holocaust. 

I've never heard a good reason for it, in Christianity, Judaism, or anywhere else. 

So, I go to two possible answers. Either the world is meaningless, mechanical, none of us are connected and shit just happens. Or, there is a karmic reason for suffering, perhaps from a past rebirth. 

As I've seen some weird, non mechanical things happen in my life, I'm happy to go with the second one, as the current best answer. If you're surrounded by "nice" people, you will never progress spiritually. 

What part did you have to play in the argument? 50%? 10%? Even 1%? That's something to work on.  

In a way, these people are your greatest teachers, so think of them as precious in their ugliness. They may have even *been* a favorite teacher in a past life. 

Practically, you could bring them a gift, like sweets. With others in the office if you like, but give it to them one on one.  It's amazing what an unexpected gift can do. 
It's not difficult to avoid (they have voting on holidays), and it's an efficient way to fix a pretty big market distortion.It's an algorithm problem, $45,000 shows $450,000 places, $60,000 $600,000 places, etc.You're actually threatening - or justifying - verbal abuse for people hanging out with non-white people. Pretty bottom of the barrel attitude.Sure, but the counter example shoots holes in the "America is violent because of blacks" (horrible, ignorant) argument. Haha, that's so funny. 

1. I heard of a big drinker at home who had to bail out of Korean drinking fests.

2. Wow, what can you do.

3. Japanese stores are pretty cool, in a weird way, I agree. (I get zero people bowing at me at home.)

4. Ha. How does that play out? Any advantages?

5. Inconceivable.

6. I can imagine that scene somehowThis came from a Lama I respect. 

If a person has a grudge against you, even if you did nothing, you did something in their mind. 

Therefore, why not fix that slight if you can?

It was a Q and A session, the guy tried it, and it worked a charm - new best friend.Aw man. That was great. Should be a guide book. IMHO your question is no less difficult than the physics one. Why is there a universe from nothing? We have some early guesses but we don't know. 

Buddha was silent on things which were impossible to explain (2,500 years ago), or were a waste of time to worry about. 

Personally, I get comfort out of the fact that the dilemmas are so similar. It makes sense somehow that nirvana is outside of time itself. Buddhism isn't so much a religion, in the Western sense. Think of it half way between organized religion and psychology. I don't drive much, so...In what country was he stabbed? I've used up my Slate limit :/Yes - but it didn't say which country. Thanks.I love it - advanced practitioners would also enjoy it. 

Just thinking about the perspective of the OP in this case. Buddhism was almost culturally overwhelming when I began!That's what I figure. It's still bad customer juju for the websites to allow such a difference thoughIt's hard for a regular person to follow that type of thinking. It's not race, but it is, but it's not?

I think at the end of it you're arguing the same as me, it's societal conditions, that can be changed with a combination of laws (reduce the type of guns that end up in certain areas), rates (increase minimum wage) and attitudes (more inclusion, less racism).White people are inherently weak and servile to people with greater wealthMy neck hurt from suddenly finding a reasonable comment in this threadHe was chanting it anyway, and this thread just happened alongI've got something from the script! It's 

.Account not hacked, username matches upSide order?white brains are smaller?That bloody clown newsletterThat's so great! Korea is really fun. What ESL teaching certification did you get?Sounds great! I don't have masses to add, because solving the details will *be* your service. 

Generally though, crowd sourced contention the platform (with your content posted under fake account names) is the way to make things like this work. You've solved my dilemma, how to get an English speaking job (and visa) in the Czech Republic! I'm so excited you called it easy, as I've found it hard. What advice would you give someone wanting to do what you've done?Oh wow, my life's #1 problem. I've ended 3 or 4 otherwise great relationships over this issue. 

I've probably tried everything: from trials beforehand (weeks, months and years abroad), to letting them choose the country, to financial incentives ("I'll support you financially, and you can do passion projects or whatever you feel like"). To ultimatums... you name it. 

My problem is I live in a very otherwise pleasant country with good weather and a good social safety net. All my partners wanted to be there - also with family - to have and raise kids. 

Right now I'm doing my best to stay single until I can leave again, this time alone. 

I've even sold my double bed, and bought a ridiculously unsexy old woman single bed, to make sure I follow through on this!

Let me know how you go. And if you need any help, or want further advice, send me a PM. 
&gt; its good that a muslim leader said that because if it was any other Australian to say that they would be labeled a racist

Correct! Power differences are an important part of how verbal things affect peopleWhat a legend. So much more effective if it comes from within.Tom Cruise.Hopefully they can find your mother's old address and offer her a time travel abortionMore than that - he'd like to finalize a *Port Adelaide* deal before the election, for those desperately needed South Australian votes. Come tu SirNot exactly but perhaps. The sites that have tended to scale and do well are the facebooks, Reddits, twitters and the like, where users create the content. 

Static resources need to be constantly updated, are wage heavy, and harder to make really work. Despite every advantage, white people still have thinnest of skins, perhapsOne of those topics where downvotes and upvotes are oppositeIt doesn't matter what was in his fridge - Investigators on similar spectrum of moronI agree, but also that it's a perfect opportunity for monetization. 

A few hundred dollars is nothing if you want to move abroad, and folks who have made it should be able to monetize their research and experience. 

I can see a Fiverr type site, where people list their route, and offer a mentoring service to help others do the same.

Eg. "Hi, I'm Brian, I got a tech job in Berlin! If you have any of the following skills, I can help with a PDF of everything you need to score a job and visa. 

Price: $99"

Site gets a cut, something that works for everyone. 

Etc. Don't tread on me.The Nobel Peace Prize is a progressive prize: it's awarded according to the biggest impact it can make, at any one time. 

It's not as many people mistakenly think, an Emmy or Olympic Gold, say for most lives saved or some such. Anti malaria campaigners (etc) would win it every year if it was. Wait, are we pro or minus penis measuring?The hockey skills made them nope the fupt out"Temporary protection visas" these are called in Australia, where they've been for years. 

It's ok if you're made of money. What it does is let you pay for people's protection, but not get any of the windfall when people start to become a net benefit to the economy. Just the US. There right wing government is pretty standard for the West. Animation might be nice. 

Sort of a grungier, urban, more realistic *Yellow Submarine*.He's gone!Loose loose situation 

FTFY o7The better the country the more establishing shotswow. unexpected neat ending.Cue comment about if you remove the country's dangerous parts, it's actually very safeGood guy with a gun didn't get bat signal in timeOne 2,680 mile wide one pleaseNothing. Hi. *Plays with dials*"fine but you're still american"... Love it.You've said "please". And.... we've done all we can do.Pretty damn closeAt this point I'm 50-50 on either arming everyone from birth, or doing what the other sensible countries do in the West.Warning to safer countries: get more guns, and control your media"The Western Developed World"Get your cowboy incidents organized, people!Impossible to tell at this point.Can't wait for an off-handed dismissal of one of the top 3 most obvious lines of inquiryIt's okay ma'am, your son has a hole in his head... but it was *not* a mass shooting.This is the SECOND amendment. It's vagueness is part of a GENIUS PLAN.Duh - this is a "side of a school" shooting. Not a "classroom shooting" or a "walking around hunting down people" shooting. Pay attention please.Worst day everrI can't really move for all the militias at my college. There's always a bunch planning defence against tyranny in the library. &gt; Because small arms can target single intruders efficiently without blowing up your house or other people.

Tyrannical governments always come first for the TV and jewelry.\u2022 Let people have revolvers for home self defence, and manual loading hunting rifles for hunting. 

\u2022 Let militias look after any semi and auto military weapons in secure armories, away from unstable kids.I think he's pointing out that's why we have amendments.They put those "gun free zones" in for a reason, you know. It's called the 1980s - 2000s.They do that too, actually. It happened to the "world's best sniper husband" guy.It's a fluke. Either that or there's not enough guns yet.Can you explain this to me? The murder rate is about 400% times higher in the US.Because murderNo no, we just need to buy more guns and we'll be golden.Why didn't one of the guys fighting turn into a good guy with a gun?Totally. Don't fall for their small military today trick.It reduces the body count of mass shootings, whilst protecting *skilled* shooters' existing Second Amendment rights.I thought we were talking about the Second Amendment. 

Perhaps there is a Guns to defend against fellow citizens Amendment.I think in a democracy you discuss issues amongst the people, and amend laws according to the people's current wishes.
In your face, Britain.Or a passport?Clearly one gun was too little. 15 guns keeps everyone polite, and in no way like a Quentin Tarantino movie.We do have ongoing new sensible motor vehicle legislation thoughMaybe. A profusion of creativity might be great."A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, can I have a Big Mac please?"

I'm *always* adding preambles like that onto things.Nor discussion about it. Cut that anti-American "talking about it" out, Reddit.Just because one country put their heads together to completely solve a problem we're struggling with has NO relevance here, silly. They have these things called seat belts and compulsory crumple tests. You have to drive on one side of the road. You need to pass tests to drive them. And there is a limit on how powerful they can be. 

Might be one or two thousand other rules not sure.It has something to do with the preamble obviously being important, and not accidentally added to the Second Amendment, without meaning.

i.e., gun ownership was always meant to be seen in the context of defence against tyranny, not burglars or cinema shooters.Woah woah woah. Let's stop there. Can't have more than that."The Electors shall meet in their respective states and vote by ballot for President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant of the same state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the person voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of all persons voted for as President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and of the number of votes for each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to the seat of the government of the United States, directed to the President of the Senate; -- the President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House of Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes shall then be counted; -- The person having the greatest number of votes for President, shall be the President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors appointed; and if no person have such majority, then from the persons having the highest numbers **not exceeding three on a list** of those voted for as President, the House of Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot, the President. But in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by states, the representation from each state having one vote; a quorum for this purpose shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds of the states, and a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. [And if the House of Representatives shall not choose a President whenever the right of choice shall devolve upon them, before the fourth day of March next following, then the Vice-President shall act as President, as in case of the death or other constitutional disability of the President. --]* The person having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall be the Vice-President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors appointed, and if no person have a majority, then from the two highest numbers on the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the whole number of Senators, and a majority of the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person constitutionally ineligible to the office of President shall be eligible to that of Vice-President of the United States."



Bolded is the **important part**. Clearly we should **never have more than three things on a list**.I loved it when the Founding Fathers said "The tree of liberty must be watered with the blood of gangbangers, college kids and sad ass domestic disputes."You're being weirdly selective in your reading of the Second Amendment to suit your argument.What point do you think they were trying to make... by starting the only mention of guns within the context of militias?Can... successfully kicked down the road.

Well done Sir.Damn. It's a pity there's no other crazy US shooting deaths at gun range stories I can point to

http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-2745200/Girl-nine-shot-dead-instructor-Uzi-gun-range-horror-born-raised-Sydney-family-moved-US-year.htmlThey mention "militia", "defence of the state", "military service" etc over and over. Yet not a single mention of "burglary", "theft", "criminals", "muggings", or any of the things you're saying is "very clear".

Maybe they used a fading type of ink? Or maybe it was super important but it just slipped their mind?

I'm sure you're right. On, you know, gut feeling.That's so awesome! And you've passed an interview already before you got it. Is that normal, or super fast?I don't know about you, but I'd take "my chair versus his knife" over "my chair versus his gun" any time.I'm an asshole, don't tread on me!Violent crime is lower *everywhere* than the US, except for developing countries. 

And even then, some really poor African countries beat us for personal safety.No, there's clearly not enough. Haven't you seen the brilliant plan?The world gets it weekly in their news and is getting real tired of your shitPeople overseas care about that, tooSpotted the Australian. Killing each other is an important part of our Constitution or something cunt.Better reset that count for tomorrowMah freedomI like that part where you made out they always stay legal.You idiot. He was obviously a well run militia defending against the other guy's tyranny.I may have little connection to reality but at least I have *manners*.I'm with you. Leave me with my bolt action hunting rifle and I'm fine. Ban all the gangbanger pistols and Sunday Warrior semi autos you want.Funny other countries post people's names and don't have anywhere near this problem.A bit cunty actuallyDon't try to gang up on me with your evidence!That's so cool. It certainly makes it seem more of a "this will really happen" thing.

You'll love it. Congratulations!You forgot to say "I rest my case", that means you made some sort of a point.Source?A standup up ~~citizen~~ **one person militia** exercising his god given right.

FTFY
Malawi: less than half the US murder rate

Sierra Leone: less than half the US murder rate

Liberia: two thirds the US murder rate

Senegal: around half the US murder rate

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_intentional_homicide_rateI like your thinking. Pretty sure the Wild West was shooting freeWe're talking murders here. With guns or not. 

Want to point out the developed European countries, that you would say were similar for comparison purposes to America, with a larger homicide rate? 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_intentional_homicide_rateHey, *just* because you don't know someone, *doesn't* mean you can't trust them with an efficiently designed killing machine.I don't know. Where did the gun come from, inside the zone?We can only dream of that utopia happening one dayDon't tread on my fantasyLA LA LA can't deal with your reason right nowTo bad we're not a country that can fix hard things. Like, you know, getting a tin can up to a lunar thing. Employ ESP gun shop employees and we're goldenDon't blame the framers. It was the politicians who brought it into the shop.They also have old school 1920s style clunky rifles you can't put in a backpack.It's not a bug it's a featurenah, at this stage we've forgotten how that goes.Honestly, you should keep the "bang, deer for dinner" ones, and the "bang bang, I got into the Olympics" ones.

Less of the "bangbangbangbang. bangbangbangbang. I'm going to keep shooting people until the police get here" ones.

Just a suggestion.Right. The flag's stars are not meant to represent yearly mass shootings.Doesn't matter. Burglars steal guns, and others sell them irresponsibly. There's not a neat line.It's your fault somehow. You know, for rubbing those low murder rates in our faces.They're just holding the guns wrongOh my, in a population of 330 million and nearly all able to buy guns, that's pretty frightening.Wow. Way to collect all the ex Soviet dictatorships next to Russia for your comparison.

Not, I don't know, Britain, Ireland, Spain, France, Australia, Canada, New Zealand, Germany, Italy...I agree. Reddit titles, like second amendment preambles, are strictly for decoration purposesYou're right. It really is the safest place, if you remove the un safe places from the calculations.Interesting! Do we know a rough murder rate per 100,000?Right. Their should be a connection to the gun and the purpose. No one should need 13 shots to scare off a junkie burglar, or bring down a buck. If they do they need to go practice more.Try living there for a while. The Swiss faces getting blown off from shitty suicide attempts is pretty damn high.no, not allowed. because reasons.True. totally regular. we just have each incident 4-10 times other places for luck.Gun has to be fit for legal purpose, eg to bring down a deer. no excess magazine capacity.malitia duties. so hot right now.&gt; modern full-auto weapons

doesn't fit any decent deer hunters I knowmmm, i love that democratic, peaceful history to compare with, nowhere near a militarized drug trademe?Even if that wasn't True, it's in the magic "America zone". Democracy crumbles if there's not guns everywhere.If it was only 6x we'd start to feel like we never hear from you anymore :'(The trees of liberty overseas must be looking very unwatered :'(Totally. "A well regulated militia, being necessary to snag a big buck with your kids..." How these British survive all their lack of guns I have no idea.The magic number is 500,000,000 guns. Then it all gets super safe.All hidden from official statistics too - the perfect crime!There's that great biblical quote about if someone's beating you up, shoot them in the eye.Wait, are we talking Hollywood fantasy, or real life?I'm going to pass that question on to someone neutral, like the NRA.They're probably included in the militia partDon't forget that house in Italy that is TOTALLY more violent...Only the countries with good statistics are poor. The countries with bad statistics are all ripe for comparison.Unfortunately I don't live in the US, so we don't have gun fights to try this stuff :/I'm also proud of the fact that we're also the #1 cherry pickers in the worldIt adds up to $8.50 for me?Lemme check!They're just names. My coffee business friend is called Sheik Starbucks by locals when he goes to Saudi Arabia. It was the right message, from the right person, at the right time. I'd much rather the news was reporting this than some crazy right winger or whatever. I've heard about all that great Koranic scholarship you've doneDude, everyone's an economic migrant. That's why we have a migration program. Number rektGive up dude, you lost that one. Get a better job and move out of the ghetto?When in doubt, do a survey of all the other Western countries' laws. Aim to come up somewhere in the middle.The Coen Bros use opposites a lot in their films. Fat vs thin. Talkative versus silent. Smart vs dumb, etc.Start with the best - Royal TenenbaumsIf Owen Wilson is doing some writing on it it will be a tight classic. If he's not, it will be a good looking disappointment.yep. look for ones with similar income levels.Americans had the same reputation in the 1970s - 2000s (loud, rude, demanding things be like home, etc.). 

It ends when enough of the population go overseas, and come back to educate people about overseas differences and norms.That woman is amazingAh, apologies. That sounds good.The militia part was just them warming up the penLol, yes totally. We can only fairly compare ourselves to other countries with a Statue of Liberty, pancakes and Disneyland.

Wait, that's France. 

What's their homicide rate like? It's funny how America can compare itself to other countries just fine when it's a **good thing**:

\u2022 The only country that's gone to the moon!

\u2022 More Olympic medals than any other country!

\u2022 Biggest melting pot in the world!


But when it's a **bad thing**:

\u2022 Oh no sorry, we can't be compared to any other country, we're too differentI've never really understood why a socialized moon landing can be a great source of pride, but a socialized quality healthcare system for all can't be.God gave us two eyes so we wouldn't need universal healthcare DURRI think we can all agree with the very low bar principle that other developed Western countries aren't stupid, and if they don't have anywhere near the same problem (per capita), we can maybe look at something along the lines of their well running laws?Just agreeing on that general principle is a great first step. 

Whatever the average "developed country" position is on any issue (checks, limits) would remove any extreme position, and I'm sure would be a great improvement. I do have a pretty good understanding, but we've had plenty of arguing over specifics, and never getting anywhere.

Every country has hunters, homeowners, sports shooters and patriots.

We should therefore all be able to agree on a very uncontroversial statement: "other countries with fewer problems probably have a better set of laws on this issue."https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_intentional_homicide_rateAmericans sure are obsessed with those two knifings, in a country with a billion people.

Meanwhile, the US has a mass shooting almost every day.The US is just three times the size of Germany.

"Oh my God... these things are so different in size there's no way we could ever compare them!!!"That's actually a pretty funny statement. Upvote.Seriously, this fetishizing of old politicians (and old laws) does not do justice to a great country. 

Have confidence in your abilities! You can always modify what you change if it doesn't work.

The founding fathers weren't all seeing gods.In the US, cats must take a test.yet forgetting their other laws

Wat

Do you think they have "pro holocaust" laws? You weirdo.I've had a scratch in my eye from a tree branch, and I went straight into emergency. Eye injuries are *scary*.

I can't imagine how someone could ever be cavalier about them.I honestly think laissez-faire Capitalism is so popular because it's the simplest to understand. You can grasp it in the playground, and unlike regulated markets, doesn't require any extra thinking.&gt; once the overlords have their way

&gt; disarming the Americans

It's like someone believing in chemtrails, or UFOs. 

Amazing real life people have to die because of that delusional little fantasy you've got going.&gt; "also its one eye. you can get by just dandy with one eye."

https://np.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3o5jz7/florida_womans_eye_glued_shut_refused_treatment/cvugjln\u2022 Freedom to fold, crush, roll, or treat the flag however I want without being judged

\u2022 Freedom from paying home taxes if I don't live there

\u2022 Freedom to sit, talk through, laugh, and make fun of the national anthem at sporting events

\u2022 Freedom from medical or college debt

\u2022 Freedom from compulsory sentencing laws that deny people their liberty

\u2022 Freedom of fear of the police

\u2022 Freedom to holiday in Cuba (if still a thing)

\u2022 Freedom to buy chocolate eggs with toys in them, and any sort of cheeses

\u2022 Freedom to buy unhomoginized milk

\u2022 Freedom to not turn up to work if I'm sick (or my child is sick, or my parents are in town and I want to drive them around doing nice things for the day)

From someone else:

&gt; Dude, even europoors have more choices for ISPs, maybe the US ISP market needs some freedom?
 As of 10/3/15, there have been 994 mass shootings in the US in the previous 1,004 days

(That's pretty close to "almost every day")

Date, state, injuries and deaths for each of those events here:

http://www.theguardian.com/us-news/ng-interactive/2015/oct/02/mass-shootings-america-gun-violenceDude, it's one of the biggest newspapers in the world, there's no mention of reddit on that page, and you can google every one of those events to verify its details. True. 

But explaining how anti monopoly laws benefit consumers and the economy is a little harder than just yelling out "GET OUT OF THE WAY GUVMMENT!"Dude, take your own word, do your own diligence. 

Google three of those 994 events at random, like I have, and tell me if any don't match up. Otherwise, be quiet with your cherry picking.All of those 994 mass shootings occurred. Are you saying they are a government charade or something?Dude, I'm citing whatever news outlet you want, including the largest newspapers in every city where those 994 mass shootings occurred. 

At random:

Aug 19, 2015 Rochester, NY
http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation/2015/08/20/least-2-dead-rochester-ny-shooting/32037283/

Jul 23, 2015 Lafayette, LA
http://abcnews.go.com/US/lafayette-louisiana-movie-theater-gunman-idd-john-russel/story?id=32653062

Jul 16, 2015 Chattanooga, TN
http://edition.cnn.com/2015/07/22/us/chattanooga-shooting/

If you want to ignore real events because you like those numbers better, good luck to you.&gt; Who do I trust?

You can trust Associated Press (AP). They're a non-profit, and their one job is to collect raw news for other newspapers to print (left, right and center).

http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/fronts/HOME?SITE=AP&amp;SECTION=HOME

Their twitter feed is a more readable format, IMHO.

Others are not completely unbiased, but you can do a lot worse than the public (non profit) news services: NPR, BBC, et al.

http://www.npr.org/sections/news/

http://www.bbc.com/news&gt; You can keep your gun grab circle jerk.

Wait - did you really equate NPR with a *gun grab circle jerk?*

You **do** know NPR and the FBI are both different parts of the government?&gt; the Constitution is the \u201csecond greatest document ever inspired by OUR GOD

Whoops. A bit sacrilegious.

\u201cThe civil government functions with complete success by the total separation of the Church from the State.\u201d

~Founding Father James MadisonOh my goodness, I feel like I lost brain cells reading that.

&gt; Why does the U.S want to disarm it's citizens

False. Some democrats want common sense gun laws. The Australian laws only removed 20% of guns - those most regularly used in mass shootings. American laws won't remove all guns.

&gt; Yet send arms to the same people that supposedly perpetrated 911, in Syria?

The US has been criticized for vetting rebels *too* thoroughly. Moderate rebels are regularly killed by AQ and IS.

&gt; Most/All mass shootings in the U.S come from people taking Psychoactive medications. 

Rubbish, you just made that up. Most  mass shootings are by people with simple anger management issues.

&gt; The culture of violence is remarkable. 

Every country that had a problem with gun violence, and solved it with gun laws, could (and did) say the same thing.

&gt; It is up to the Americans to educate, train, and protect themselves.

This is meaningless. Americans have never been under threat from their government, and the second amendment has had no part in this. It's like thinking you haven't been attacked by vampires because you have strings of garlic in your house.

&gt; They do not want to find themselves living in a 3rd world controlled shithole like India or somewhere.

Gun violence, along with a lack of affordable healthcare, and the death penalty, are the things that more connect the USA to 3rd world countries (nearly all of these have been evolved out of by the West in the Twentieth Century)

Here's a tally of homicide rates, where you can see the link between American and 3rd world rates quite clearly:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_intentional_homicide_rateOk, I'm talking to someone with an intellectual handicap. Apologies.Pffft. You guys are hilarious.What about an emuThis ad might give you an insight into the differences between Australian and New Zealand attitudes to defence. 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7xUYbI64QHIMy god. Just when you think some people can't get any lower.Ok, so I guess Finn is from Jakku (Boyega points out they are his clothes), and that's why he can't follow through on the original stormtrooper attack.&gt; take things into their own hands...Scotch-Irish...making their own booze...  government's tax on distilled spirits... Whiskey Rebellion nearly destroyed the fledgling nation... illegal stills... racing each other

Yeah, Afrikaans, Rhodesians, Canadians and Australians had all that. Stop the "we have to have guns, we're special" rubbish, it's embarrassing.You'll probably find that you're just regular humans, and your murder rate go down to regular levels.Rule check! Can we post a comment from a conversation we were involved with in these "anything goes" threads?

I've got one which is bot-worthy in its poetic beauty.O7Oh really! Why is that? Can we link to an imgur image of a quote that was on facebook? They're jealous of our freedomOhh oh oh. Cool. I thought it was some corporate thing (Reddit guy once dated Zuckerberg's girlfriend, or whatnot).

I can see that.

Can we post comments that we were involved in on Reddit in the "anything goes" threads?Neither is that ad you posted. It's a fossil fuels disinformation campaign, like the ones fudging lung cancer  studies by tobacco companies more than a generation ago.Sweden is doing amazingly in green energy. Almost 50 per cent of Sweden's energy production now comes from renewable sources (amongst the largest biofuel and hydro industries in the world), and nuclear is also a decent amount. 

Sweden has been at this since the 1970s oil shock, so going to 100% fossil fuel free relatively soon is very achievable. 

Solar is also ideal in the very long summer days, and lower temperatures makes them cool down to be more efficient than in deserts.Cool, thanks!&gt; If you look at the manufacturer's data sheet you will see a term called "temperature coefficient Pmax". For example the temperature coefficient of a Suntech 190 W (monocrystalline) solar panel is \u20130.48%. What this means is that for each degree over 25\u02daC \u2026 the maximum power of the panel is reduced by 0.48%.

&gt; So on a hot day in the summer \u2013 where solar panel temperature on the roof might reach 45\u02daC or so \u2013 the amount of electricity would be 10% lower.

&gt; Conversely, on a sunny day in the Spring, fall, or even winter \u2013 when temperatures are lower than 25\u02daC \u2013 the amount of electricity produced would actually increase above the maximum rated level.

Summer temperatures near the major population centers of Sweden are typically something like 13 \u00b0C - to 22 \u00b0C.Oh god, er - science? 

Here's some of the major glaring myths addressed

http://ourworld.unu.edu/en/review-the-moral-case-for-fossil-fuels-really

And if you want a more neutral source, read the fifth assessment report

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Intergovernmental_Panel_on_Climate_Change

Please don't inbox reply to me. It's too depressing there's still people either (a) paid to make these sorts of comments online, or (b) who actually believe those sorts of propaganda pieces. Amorality or embarrassment, I'm not sure which is worse.It's hard to know how to argue against that. (Message to Sub Founding Fathers - I added this to Reddit quote to Imgur. Please let me know if it doesn't properly meet our constitution's separation of powers.Ok it's been tried 22 times already but seriously, the US is HUGE

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_United_States_presidential_assassination_attempts_and_plotsAlso, freedom to be a Christian (they don't have Easter public holidays someone told me - the most Christian of holidays??)The baby works too, sillyIt's also an important thing to note. Americans have an awful lot of negative liberty (freedom from interference and external restraint by other people). But they have an awful lack of positive liberty (the possession of the power and resources to fulfil one's own potential - in other Western countries provided by things like a social safety net, and good working class wages).

Also, 'Freedom for the pike is death for the minnows.'

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Negative_liberty

http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/liberty-positive-negative/Don't tread on meRight?

"Bla bla, poor people can always get treatment."Surprise! Bigot deportionThese genes don't runAll. The. Time.Medieval durt gurglerFind me an example of that in that list.

Or perhaps you'd prefer this statistic of US "success"? 

http://www.martingrandjean.ch/united-states-guns-and-wars/

Developed world regular levels, I meanuh oh. a "situation"/r/ExcellentHaikuStarts?ohThat's another damning point. The murder rate is better in some very poor, undeveloped countries... as well as wealthy countries (like the UK, France, etc).It's the most important one, and the easiest to find good statistics for comparison on, of course.&gt; You are so ignorant its not even funny. The internet has made dumb asses so certain of them being correct its painful

You do realize you just said that about The Guardian (the source of that statistic) - one of the world's biggest newspapers?

Er, you do know there is no completely capitalist societies, outside war zones?

Knowing how regulation, government spending, reducing inequality and fixing market failures work IS understanding money and the economy?I'll give you my four days family holidays over Easter when you pry it from my cold, dead handsHave you? It's pretty good, and I don't even like sports all that much.If it was made in America's hat or America's pants, makes no differenceStart with the one day matches then, where it all builds up and ends by dusk. Or better - start with a 20/20 match (an almost hyper version)Developed countries have post-industrial economies, meaning the service sector provides more wealth than the industrial sector. They are contrasted with developing countries, which are in the process of industrialization, or undeveloped countries, which are pre-industrial and almost entirely agrarian.

The first 20 or so countries on this list would perhaps be suitable ones to compare to the USA.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Developed_countryGreat, take equal amounts from both sides. 

Immigration and multiculturalism is as important a part of "Australia" as anything else. If they don't like it they should fuck off.haha. i believe youwow, it's slap a statistic day, rather than address a problem, so interesting.

i'd be interested in what you do to this statistic (US versus UK, Ireland, Continental Europe, Canada, Australia, New Zealand, etc.)

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_intentional_homicide_rate*their, not there. 

It's not politically correct to say, but people who can't use basic English should be euthanised. Individual doctors are often great. Despite being wealthy, they often vote counter to their own personal financial interests. So nice when you find a group where the desire to help others is not just a professional thing.&gt; https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w2VxjqglYEI

That was beautiful&gt; for it's entire existence.

&gt; we'll catch up in a couple of decades.

Lol. Ok. 
It's a joke - a way of saying "you guys are all talk about Christianity." All hail the mighty dollar, etc.No one's said don't fear the reaper yet?Each "rack" will have to have some empty spaces, or removable AirBnb or display home type ones, for this to work.It's a False choice between "being overrun" and having inhumane detention facilities - there are a million shades of grey to choose from. 

Also, by some measures these "poor Australians" are the wealthiest people in the world, easily able to afford decent care. Right, so where do you find these more accurate stats? I highly doubt the tens of thousands times more prevalent punches and beatings are reported anywhere near as consistently around the world. Well, the chance that someone at your destination will want to move (to somewhere someone else wants to move) to where you want to move from, all in the same month is close to 0.RIP those valiant men and women rationally arguing in that threadIn this rare case I think single payer actually involves a better understanding of the market. Hear me out. Bigger insurance companies can offer lower premiums than smaller ones. And efficiencies from economies of scale are an American specialty. Big is good with healthcare.

Also, hardworking citizens here pay around the same healthcare taxes as single payer countries like Australia BUT get shafted again with out of pockets.

I'd like to see a truly deregulated *international* private market. None of this state or nation crap. The single payer system seems to solve the cost blowout issue. Just my experience adding everything up working abroad.right. and being forced to do *anything* riles me up just out of principle. 

but how to fix the problem that healthcare costs are higher with smaller contracts (less people in an insurance pool) than single payer? $700 for an inhaler not $10, et ceteraRight. I wouldn't mind the costs to come down is all. This comment is a unicornNot the same at allTEFL! Your English sounds great. 120 hours training and you're done. That too!haha. right?That's not what "final cut" means, it means he has "final say" (that he then qualifies)Just, wow. I've never seen someone per capita squared beforeSouth Australia has also been Labor for as long as I can really rememberNopeNot TrueMore per capita than the US. 

Boat arrivals is more about wedging Labor, aka domestic politics. It might look like that, but it's 100% wrong. 

Australia has a higher immigration rate per capita than nearly any country in the world (double the US). It is very bipartisan *pro* immigration country. Refugee intake is also a higher rate than the US. One in three Australians are immigrants, including those in charge of policy. 

Boat arrivals have been turned into a border security issue, a bit like airport screening in the USA. It's a political game who can seem to be stronger on defense. 

The new leader looks less willing, and less needing, to play this game to win elections, so we'll likely see a change in the not too distant future. Nope. People generally trust the police and don't often get shot by them. It's normal to see senators at the local shops or riding their bikes. It has low inequality, and I wouldn't be able to say who are more "free", Australians or Americans. It's inhumane, but the idea is allowing boat arrivals leads to thousands drowning. Effort is put into flying people in from refugee camps instead. 

In addition to this there is a lot of defense related posturing for election purposes, but that seems like it will go with the arrival of a more Centrist leader. It's legal to take a boat to Australia and apply for asylum. 1 in 3 Australians are immigrants. 1 in 2 have an immigrant parent. That's why you can find even the fringest of the fringe Australian right wing protesters falling over themselves to define their bigotry as not including immigration as a whole.Working hours have gone up, not down, over the past few generations. Peasants under the feudal system worked less than we do. You're incorrect, but it's a common mistake to make. 

You don't need a visa to apply for asylum. It's quite a different system than for wealthy business people or tourists. Dude, I didn't just read the article, I watched the whole however many hours of video. 

They are referring to it in the way I said. I'm so sad I couldn't find the original source. I would have loved to see the responses!The SA/Vic progressive thing is really interesting. There are signs in the Melbourne Museum calling for the government to provide work for homeless people in winter, in the first couple of decades in the colony. 

Seeing them really made me think maybe the character of a place is established at the beginning. I disagree. Australians are proud of helping Vietnamese refugees, that arrived by boat. The government announced 12,000 Syrian refugee places recently, to wide Australian approval. 

The anti boats stuff recently is a focused, politically instigated paranoia, and it's fascinating (and scary) how that was able to be created, largely with the help of the Murdoch press. Er, how about whistleblowing? These are anti whistleblowing laws, which we never had until we copied them from the USA. You must be American. Because they really *don't* do the things you've mentioned in the rest of the developed world. In fact, in Australia most of those things are illegal.Minim wage in Australia is something like $750 a week, and immigrants remarkably quickly become a net benefit to the economy. Interesting, thanks, I'm thinking of starting one next month. 

Besides cost, can you give me a few for points of the negatives, or things I should look out for?I know too man, but my Reddit strategy is to only answer nice people. That way there's only pleasant messages in your inbox ;)Haha. It's actually more for the economy than anything else. A high immigration rate is the fastest way to increase GDP, and Joe Hockey (hardly a progressive) was terrified when the immigration rate started to slip a little earlier this year. All except the low inequality part, the US has some of the highest in the West, I think. 

Granted it's not really an "authoritarian" statistic, but I couldn't really think of anything people might say is authoritarian in Australia to argue against. Apparently it's cheaper to buy than rent with interest rates so low. I found loads of rentals because everyone was buying instead (I can't say I felt smart, though).Lol, it's funny reading a lawyer being so confident, and wrong, about the law. Everything you're saying is what the general public believes, but is 100% incorrect. It's just funny hearing Americans always say they have 100% free speech, then the inevitable "ah, that's a tricky case" when some of the counter examples are raised. No one has free speech, and *every* developed countries' exceptions to it is a "tricky one". Laws are all a delicate balance against competing rights. Either they're giving away law degrees to anyone (which I've heard is True in the US), or you're not a lawyer.

Any country signing the 1951 Refugee Convention agrees that there should be no penalty to any refugee entering a country with or without a visa, if it can be shown that refugees acted in good faith - i.e. to escape threats upon their life or freedom - and if they swiftly declare their presence (Article 31, (1)).It's funny, because there have been studies that show computer use in class can *reduce* student outcomes. Engagement with other people (students and teachers) is far more effective than kids learning solo or via a program.It's compulsory to have hats in Australian schools. That's a skin cancer protection thing though, not a Renoir/ Wilco fashion thing.&gt;I still don't understand why they had both or why they named them differently

I blame the poor US educatation systembest one yetbeautiful, like a M\u00f6bius strip or somethingGood pickup, thanks.Check out the whole video. JJ goes into his relationship with Bob, how they go way back, and how Disney is being smart with Star Wars. 

Apparently Bob has had some ideas, but they've been good ones and not compulsory.Final cut (approval), not finished cut (completed).Well, there's always uncredited writers. Even big stars regularly have them attached to their projects.Funny, but that's not what this headline meansThat was lovely. Thanks for doing the archaeologyIt depends on the studio and contract of course, and anything's possible. Generally the more money a studio puts in, the more they add their own writers, if needed. You only really hear about them later, say if someone talks.

"Brick" was self funded, so obviously no extra writers there. "Bloom" probably two. "Looper" maybe also (it had a supportive studio), but it was a big budget and "Bloom" underperformed at the box office, so I wouldn't be so confident.

Star Wars is a completely different animal. You could think of the story group as a type of "uncredited writer", checking the universe is consistent. Some writers just do continuity, others specialise in jokes or action, others just work on a particular character/actor's dialogue (Matt Damon is a famous example... all of his lines go by his favorite scriptwriter).

It's not necessarily a bad or controlling thing, either. I imagine if there were five top-grade writers adding awesome lines and gags, that you could draw from (and take credit for), and working as a free safety net, that would be a pretty awesome thing.

Don't forget Stoppard coming in to "save" Star Wars Episode III, for a great example of this. Carrie Fisher also does this type of work.

http://mentalfloss.com/article/53410/9-films-punched-famous-screenwritersYes, that's usually deliberate though. Sometimes they get paid extra well partly because they can't use it as a credit. Other times the writers only take the job on *because* of the contract clause that they won't be connected to the film!

It's all part of the chaos and desperation that sometimes goes on behind the scenes with certain films.Also, spiders kill more people each year per capita in the US than Australia. Sure. Especially all those Vietnamese baby boomers. Actually John especially got into some big fights early on. Stu Sutcliffe was ultimately killed by one particularly brutal one. Mid century Liverpool was a tough place. you don't think that sounds like a bunch of stuff we read here?Oh, it's the 20 year "anniversary" for some of his quotes, and I just read some in the news. Amazed it fit so wellso True! really interesting when you start to give old quotes common labels... like "red pill" and "shitamericanssay"&gt; all of you anti-abortion religious cunts

that's not why she was originally denied an Australian abortion, of course. It was a (weirdly) hardline anti boat arrivals thing, that has thankfully been overruled. So much to choose from!

&gt; Roads... and the fact that we have those awesome signs that tell you what restaurants and gas stations are at each exit.

Writing is much better than yelling it out

...

&gt; The postal system: It's great to live where you can rely on strangers you will never meet to hypothetically take a package from a city on the Atlantic to somewhere on the Pacific

...

&gt; when we were fighting the Chinese in the Korean War (we) were kind of caught by surprise

...

I also found out they charge you if they rescue you at sea

&gt; A man at the fishing lodge I go to got rescued by a US coast guard helicopter... 11 grand.You're wicked

What's weird is it's not just abhorrent, it's even *outdated* and abhorrent!Be kind to yourself, don't try to repress things, be skillful, don't hurt people and try to help them if you can. 

In my opinion, there are more important things to worry about, and worrying about it can make things worse. Aldous Huxley (an early proponent of Eastern Religions) was also very pro Quaker. I've found them wonderfully humble, non dogmatic, and willing to help others. All the best with your search.It might help to realize that almost *everyone* from the West has felt something like you describe, our cultural backgrounds are strong. 

They are also powerful. I have no problem applying Buddhist concepts to Christian imagery and relationships. Indeed, the Dalai Lama recommends Westerners do such a thing. Faith can be a powerful tool.

Think of it more like you have two TVs, rather than having to throw out one. You can decide for yourself which in which room is the most skillful to use in any particular situation. Other Death StarBB was JJ's idea, not Disney's. So it was probably a creative, not a toy sales, decision. 

I see it more as just dealing with what would be all too obvious to a filmmaker: R2's inherent design flaws. It wouldn't be able to handle sand, forest floors, swamps, deep snow, or even running for spaceships at basic human speed. The flat areas for him to deal with those types of situations in the films were all too obvious. 

In contrast BB looks like something that would be useful to someone (rather than a liability) in the military/mechanical Star Wars universe. A fast rolling Swiss Army knife set of tools, it looks like. And BB's design is a great way to move the SW characters quite bravely forward, whilst keeping the overall look and what we really love about R2: his adorable scared/loyal/brave little personality. Agree, and I agree that's the problem with the PT in a nutshell (C3PO origin story? Really? I'd rather the rebels bought him new out of a catalogue). 

It makes me nervous for a Han Solo origin story, and a Death Star (plans) origin story. Besides everything else there's no suspense when we know the outcome. But we'll see how it goes with new writers and directors. And making the most incompetent things in Star Wars clones of the most competent thing? That made zero sense. I'm with you on all of the above. Plenty of creative people are able to say "yeah, that experiment just didn't work. Oh well!". 

Abandoning the prequels can be a sign of strength and knowledge how to do things better. I don't remember hardly anything about him. He shot someone from a long way away in the rain, he had blue shoulders, and his head was held by his kid. That's about all that has stayed with me. 

Whereas just about every little nod and line of dialogue of Boba Fett in the OT is seared into my brain for some reason. I liked your comment just for its randomness. Please no one spoil it by pointing out it was trying to make some sense. I like him in a cast of a bunch of bounty hunters, empire, and rebels. With a big enough cast he could keep his mask on. 

Vader did after all. Perhaps they could do a little nod to the OT by showing his mask going on once from behind, and coming off only at the very end. You sure meet some weird people on the internet. There has been a bunch of Leia leaks you Carrie casualCan we all just pause for a moment and acknowledge what a great little Lego figure that is as an object. I'm not so sure. Doctors are big supporters of universal healthcare outside the US, and I know a bunch of doctors who buy their own medicine and supplies, and spend a couple of weeks a year volunteering in the third world for free. One - a plastic surgeon - even said it's because he feels guilty being paid so much. 

Perhaps it's a chicken and egg, or Catch 22, scenario. A predatory system makes predatory attitudes, which makes a predatory system. Conversely, an altruistic system makes altruistic attitudes, which makes for an altruistic system (etc etc). Other Death StarIt's been quiet in Door Head Ant News for far too longIsn't hers the next line in that comic though?I originally thought that was a US serial killer, and it seemed like way too much information. We don't have rabies here, but isn't it based on if the animal has rabies, not if the bite is "bad"?What's the Imperial equivalent based on?As a student I've studied near the pokies room at a bar and eaten the free food all day. So there's that. Why respond to ignorance based bigotry, with ignorance based bigotry? There are plenty of moderate Muslims, gay Muslims, feminist Muslims, etc. With now over 50% of Australians having an immigrant parent, even the right wing nut jobs know someone they like who is of a different race. It's hard to be a nazi when the guy at the deli is nice to you, and the doctor, and a teacher, and your mate from primary school (etc etc). 

Muslims are more of a Murdoch paper thing and/or hidden from them in real life. Buddhism isn't. They're not even allowed to put a $5 bet on their national sport\u2022 Freedom to bet on national sports events

\u2022 Freedom to be rescued at sea without receiving a billMagnets!Yes, but it wasn't originally based on the kilogram, hundreds of years ago, was it?Ah right, degrees of light bites... not a light bite versus a mauling. 

Australia is rabies free. Are you kidding?

Never go full Ted, Lucy. Did it list the top 10? They said Australia and Japan had faster improvements, did one of them take Canada's place?Making up your own IP is higherTrue, but we don't know who's writing IX yet. It might be someone good. The one came on TV that had R2D2 flying through the robot factory. It was one of the shittiest things I've seen in a Hollywood movie.He's flexible. Watch Super 8 for a pretty competent 1980s Spielberg. Kasdan will help there. He's completely comfortable writing completely new Han Solo dialogue, etc. And unlike Star Trek, Star Wars has a large amount of completely new characters. I saw Phantom Menace in the cinema. With a few caveats (skinny robots) I liked the first scene (light saber through the blast doors). Then it started to go downhill as soon as they made it to the planet. I remember thinking "uh-oh, this isn't working, how embarrassing and a pity."I like how he said "the best Star Wars film that could be made *at this time*". That's a lot more nuanced and aware than "the best film in the saga". Which is impossible to tell yet (it's unfinished), and may be impossible to tell anyway. 35 years later we are in a different era, and are interested in slightly different things. The real life reason is Lucas didn't originally realize what a great character he had in Vader; he was merely a Flash Gordon style evil henchman, that was to meet his just desserts. Friends pointed out how great Vader was, and suggested that Lucas keep him alive at the end of ANH. 

With the success of ANH, his importance increased. One way to make Vader more central was to make him Luke's dad in ESB. This necessitated an Emperor figure, to make a more cut and dry "villain" for Luke et al to battle against and ultimately defeat.  Oh mySweden scores higher on a development index because it's really Sweden plus the US. The US is just the US and still kicks ass. Agreed. Reading people laying in with boots to victims of the holocaust is not very fun. 

You're dealing with a pretty well informed group here though, I think.  If you think so, please find a racist sub to hang out in over this one. It's not a cool thing to say. The concept of jaywalking was invented by car companies to put blame on pedestrians, not cars, for accidents. Before that it was the other way around. Doesn't the Swiss Guard (Vatican) go back to Roman times, when the strong Swiss tribes protected the Roman Emperor?There's no good sources that's the case. Interesting, I'm going to think on that rather than jump in and argue. There are reports of Lucas looking to other trusted people to help with the script - including Kasdan - as I and II were being so panned. Lots of people said no. Stoppard saying yes very late in the process was a "save", in that context. 

III is generally considered the best of the PT, and the things that are good about it can also generally be seen in Stoppard's work, rather than elsewhere in Lucas'. 

The fu details are not in the above source, but if you hunt around you can find better evidence of his involvement than I can provide from memory here. I think there was reports of a being kicked scene. BB, er, rolls with it. Not only - Indigenous Australians had (and still have) such constellations.

&gt; A constellation used in Aboriginal culture in Australia is the "Emu in the sky", a 'constellation' that is defined by dark nebulas (opaque clouds of dust and gas in outer space) that are visible against the Milky Way background, rather than by stars. The Emu's head is the very dark Coalsack nebula, next to the Southern Cross; the body and legs are other dark clouds trailing out along the Milky Way to Scorpius... On autumn evenings, the emu in the sky stands directly over her portrait (on rocks north of Sydney), just at the time when it's time to gather emu eggs.

Aboriginal culture in Australia is particularly old - 40,000\u201380,000 years (compared to the Lascaux cave paintings produced 20,000 years ago). Indeed, Australian aboriginals and related Oceanic peoples may have even brought their astrology to South America.

Edit: As this has been challenged, note I said MAY. Genetic (see the nature study), archaeological (paintings possible before Asiatic settlement), and anthropological studies have been put forward with Aboriginal to Amazonian settlement as a possibility.

http://www.nature.com/nature/journal/v525/n7567/full/nature14895.html

http://www.nature.com/nature/journal/v525/n7567/full/nature14895.htmlVader/ father has been debunked, I think... he was originally just a villain with a nasty "death invader" sounding name.Even if True it doesn't matter - creating your own is many times more highly regarded. 

I'm guessing that's partly why there's no Spielberg, Tarantino, Lynch, George Miller et al *Star Wars* movies.Tweety source: https://twitter.com/rianjohnson/status/653443417788317696Wow. I never thought through how close it was. 

Kind of like that old infantry tactic of lines of soldiers all in different stages of firing and reloading.

http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-OXOXjScEkQU/Un50r3rdepI/AAAAAAAAAv8/jxbVXPADK0A/s1600/French+Fire+By+Ranks+Diagram.jpgPost-abbott for 3 weeks :/http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/sci/tech/430944.stmGenetic, archaeological, and anthropological evidence suggests at least a good chance South America was settled before Asiatic tribes from the North.

http://www.news.com.au/technology/science/genetic-study-challenges-americas-settlement-theories-by-linking-amazonians-and-australasians/story-fnjwl2dr-1227452095278Star Wars sure attracts the kidsYes, Cameron and Scott seem to have a competitive thing going onIslands FTWWeird thing to say. Australians are very pro immigration - #3 highest per capita intake in the world.More than half Australians have at least one immigrant parent... about one in three are immigrants themselves (loads from the UK). 

So yes, not really such a thing as Australia outside of immigration.I've thought about something similar, but put it down to fashion, more than JJ. Old films often used wider shots, and were slower - contemporary films are often in your face and much faster.

I can imagine Disney (and even Lucas, in the PT) would see it as a bad broad audience decision to have a slower, more spacious Star Wars film like in the 1970s... like it was too retro or boring or something (even though I'd prefer it).

I see it a bit similarly to the "snap zoom" effect that was added to the Falcon entering the downed Destroyer (that was taken out after negative fan reaction). Perhaps it's a subtler version you're talking about.Right, me too. IMHO we're going to see a more classic cinematic style on VIII. Rian's super conscious about those sorts of details (from his past films, but also the films he's showing his crew). What drives me nuts is folks saying Australia is dangerous (animal rubbish). It's so super safe, it's hard to express.Yes, there are, because they are humans. Go hang out in the theatre, film, dance, art or the music scene. Visit the Maldives or certain towns in Indonesia. Go to writers' week and hear a talk from a young Muslim author. 

That's the thing about generalizations, they simultaneously insult the subjects, and the person making them. No, not at all! Forgive me if you thought that. It was meant to show how stupid your comment was. I had no idea you had personality issues. My apologies. Yes, I like him a lot. The right mix of talent, modesty and generosity. It can't be easy to maintain all that with managing something as huge as SW. Oh man. Wrong sub/ person to say that to. Oh really? That's some deep level intel! Do you have a source, I'd love to read more. There will probably be a bit of that. I'm hoping the storyboard artists, cinematographers, editors, SFX people etc have been told "make it look like the original films" that that will be mitigated. 

I think that Abrams' skills (casting, the practical effects stuff, passion for the genre) still make him the ideal person for the job, even more than the original creator, which is really saying something. I'm predicting it to be darker than others are thinking, as JJ loves ESB too. And it will be interesting to see what the others take and reject from his film with their own. 
Thanks for your very generous answer! I really appreciate it.

&gt; Future TEFLs need academic knowledge. They do not only need to know how to do something, they also must know WHY it should be this way.

I'm a native speaker, and I definitely don't have academic knowledge about my language. I'm guessing - and hoping - this is in the course notes, though. 

&gt; Future TEFLs also should be able to stand before the audience, have enough confidence in their skill to avoid stuttering

I can speak to this point! I was a nervous student, who became a teacher, and was worried about this. The strangest thing happened though.. *on the first day* of teaching, my nerves went away. There's something about being supposed to be up there in that role that makes all the difference.

&gt; You should know how to work with problematic students without slowing down the progress of faster students.

This is also something I learnt on the job too... I'm not sure any of us can be experts until we have practice?
Uh-oh, my troll is broken :(Of course, people are being thrown off roofs, or made to have sex changes, for it - whilst there is a rampant culture (in some muslim societies) of having sex with underage men.

But saying "I don't like Islam because I'm a gay" is straight up response to bigotry with bigotry. Moderate and LGBT muslims (there are even at least five openly gay imams) need our support.
If he had said "I don't like Judaism because I'm a gay", I definitely would have brought up Christianity. The latter is the blatantly obvious problem in the largest religious community that we're probably both writing from.Nice job!

Even more Beatles, somehow, than the original.That was great, thanks!

I liked the Rey stuff also. That's funny, the only kids I know who were traumatized by their foster parents went to fundamentalist ChristiansI read he invaded Britain, but the invasion consisted only of sailing there, marching around a bit, collecting seashells (as evidence), declaring victory, and then going home. 

Bringing seashells back to Rome and declaring victory over nothing was embellished into the story we have in the TIL. In the UK version though they had unlimited healthcare.Even Iraq managed universal healthcare in the 70s.https://www.reddit.com/r/ShitAmericansSay/comments/3ntfvq/this_sub_sucks/cvr356h

Even later on board than Sir David Attenborough!&gt; You're extremely statistically unlikely to get murdered anywhere

You're statistically 5 times more likely to get murdered in the US than most of Europe. Iraq is only 8 times higher and it's a war zone.Because they expected it to be continually amended according to new knowledge and conditionsLeaving out the difference in laws (and the almost religious US gun culture) higher European gun owning countries Finland, Sweden and Switzerland have a disproportionately high amount of gun deaths

Chart:

http://4.bp.blogspot.com/-W9LkhCs6ib4/Vhi6mB06y9I/AAAAAAAAIn0/4KoXL5iNehE/s640/imrs.php.jpgIf you leave out our worst parts not theirs, we're actually the best!This is all really useful for me to think about now, thanks so much.38 Australians were just having a holiday too. But thanks for your message - it's really hopeful.you're my red team! thanks also

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Red_teamReplaced dumb gun law reference with dumb healthcare reference - thanks.It's definitely *not* an academic journal, which we take as critical, independent peer review. It is (in their own words) "student-edited... the nation\u2019s leading forum for conservative and libertarian legal scholarship." i.e., a young Republican place to post their own essays.

The pro-gun lobby has been making "independent research" websites for years (whilst stopping *actual* independent government research). This is another case of muddied waters to protect the status quo.Both sides of government (Julia Gillard, Malcolm Turnbull and John Howard) have long wanted an Emissions Trading Scheme... modelled to be the cheapest way to bring down emissions.

A few years of Carbon Taxes was the independents' condition for forming government, mercilessly and politically exploited by Abbott.You are aware that other countries have crime, drug trades, and better and worse suburbs or cities involved with their statistics? 

It's intellectually dishonest to say "our problem is just these areas", and remove them from your stats, but leave other countries' equivalent worst areas in their stats. 

If we are discussing which is the driest country, we can't conveniently leave out Arizona and California and call ourself wet. 
I'm saying America needs to fix its gun violence problem, Estonia has to fix its (I assume) alcohol fueled violence problem, Iraq has to fix its car bomb problem.

You'd have to have severe tunnel vision to look at that chart and admit America doesn't have a gun violence problem. Greater inequality is not an opportunity to remove the worst half from one's statistics. 

"Look like those European countries" is a misnomer, because each European country has diverse rates. The UK doesn't get to remove Glasgow and Belfast, for instance.

http://i.dailymail.co.uk/i/pix/2013/04/24/article-2313942-1974CEA5000005DC-275_634x635.jpgYou keep on using that word. I do not think it means what you think it means. So basically eating food is the most enjoyable thing? I can do that on land though... I guess I don't get the "boat with a lot of people" part.Gone three months ago, thank the PopeThink of a country like a private business. In the same way, we can do whatever we like. NoDifferent issue. You can stop foreigners from getting a visa for any issue you like. Citizens don't need a visa. Change the issue to Jews and you can see it's straight up incitement to violence. This will change what millions of people buy, so it's a good thing.

&gt; "You could have this car, which you can drive anywhere for a while, and then be practically useless, with no resale value."

&gt; "Or you could have this car, which will go anywhere."

People think their cars will go forever, and in some cases that's almost True. 
Unborn children look freaky when they're bornThink of the accelerationThey're starting now - all BMWs will have electric engines within 10 years. The party about the anniversary of the law! Can't wait. You'll be able to leave the city and drive it around the country for a day each year. If not, I couldn't care less, look at them in a museum like the old tractors, clothing and kitchen appliances. Electric cars are starting now, so there will be no sudden shift. BMW is already shifting to electric cars, and a tiny gas generator for range extension - no limit. It's called electricity. BMW is already changing over. No, they'll extend it.A hot mealHybrids are as rangeless as petrol cars. Worse than that, they actively destroyed public transport networks in many cities. You can now get electric cars that - if they run out of range - can get more electricity from a small little gas powered generator. Most people will rarely need it, but it helps people to deal with an old psychological fear. 

Range is no longer a problem. Somalia has great freedom! Less so the cities that have returned to peace. But there are some areas torn apart by civil war where you can basically do what you want. And ironically he's a very conservative "abortions are evil" Catholic. 

Downvote this post and don't give the guy any more publicity, as it's all he's after. Start saving and go next year! If you rent your place out, it can be no more expensive than staying home. They both don't make sense. The US has more right wing terrorists than Muslim terrorists.You have a higher murder rate than many African countries, what are you talking aboutTo be fair, us Australians do get "it's so dangerous in Australia!" every time the country is mentioned. A little like your bear perception. Not at all. BMWs have gas powered generators, that charge if you ever get low (99% of the time no need)That was a collaborative effort 70 years ago. 

If anything that should happen for Elon Musk, or maybe French people (foreign policy), or German people (renewable energy). Enjoy never seeing anything over a few hundred years oldIt's what the first Star Wars did, and perhaps the best analogy for what makes the Mad Max series work so well. Plenty of American films are shot, directed or starring Australians. But then you have something about "feels like", so I'm not really sure what you're arguing.  AFI awardsIt's as good as the hype. Re-energizes a genre which has become predictable and dull in the cookie-cutter Marvel era. Agreed, but he has his very own made up world and franchise that is schooling the *Star Wars* people, so why not focus on that? 

Seeing Lucas do a Mad Max, and Miller doing a Star Wars, would have been fun for viewers, though. Woody Allen is very talented too, you know. Probably not. Plenty of people didn't like The Shining, 2001, A New Hope, et cetera. I'm disappointed there's no joke about dangerous animals yet myself /sDriving in a curvy line clearly makes for a better movieWatIs it very difficult now to consider reading some intelligent reviews from major publications?

They even put them all on one page now for you on Rotten Tomatoes. Try the critics' reviews for some informed opinion. You're basically trawling lowest common denominator stuff. It's usually the normal Oscars tbhExpositional dialogue is a *mistake* in movies. Most leading writers and directors try to eliminate it wherever possible. Electric engine, electric for 99%-100% of use. 

Generator for assuaging irrational fears.  Rubbish. It's a small population with even smaller promotional budgets. Try seeing 4-5 Australian films on the big screen to change your mind. The new Macbeth looks amazing, for instance. It was too green in the Australian desert that year. NBD, honestly. So you're basically saying because your film knowledge is limited to mainstream advertising they should stop funding film. There is a problem here, but it's not the content. Too long, didn't readIt's been rated in different countries, employees have transported and screened it for people. Plenty of possibilities. I just read that. I still find it unlikely they're not showing the movie to anyone a week out from release. Reddit would have us believe 12 people have seen it - I'd guess it'd be more like a few hundred.I think I just discovered the bottom of the internet^ Doesn't make much senseNo, that army is now ISIS. This is the new Shia armyThe 29 out of 30 people who knew it was a joke loved himSame way as they are now. Germany has already had renewable peaks of 78%, and it's more accurate to think of new technologies "doubling" than increasing in a linear way. Trump isn't winning, he's losing publicly

Edit: Auto-moderator tells me that's too brief. Trump is firing up the most extreme 25% of Republicans, and getting a lot of airtime, but he's turning off the more moderate 75%. 

It's the reason you don't see most of the other candidates jump into the pigpen with him - they actually want to win the nomination, and not just be on the news for awhile. God yeah. But what you choose is interesting, too. Such a great job, and great generosity in walking us through it, too. 

When you say re-track the bar if singing is out, what does that mean exactly? Sing a couple of words again and patch them in? Cut a section and shift it over?

And can I ask you how you learnt to sing in key? Did you correct your vocals, is it genes, or is there some trick you learnt?

I've always read about how "terrible" and "unlistenable" Elliott's early vocals were, but I've always found them great. idk anything about Elliott's biological father, but I just read someone's theory that he's referring to him, and Elliott's own heroin track marks, in the line

&gt; You aught to be proud that I'm getting good marks

*So brutal*The story of the Buddha taking the middle way in relation to eating food is directly applicable to our own modern lives. We need enough financial resources so that we can focus on our practice, but not really much more. 

It can also apply to *how* we earn that money. We should try to do something that both suits our nature and interests, and helps others. Trying to only please others, or only have a holiday for ourselves, is too extreme. 

Perhaps calculate what the "middle way" means to you. Let's look around... Hey! It's a rusted oil can. And some casual racism. They have until 2050 to work it out. The generators are more to assuage fears, I'm sure we won't need them by then. Thanks man! Awesome all round advice. Both of those are really helpful"OK Mark and Harrison, you're in the Falcoln, and you notice something's wrong. Show me how you'd react."

No more Siths, Darths, Mitiochlorians, Trade Federations, or any of that junk will ever be seen again. Kids have always been susceptible to really dumb - and even evil - stuff. It depends to a large part what's current. 

Thirty years ago kids were falling into neo-nazi crowds, and jumping on innocent shopkeepers' heads (see the movie Romper Stomper for what that was like). Or it's school shootings in the US, or West German kids playing Communists fifty years ago, shooting industrialists. Japanese schoolgirls had an epidemic of jumping into volcanos. 

Check out "tipping point" for some really dark stuff that teenagers have gotten into, and some of the ways societies have managed to stamp it out and stop spreading (almost like a virus). Malcolm Gladwell in the New Yorker recently did an update about this phenomena. Is that a kind of middle class wine?Often they're buying guns for their kids, even taking them to target practice. Lobbyists wouldn't stand a chance then, right? And there'd be no fossil fuel ads on the TV, they'd be a waste of money because people would be just as likely to make up their own mind. Haha. And what's the same dollar figures on fossil fuel companies, and right wing climate change deniers, from 2009-2015?Australia's tighter regulations on these kinds of drugs have been dismissed as "anti freedom", yet they live 4 years longer partly because of it. 

I swear more stupid stuff has been done under the cover of "freedom" than any other word. It's lack of single payer. When checkups and treating chronic conditions is without extra charge, you see drastically better results. Australia's average lifespan is 83 versus 79. Many countries spend more, per capita. Switzerland for one. How is Alzheimer's preventable?I had non existence before I was born. 

It was *meh*. Lol. Just getting everyone's healthcare up to some other nations' current standards will bring average lifespans up 3-4 years alone - no new tech required. Sending you a PMSuicide and painkiller addictions are very good indicators of poor healthcare - especially chronic conditions and mental healthcare costs. Seeing a radicalized 15 year old shot someone at a police station there recently, I doubt it. Come on and answerThere's old white guys watching Fox News down here! Hey fellasWould you or anyone else be able to paraphrase or ELI5 this answer?What city are you in? I'm sure there is a center nearby. If you don't feel comfortable posting it here, check out the centers on FPMT.orgSome of these concepts predate Buddhism. In that case one can imagine that things were confirmed, rather than invented.It looks like there's a study group on Mondays that also do group meditation - they seem like a nice group from another interview I read

http://uufs.net/activities/buddhist-study-group/

You could also ask them what was around. MD, of course, has a great range, and I'm quite jealous! Maybe see which one is closest to you?

http://www.buddhanet.info/wbd/province.php?province_id=41Haha. Good old RogerThe answer, of course, is fossil fuel companies are spending billions of dollars to convince us that climate change won't be that bad, to continue our public subsidies to them, and to continue letting us pay for their pollution. 

$20 million a year (donated by everyday people) to try to undo that kind of propaganda is a drop in the ocean, but better than nothing I guess. Non Brit here that has travelled there lots. 

Every now and again something weird pops up (like if you go to someone's place and make you breakfast, there might be one weird thing out of 6 normal things: eggs, bread, bacon, tomato, spinach, some weird sausage). 

But not really different to the US, on the whole. Actually I've ha much weirder food in the USA than the UK (chocolate covered ants, grits). 

The main thing you'll notice is less Mexican, more fish and chips, and some of the best Indian food you'll ever eat. 

Actually the US healthcare tax rate is higher than many countries with single payer healthcare. 

Hence the "free" name - it really is like magic. Actually, both country size, and population size, make no difference in the ability to achieve single payer. 

Australia is approximately the same size as the US. Even without the population to support it, they manage to provide US level healthcare across the whole continent - including free airplanes across the outback if you have an emergency. 

As for population size, tiny New Zealand (4 million), and bigger Germany (60 million) both have great "free" healthcare, despite one being around fifteen times bigger than the other. The US is only five times bigger than Germany and would do just as well. Is there a subreddit for people's ideas they've used for really nice, yet frugal, gift ideas? 

BECAUSE I WOULD SUBSCRIBE TO THAT SO HARD RIGHT NOW :)That was the most inspiring thing I've read in a long time. Go science!

So impressive that I can't see what an equivalent impact would be of AI and quantum computing. Something to make out coffee and run our calendars for us? Medical something or other? I'm curious!What's a quick advantage of the German design over the French one?It's amazing how much cheaper things become over different generations, though - and traditional nuclear power plants aren't free anyway. No. The room it is in will be a peachy 23 degrees. It may make air conditioning as much as it makes heaters. Unless you're talking about the noise and friction of machinery :PAnd we don't need more CO2 gases being produced at the momentIs be excited if I could just make an aquarium that was watertightThe metal walls are still hot enough to produce steam, even if the baby star is a little bit away from the edge. Well, success increases the likelihood of funding. Russell Crowe lives in Sydney, and Harrison Ford just had a big event in Sydney. 

I think they showed 9 minutes to a select group around those activities.Meh. If everything he's written didn't exist I can't say if be all that upset.I don't know. If anyone could keep being oblivious as to what others are saying it would be Lucas.You won't like PP-666 thenGuess who does. 

It's amazing you can't see the mountain but are outraged by the molehill, by the way. The most amazing example of this is Sylvester Stallone, thinking Cop Land is a bad movie. 

In reality it's perhaps his best movie, that just happened to go against type and not make much money. Bruce Willis doing the Kevin Smith movie comes to mind. *Especially* Toy Story 3 - perhaps the most reactionary and homophobic major studio movie of the decade

http://newmacabre.blogspot.com.au/2010/06/homophobia-is-childs-play-in-toy-story.html?m=1

Everything else he's done has been just regular old dissatisfying. 

Arndt - like Lindelof - is a person you don't want *anywhere near* a Star Wars film, IMO. IMHO, yes. 

Cop Land only has 72% critic score on Rotten Tomatoes, and I still think it's the better film. There you go, even better. The problem with fossil fuels (everything we "do" isn't heat per se, which is minuscule compared to the geological processes of the earth and the sun. 

The problem is the creation of gases that stop the sun's energy from returning into space, like a greenhouse. Even if it doubles human activity, the reduction of these gases is therefore an absolutely positive and essential aspect of this technology. Wow dude, you just /r/bestof'd a /r/bestof. I'm going to save this answer to freak people out with, thanks so much!Well done to her, for 

(a) making the first move, and

(b) getting the relationship and house sorted in week 1I know, this changes everything (blocks and re-swipes new people)Agreed. My town just spent the better part of a billion dollars to switch from one pretty good football stadium to a different football stadium. A Tobin Tax could be used to solve a great deal of human problems (climate change, waterborne diseases), with no little negative impact. 

https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Financial_transaction_tax

I'm just glad we're able to do something *without* all that helping us. 

I asked for a quick show of hands, and counted everyone in the mirrorThat's so True. Rian Johnson said he was 100% on point from Day 1 of Looper. I guess he believed in the project. One but he looked pretty smartSo what is OP talking about?I suggest you learn how science works. They don't know how many fish there are in the ocean by counting every fish.

And again, read the research, or at least the introductions. It's estimated that this accounts for around 15% the total number. I hadn't been told this! Thanks so much :)BMW (and with the Volt) solve this with a small gasoline generator to charge the batteries if needed. Although as Tesla shows it's usually not required. 

BMW has already announced it's phasing out all gasoline engines. Read. The. Studies.Good idea. I wish I could do that on my phone app. Someone thinks Google had the first popular digital or online maps, how cute*Indiana Jones silently shook his head at the class, and looked wistfully out the window.*It's a spectrum. No country is completely anarchist or controlled. Europeans will go to their graves much later than Americans though - three to four years later on average. 

With lots of lovely holidays and family time before then, too. I like how Lo-Fi the set looks. Almost like 1970s Doctor Who. Australia became a country in 1901A stick means 10 snokes, which is half a doof, which is little over 3 gramsRiiight. Because you always hear about police searching doctors' and lawyers' briefcases looking for illegal drugs.Same result possible just by friendly answering which platform to use to get to the city, etc etc. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_life_expectancyhave a hill's hoistSerious? This trailer looks as shithouse/ made for TV as the movieAnd Obi-Wan is already a Jedi Knight in the opening crawl and everyone calls them Jedi Knights, so it's hardly a changeThey're boring characters on a boring mission that they don't care aboutEwan Macdonald was greatMy favorite stick in the eyeYou think that's bad? At least it had something real in it

http://www.jeditemplearchives.com/galleries/2011/Review_DroidFactoryCapture/Review_DroidFactoryCapture_stillA.JPGAgreed. The special edition movies already warned us George was clearly not getting quality feedback anymoreYou don't understand this? 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ho16PDZGzDMI think it still looks bad. Kid is the worstPlus, his imagination will be finally free thanks to improvements in technology.

I also hear that shooting on early technology digital is going to age really well.DIY halloween costume made goodYes, but "protagonist" has a meaning, it's not just "the person who has the most screen time"http://www.rowsdowr.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/11/tumblr_lie9wpG7JF1qf7r5lo1_500.gifI knew that conceptually... it's still bizarre to see it said so confidently in an interview. And even to Harrison Ford agree with it.Exactly. And then you still have to drive *back*The First Amendment is more flexible than the Second, got itDid you see that interview when Mark Hamill was recounting how Harrison suggested he get his new lines into Star Wars?

"Don't ask George, just do them. He probably won't notice anyway."Agreed :DGeography knowledge is pretty good in France, I doubt that*Animal Kingdom* would be my recommendation too, really unforgettable. If you like that then *Mystery Road*, tooHistory of Violence and Animal Kingdom - two favorite filmsInteresting, thanks for thatYou were claiming "socialism" (sic - actually most Nordic countries are merely not right wing) was some kind of failed policy. 

I was pointing out one of many obvious examples where that is False. 

People under relatively left or centrist governments in Spain, Andorra, Switzerland, Italy, Cyprus, France, Iceland, Luxembourg, Monaco, Norway, Sweden, Finland, Portugal, Ireland, Malta, Netherlands, United Kingdom, Austria, Germany, Belgium, Slovenia, Denmark all live longer than Americans under the private health system - to say nothing of Australia, Canada, New Zealand, and other developed nations. Your assertion is incorrect. My goodness. Someone has just discovered how seasons work perhapsNo. The prequel films in the 2000s disappointed many fans, and the Sith stuff largely came out of them. The reboot will probably draw mainly from the original three films, whilst creating some new mythology. The Sith didn't even exist in the OT. 

George had come up with the word, I believe, but it had never appeared in the films. It was retconned into the PT. Props for inventing R1 if you did! I haven't seen that before (and very SW)Tony Strong they could call himThis was so cheap though - my shitty little town spent more on a sports stadium. Why aren't we throwing more money at it to speed things up, dammit. I saw "Moon". Good film. Fission is dying out in the West, it's largely unprofitable compared to gas and renewables. Even France is cutting back. Try China, maybe. Not TrueGerman engineering is still one of the best in the world (possibly the best). Cars, solar energy, some defense stuff. I imagine there's German involvement in Airbus I don't know about.Britain: "They're building a better tea kettle?"It's possible, it's an experiment to help track down the best method. Green energy is already on par with nuclear in much of the West. That's pretty cheap.A positive story about a refugee? Reddit is for inciting hatred, silly. I would move to Denmark if I could. It's not so easy. I have no wisdom, as it's always been hard for me, too. Time is the only thing I can think of. I just want to say in sorry to hear it, and look after yourself. Every bird was his mother?I met an openly schizophrenic Western monk in the Tibetan tradition. 

I don't know of he had private support beforehand to cover his medications or not. But this was in Australia though (free healthcare), so I doubt cost would be an issue.lol, it's the opposite of what you think&gt; future energy production possibilities

Fusion is absolutely being pursued for future energy production possibilities!With respect, you're sounding quite click bait-y. If you have something to contribute to the discussion please do.I hate Sith more than Jar JarThey're closing them

http://www.economist.com/news/international/21677243-nuclear-power-emits-no-greenhouse-gases-yet-it-struggling-rich-world-half-death?zid=298&amp;ah=0bc99f9da8f185b2964b6cef412227be?fsrc=scn/tw/te/pe/ed/half-deathThere a loads of billion dollar buildings, too. A guy in India spent a billion dollars just on his own house :/Besides being wrong about his skills as a chef (that others have mentioned), he's amazing at marketing and running a business. 

Ramsay is worth around $118 million, and could probably start a new restaurant that absolutely prints money anywhere there's people. 

I'd be writing everything down into my phone that he told me to do furiously.Lol, that's ridiculous. Life is not a game to see who has the most money.That's nuts. $118 million is more than any one person needs in life. I imagine he also wants some time with his family.I am aware of one thing costing more than another thingThis is a ridiculous conversation. As far as we know, Gordon is supremely happy, and Oliver is battling a fear of sharks. They've both reached the top of their profession. It's a polite way of saying please don't waste people's time. Simply saying your point in the comments would be much appreciated. [deleted] is as close as we usually get to "I've been an idiot, and am embarrassed now to put my name to what I said."Ask her back what the capital of Victoria is. 

(V)False. There are many studies showing a genetic component, including the rise in homosexuality for men with older brothers. Bisexuality is also the norm in women. 

A combination of genetic and environmental factors is a common occurrence for animal and human behaviors. Even if you just look at white people it's stupidly higher than other developed nationsNope. Google the number of deaths attributed to global warming alreadyI'm all for those guys getting thatDoes that include covering healthcare and college debt? Because I think personal wealth in the US is surprisingly low when you take everything into account. I've heard that's partly why Americans go all out with Halloween, Thanksgiving and Christmas. There's much less holidays, so they're packed with costumes, parties and decorations - make them count. 

If you have four days off each year *just for Easter*, it's more like "ah, we'll just take it easy this year. Maybe work on the garden, go to the beach."Actually it's much, much better for workers in most Western countries. Take 3 months exploring Europe or Australasia and see which lifestyle suits you best. 

It's illogical to think we're all automatically born in the best place for us. Lol, it's not just one gender. Mean wealth per person in the US is actually quite low. Wealth is owned by a few, and goes to college repayments, health insurance, etc. No one thinks Americans are lazy. Passive in accepting bad things, maybe.  Too high, but nowhere near the US. Lots more holidays too. Koala and kangaroo plagues are actually more of an issue than the odd rare spider

http://www.theage.com.au/victoria/hundreds-of-starving-cape-otway-koalas-killed-in-secret-culls-20150304-13un49.htmlas someone who writes a quality, one person blog, i find it pretty offensive, imho. we're not all big companies, and less income means less content is produced.

i would love to know if there's a way to block content for those that block my one, solitary ad in my sidebar that keeps the bills paid for.I'm so sorry to hear, one of the toughest things anyone could ever have to go through.

Is it possible to pass over hosting to someone for 100% of the profits? i.e. cover your *costs*, but let someone make money by taking over your duties. My sister does this when she goes away on holiday on short notice.

There are times when we have to just focus on one thing, and it sounds like you could do with as much of a break as possible, and some personal time.

All the bestThanks for this! I'll look into it.

I agree with you - freedom goes both ways, for the publisher and the reader too.I can see the reviews already! "Ugh I found some tissue in the bed NOT a nice surprise". 

But it's a good idea! Something like that with linens would be ideal. I tried chocolates on the pillowcases, but folks just take them off regardless ;)You would have to have either a serious head injury, or a really poor quality education, to think that website is anything other than a rag.Way ahead of you!Both, page views of the ad, and clicks.hmmmmmmmmm

interesting idea!Nopeyou're a pro!&gt; So do you also think it's offensive when someone views the ad but doesn't click it? Or when someone loads up the page, but doesn't look at the add with their eyes?

No, the ad isn't seen at all (page view not counted, OR clicked on out of interest).

&gt; You're not ENTITLED to be paid for your blog, although in a broader sense obviously it's better for creative people to be encouraged.

No one is ENTITLED to be able to read it, either. I should have freedom to show my work to those I want to (folks willing to support it).
"Previously the world's longest reversible one way freeway". Arrows were used to show it could be used to go into the city in the morning, then out of the city at night.

My uncle lobbied for the idea before it was built (I'm sure plenty of other folks also had the idea).Or your kids shot? The victims of gun accidents are rarely predictable or justified.Guns don't kill people, etc.All of the assumptions are problematic (and frankly, a little simplistic). 

(a) There is not a single "free world" that is "led".

(b) There is not a single country that "leads".

There are countries of differing sizes, with a range of political backgrounds, who follow their own self interest - with their allies, and other working relationships.A paywall is different to hiding content from people with adblock.

A paywall slows down readers through requiring being logged in (et cetera).Right. As if when we were a kid we never knew where our parents hid things.Thanks for this!Ha, I have the other thing, then! I knew where

- dad's rifle, bolt, and ammo was (hidden separately for safety)
- dad's playboys were
- the hidden key to the safe was
- the presents stash was
- mum's drugs were
- the candy and chocolate saved for guests was
- the alcohol cabinet key was

and you name it!it was international whiney men day yesterdayNo work from 8pm to 6am!good idea, thanksI am, but it involves a waste of time, that could otherwise result in cheaper rates for guests.

It is also an unnecessary use of environmental resources (water and electricity).no, they can always put someone else in the suit, so they'll keep himimho, it's because scriptwriters know that their most essential ingredient is character arcs - things for their characters to learn, struggles to overcome, and for us to witness inner and outer change. 

(the PT made this mistake - very little arcs for most of the characters - and only very obvious ones for the few that had them.)

having an all-powerful luke at the head of a group would leave very little change over three films. we've already seen a descent of a jedi, and that wasn't all that interesting. this opens up much more OT-like possibilities.not even funny(1) There are no "annoying and intrusive ads", for starters. There is one small, square ad in the sidebar, like this author has: http://kottke.org

(2) My position is simply that I would rather not have readers who I am financially subsidising. A suggestion that they whitelist me to view my content is a fair one.Rubbish. All three work great in Australia. Or the UK. Or France. Or Germany. Or Spain. 

Oh, wait. Every wealthy country can afford and benefit from a good safety net.Great! This is so often (and easily) overlooked. 

What tradition did you try? What was the discussion about? 

I feel like "things we talked about in our sangha" could almost be a continual sticky post... or even its own subreddit. Biological, not simplistically genetic. I'm not an expert but the studies I've read suggest the mother's body changes the hormones and testosterone present during fetal development. 

Which is not to suggest abnormality - you could equally say the mother changes the hormones for *straight* children. It's an American Cold War term, that was always problematically simplistic.Good call. Is there a place we can suggest bots?Hosting costs on a high image site is not nothing. Especially of you want good reliability of service for people, and not simply the cheapest option. 

Your views would probably change if you were a producer. Less "fights" (as separate, choreographed things) is one of my biggest wishes for this Star Wars reboot. Boomerangs are scary IRL. I'd rather face a baseball bat than one (they are sharper and much bigger than the thumbnail implies).There's also a park in the middle of NYC&gt; Bicycles are everywhere and are a far more common mode of transport than cars... yet no one wears helmets

I think the two are related. Not requiring helmets increases the amount of people riding bikes - and lessens cars - so it's a deliberate policy.Aust has *everything* abbrevs.Darwin was bombed more intensely than Pearl HarborHow good is Romania? That was my surprise - I loved it.Nationalism is generally viewed as a bad thing elsewhere. A little like bragging about your bank account.&gt; So, if you want to buy a toaster at midnight, just 'cause...

Lol, I have never had this urge. Australian here, and I had the same experience going to Seoul. It blows away Australia/UK/Germany/USA on the "development" front.

Back in Australia I asked some Koreans what they thought of Australia, and they said "at first we had to get used to how undeveloped it is, but now we love it" (!)Is that just fishing for tips, though?Try Norway!And, conversely, going to other ex-colonies, like India. The brother you didn't know you had.Lol. Yes, the Syrian conflict is one of the most complex that has ever been faced.Wow, different cultural priorities. I'd prefer knowing that everyone is home resting with their partners or families, including the retail staff. I'll use the grill and my tic-tacs can wait.Are these a US biscuit? If so I had no idea. They're pretty much an Australian institution. Most sold per 100,000 people or whatever - sales corrected for population size. Myth, I believe. App was satire. Everything is a source, including your comment or a crazy guy on a bus. It's just a question of how good a source it is. What's that number similar to? Stars in a galaxy, grains of sand on a beach, etc. Solar does surprisingly well at extreme north and south locations. Partly because cooler temperatures makes them more efficient. "Off you go... you're free..."No. Lucas has said every possible answer on this. He even submitted a treatment for VII - IX (that was politely rejected).Er, yes... because that's what a lot of us do on Christmas!

There is a range, of course :)Absolutely! Most Westerners with an interest in Buddhism will have a Christian background somewhere - even if it's a general cultural one. I personally went to Sunday School, was baptized, etc etc. 

One thing that's different about Buddhism is you don't have to "become" Buddhist. You can if you like. But the Dalai Lama suggests Christians use it to become better Christians, etc.  

Take what makes sense and is useful to you. Personally, whenever I visualize something in Buddhism, I use Christian iconography, because it emotionally makes sense to me. 

Welcome, good luck - and don't hesitate to shout out for any more help or questions. There is no serious arguments and the flu is not usually as serious as polio. Actually, terrorism often has reverse effects. Eg. a Palestinian state has been set back decades. It was once seen in Israel's interests. Let me take a wild guess at his views on climate change, universal healthcare, and guns. I agree. He was probably Republican though. Of course you can! Loads of energy at 18! Plan it out well, watch videos and read comprehensive blogs to see if you'll miss out a step or not, don't forget local laws and approvals, and go for it!

Don't forget to document your process for others to follow (your age will be a great selling point, and you could probably earn some money back with blog ads, YouTube ads, donations, plans, etc.)

Good luck. It was great, thanks for posting. The Hitchcock discussion especially. Haha. Mystery!

Surprisingly, Michelle Obama "is a nice person, and people should get off her back". No, you're missing the point. It's saying Tim Tams are more popular to Australians than Oreos are to Americans. 

i.e. Oreos sell more world wide. But Tim Tams have captured a larger section of their country's customers. 

It has implications about why nations choose the foods they do, what makes for successful brand loyalty and advertising, and hence helps marketers, manufacturers, etc. Healthier, and much better for the environment than cows, too. Probably in the top 1000 - 1500 of spoken EnglishNoA solid school education and plenty if international travel will doThe world isn't completely subjective, and people having ignorant views has real world negative consequences.Samurai armor back in the mix - excellentYou've got that the wrong way around, and jumped to offenseGood point!I'd go with (c) your usernameWhite or black, poverty leads to really bad voter turnoutHaha, right? Then go out all night after working and not even think about itNone of those examples hold at allHaha, thanks. Or, you have to really, really put in the Reddit hours to get them ;)I'd go as far as not very well informed. *Maybe* with a high prevalence of anger management issues. 

But definitely not a crazy nut, or likely to blow things up. That's very rare.He has some kind of weirdly strong on screen charisma that stands out in that film, right? You can see why they cast him. Or, you know, someone completely different!Bound?You can't say isolated cases of terrorism "worked" in any of those examples. If anything, they may have provided temporary setbacks and loss of support. Two of those examples were "won" by other means, including conventional and/or guerrilla warfare. The others were losses anyway. No, guerrilla warfare is *not* terrorism. Terrorism involves the deliberate targeting of civilians. Guerrilla warfare is asymmetric warfare on military targets. 

And people weren't showing Mohammed anyway on TV and print, besides a small minority. It is culturally insensitive, so you would not see major outlets doing it (just like you don't see cartoons of Jesus being raped, or whatever).

If anything, the backlash has made more cartoonists depict Mohammed, has led to antagonistic cartoon competitions and Koran burning stunts, etc etc.  Source: I make shit up on a regular basisIt was actually an honorable and religious duty to be involved. I think they've found hidden graffiti behind stone blocks etc to this effect. And more time between Cleopatra and the release of Nevermind than Nevermind and todayWorld War ZemuThere was a great /r/bestof recently with a guy having to look after emus and one fell in a covered swimming pool. Absolutely terrifying and hilarious. Two hands?Me to, only it was someone else doing it, so I can't feel proud. 

Which is handy, because my countrymen do bad shit, too. So cool to imagine. Thanks for that!If you care for people on heroin then criminalization is the worst system. Not only does it make people less likely to seek medical help, it hands over supply to criminals, who get wealthy whilst having little interest in controlling quality and purity. 

An ideal situation would addicts purchase purity tested chemicals, and inject in a safe medical injecting room - surrounded by nurses, social services, and anti addiction outreach.

Not only would it reduce deaths, it would undercut criminals, and reduce crime and policing costs to the community.Let me guess, you have money issues with your ex wife. If you believe in any noun you're just as stupid, IMHOAn orca with a planThanks for this! The point that his "self" is both a cause of his anxiety *and* an illusion is an important one. 

Do you remember those remembrances daily? If so, when and how?If it turns out exactly like Sogyal Rimpoche describes in his 1990s book *The Tibetan Book of Living and Dying*, then (between freak outs) I'll probably think "damn, they were right about this, too!"Wait. You disagree that guaranteed purity and on hand medical care saves lives? Or you think it saves lives but you don't care?

Ditto fighting crime, reducing costs to the community, etc etc. Great! I'll try in your footsteps. 

Do you do anything else before or after practices? Dedications, motivation setting, read other texts, or anything else? And do you find this beneficial?Italian pizzas =\= American pizzas. The most common toppings are likely just oil, tomato, garlic, herbs, and cheese. I made my own wine. It's still impossible to get all the insects out of the grapes before they're crushed. 

There's maybe 100 spiders and insects in each bottle of wine would be my rough estimate. Ok, apologies :)Erm, me?

And that's a bingo. Step 1. Emigrate away from countries where you need to read about getting locked in the trunk of a car. "The five love languages" theory makes better sense. 99% of these posts have nothing to do with zen, TBHSo what is OP talking about?I suggest you learn how science works. They don't know how many fish there are in the ocean by counting every fish.

And again, read the research, or at least the introductions. It's estimated that this accounts for around 15% the total number. I hadn't been told this! Thanks so much :)BMW (and with the Volt) solve this with a small gasoline generator to charge the batteries if needed. Although as Tesla shows it's usually not required. 

BMW has already announced it's phasing out all gasoline engines. Read. The. Studies.Good idea. I wish I could do that on my phone app. Someone thinks Google had the first popular digital or online maps, how cute*Indiana Jones silently shook his head at the class, and looked wistfully out the window.*It's a spectrum. No country is completely anarchist or controlled. Europeans will go to their graves much later than Americans though - three to four years later on average. 

With lots of lovely holidays and family time before then, too. I like how Lo-Fi the set looks. Almost like 1970s Doctor Who. Australia became a country in 1901A stick means 10 snokes, which is half a doof, which is little over 3 gramsRiiight. Because you always hear about police searching doctors' and lawyers' briefcases looking for illegal drugs.Same result possible just by friendly answering which platform to use to get to the city, etc etc. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_life_expectancyhave a hill's hoistSerious? This trailer looks as shithouse/ made for TV as the movieAnd Obi-Wan is already a Jedi Knight in the opening crawl and everyone calls them Jedi Knights, so it's hardly a changeThey're boring characters on a boring mission that they don't care aboutEwan Macdonald was greatMy favorite stick in the eyeYou think that's bad? At least it had something real in it

http://www.jeditemplearchives.com/galleries/2011/Review_DroidFactoryCapture/Review_DroidFactoryCapture_stillA.JPGAgreed. The special edition movies already warned us George was clearly not getting quality feedback anymoreYou don't understand this? 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ho16PDZGzDMI think it still looks bad. Kid is the worstPlus, his imagination will be finally free thanks to improvements in technology.

I also hear that shooting on early technology digital is going to age really well.DIY halloween costume made goodYes, but "protagonist" has a meaning, it's not just "the person who has the most screen time"http://www.rowsdowr.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/11/tumblr_lie9wpG7JF1qf7r5lo1_500.gifI knew that conceptually... it's still bizarre to see it said so confidently in an interview. And even to Harrison Ford agree with it.Exactly. And then you still have to drive *back*The First Amendment is more flexible than the Second, got itDid you see that interview when Mark Hamill was recounting how Harrison suggested he get his new lines into Star Wars?

"Don't ask George, just do them. He probably won't notice anyway."Agreed :DGeography knowledge is pretty good in France, I doubt that*Animal Kingdom* would be my recommendation too, really unforgettable. If you like that then *Mystery Road*, tooHistory of Violence and Animal Kingdom - two favorite filmsInteresting, thanks for thatYou were claiming "socialism" (sic - actually most Nordic countries are merely not right wing) was some kind of failed policy. 

I was pointing out one of many obvious examples where that is False. 

People under relatively left or centrist governments in Spain, Andorra, Switzerland, Italy, Cyprus, France, Iceland, Luxembourg, Monaco, Norway, Sweden, Finland, Portugal, Ireland, Malta, Netherlands, United Kingdom, Austria, Germany, Belgium, Slovenia, Denmark all live longer than Americans under the private health system - to say nothing of Australia, Canada, New Zealand, and other developed nations. Your assertion is incorrect. My goodness. Someone has just discovered how seasons work perhapsNo. The prequel films in the 2000s disappointed many fans, and the Sith stuff largely came out of them. The reboot will probably draw mainly from the original three films, whilst creating some new mythology. The Sith didn't even exist in the OT. 

George had come up with the word, I believe, but it had never appeared in the films. It was retconned into the PT. Props for inventing R1 if you did! I haven't seen that before (and very SW)Tony Strong they could call himThis was so cheap though - my shitty little town spent more on a sports stadium. Why aren't we throwing more money at it to speed things up, dammit. I saw "Moon". Good film. Fission is dying out in the West, it's largely unprofitable compared to gas and renewables. Even France is cutting back. Try China, maybe. Not TrueGerman engineering is still one of the best in the world (possibly the best). Cars, solar energy, some defense stuff. I imagine there's German involvement in Airbus I don't know about.Britain: "They're building a better tea kettle?"It's possible, it's an experiment to help track down the best method. Green energy is already on par with nuclear in much of the West. That's pretty cheap.A positive story about a refugee? Reddit is for inciting hatred, silly. I would move to Denmark if I could. It's not so easy. I have no wisdom, as it's always been hard for me, too. Time is the only thing I can think of. I just want to say in sorry to hear it, and look after yourself. Every bird was his mother?I met an openly schizophrenic Western monk in the Tibetan tradition. 

I don't know of he had private support beforehand to cover his medications or not. But this was in Australia though (free healthcare), so I doubt cost would be an issue.lol, it's the opposite of what you think&gt; future energy production possibilities

Fusion is absolutely being pursued for future energy production possibilities!With respect, you're sounding quite click bait-y. If you have something to contribute to the discussion please do.I hate Sith more than Jar JarThey're closing them

http://www.economist.com/news/international/21677243-nuclear-power-emits-no-greenhouse-gases-yet-it-struggling-rich-world-half-death?zid=298&amp;ah=0bc99f9da8f185b2964b6cef412227be?fsrc=scn/tw/te/pe/ed/half-deathThere a loads of billion dollar buildings, too. A guy in India spent a billion dollars just on his own house :/Besides being wrong about his skills as a chef (that others have mentioned), he's amazing at marketing and running a business. 

Ramsay is worth around $118 million, and could probably start a new restaurant that absolutely prints money anywhere there's people. 

I'd be writing everything down into my phone that he told me to do furiously.Lol, that's ridiculous. Life is not a game to see who has the most money.That's nuts. $118 million is more than any one person needs in life. I imagine he also wants some time with his family.I am aware of one thing costing more than another thingThis is a ridiculous conversation. As far as we know, Gordon is supremely happy, and Oliver is battling a fear of sharks. They've both reached the top of their profession. It's a polite way of saying please don't waste people's time. Simply saying your point in the comments would be much appreciated. [deleted] is as close as we usually get to "I've been an idiot, and am embarrassed now to put my name to what I said."Ask her back what the capital of Victoria is. 

(V)False. There are many studies showing a genetic component, including the rise in homosexuality for men with older brothers. Bisexuality is also the norm in women. 

A combination of genetic and environmental factors is a common occurrence for animal and human behaviors. Even if you just look at white people it's stupidly higher than other developed nationsNope. Google the number of deaths attributed to global warming alreadyI'm all for those guys getting thatDoes that include covering healthcare and college debt? Because I think personal wealth in the US is surprisingly low when you take everything into account. I've heard that's partly why Americans go all out with Halloween, Thanksgiving and Christmas. There's much less holidays, so they're packed with costumes, parties and decorations - make them count. 

If you have four days off each year *just for Easter*, it's more like "ah, we'll just take it easy this year. Maybe work on the garden, go to the beach."Actually it's much, much better for workers in most Western countries. Take 3 months exploring Europe or Australasia and see which lifestyle suits you best. 

It's illogical to think we're all automatically born in the best place for us. Lol, it's not just one gender. Mean wealth per person in the US is actually quite low. Wealth is owned by a few, and goes to college repayments, health insurance, etc. No one thinks Americans are lazy. Passive in accepting bad things, maybe.  Too high, but nowhere near the US. Lots more holidays too. Koala and kangaroo plagues are actually more of an issue than the odd rare spider

http://www.theage.com.au/victoria/hundreds-of-starving-cape-otway-koalas-killed-in-secret-culls-20150304-13un49.htmlas someone who writes a quality, one person blog, i find it pretty offensive, imho. we're not all big companies, and less income means less content is produced.

i would love to know if there's a way to block content for those that block my one, solitary ad in my sidebar that keeps the bills paid for.I'm so sorry to hear, one of the toughest things anyone could ever have to go through.

Is it possible to pass over hosting to someone for 100% of the profits? i.e. cover your *costs*, but let someone make money by taking over your duties. My sister does this when she goes away on holiday on short notice.

There are times when we have to just focus on one thing, and it sounds like you could do with as much of a break as possible, and some personal time.

All the bestThanks for this! I'll look into it.

I agree with you - freedom goes both ways, for the publisher and the reader too.I can see the reviews already! "Ugh I found some tissue in the bed NOT a nice surprise". 

But it's a good idea! Something like that with linens would be ideal. I tried chocolates on the pillowcases, but folks just take them off regardless ;)You would have to have either a serious head injury, or a really poor quality education, to think that website is anything other than a rag.Way ahead of you!Both, page views of the ad, and clicks.hmmmmmmmmm

interesting idea!Nopeyou're a pro!&gt; So do you also think it's offensive when someone views the ad but doesn't click it? Or when someone loads up the page, but doesn't look at the add with their eyes?

No, the ad isn't seen at all (page view not counted, OR clicked on out of interest).

&gt; You're not ENTITLED to be paid for your blog, although in a broader sense obviously it's better for creative people to be encouraged.

No one is ENTITLED to be able to read it, either. I should have freedom to show my work to those I want to (folks willing to support it).
"Previously the world's longest reversible one way freeway". Arrows were used to show it could be used to go into the city in the morning, then out of the city at night.

My uncle lobbied for the idea before it was built (I'm sure plenty of other folks also had the idea).Or your kids shot? The victims of gun accidents are rarely predictable or justified.Guns don't kill people, etc.All of the assumptions are problematic (and frankly, a little simplistic). 

(a) There is not a single "free world" that is "led".

(b) There is not a single country that "leads".

There are countries of differing sizes, with a range of political backgrounds, who follow their own self interest - with their allies, and other working relationships.A paywall is different to hiding content from people with adblock.

A paywall slows down readers through requiring being logged in (et cetera).Right. As if when we were a kid we never knew where our parents hid things.Thanks for this!Ha, I have the other thing, then! I knew where

- dad's rifle, bolt, and ammo was (hidden separately for safety)
- dad's playboys were
- the hidden key to the safe was
- the presents stash was
- mum's drugs were
- the candy and chocolate saved for guests was
- the alcohol cabinet key was

and you name it!it was international whiney men day yesterdayNo work from 8pm to 6am!good idea, thanksI am, but it involves a waste of time, that could otherwise result in cheaper rates for guests.

It is also an unnecessary use of environmental resources (water and electricity).no, they can always put someone else in the suit, so they'll keep himimho, it's because scriptwriters know that their most essential ingredient is character arcs - things for their characters to learn, struggles to overcome, and for us to witness inner and outer change. 

(the PT made this mistake - very little arcs for most of the characters - and only very obvious ones for the few that had them.)

having an all-powerful luke at the head of a group would leave very little change over three films. we've already seen a descent of a jedi, and that wasn't all that interesting. this opens up much more OT-like possibilities.not even funny(1) There are no "annoying and intrusive ads", for starters. There is one small, square ad in the sidebar, like this author has: http://kottke.org

(2) My position is simply that I would rather not have readers who I am financially subsidising. A suggestion that they whitelist me to view my content is a fair one.Rubbish. All three work great in Australia. Or the UK. Or France. Or Germany. Or Spain. 

Oh, wait. Every wealthy country can afford and benefit from a good safety net.Great! This is so often (and easily) overlooked. 

What tradition did you try? What was the discussion about? 

I feel like "things we talked about in our sangha" could almost be a continual sticky post... or even its own subreddit. Biological, not simplistically genetic. I'm not an expert but the studies I've read suggest the mother's body changes the hormones and testosterone present during fetal development. 

Which is not to suggest abnormality - you could equally say the mother changes the hormones for *straight* children. It's an American Cold War term, that was always problematically simplistic.Good call. Is there a place we can suggest bots?Hosting costs on a high image site is not nothing. Especially of you want good reliability of service for people, and not simply the cheapest option. 

Your views would probably change if you were a producer. Less "fights" (as separate, choreographed things) is one of my biggest wishes for this Star Wars reboot. Boomerangs are scary IRL. I'd rather face a baseball bat than one (they are sharper and much bigger than the thumbnail implies).There's also a park in the middle of NYC&gt; Bicycles are everywhere and are a far more common mode of transport than cars... yet no one wears helmets

I think the two are related. Not requiring helmets increases the amount of people riding bikes - and lessens cars - so it's a deliberate policy.Aust has *everything* abbrevs.Darwin was bombed more intensely than Pearl HarborHow good is Romania? That was my surprise - I loved it.Nationalism is generally viewed as a bad thing elsewhere. A little like bragging about your bank account.&gt; So, if you want to buy a toaster at midnight, just 'cause...

Lol, I have never had this urge. Australian here, and I had the same experience going to Seoul. It blows away Australia/UK/Germany/USA on the "development" front.

Back in Australia I asked some Koreans what they thought of Australia, and they said "at first we had to get used to how undeveloped it is, but now we love it" (!)Is that just fishing for tips, though?Try Norway!And, conversely, going to other ex-colonies, like India. The brother you didn't know you had.Lol. Yes, the Syrian conflict is one of the most complex that has ever been faced.Wow, different cultural priorities. I'd prefer knowing that everyone is home resting with their partners or families, including the retail staff. I'll use the grill and my tic-tacs can wait.Are these a US biscuit? If so I had no idea. They're pretty much an Australian institution. Most sold per 100,000 people or whatever - sales corrected for population size. Myth, I believe. App was satire. Everything is a source, including your comment or a crazy guy on a bus. It's just a question of how good a source it is. What's that number similar to? Stars in a galaxy, grains of sand on a beach, etc. Solar does surprisingly well at extreme north and south locations. Partly because cooler temperatures makes them more efficient. "Off you go... you're free..."No. Lucas has said every possible answer on this. He even submitted a treatment for VII - IX (that was politely rejected).Er, yes... because that's what a lot of us do on Christmas!

There is a range, of course :)Absolutely! Most Westerners with an interest in Buddhism will have a Christian background somewhere - even if it's a general cultural one. I personally went to Sunday School, was baptized, etc etc. 

One thing that's different about Buddhism is you don't have to "become" Buddhist. You can if you like. But the Dalai Lama suggests Christians use it to become better Christians, etc.  

Take what makes sense and is useful to you. Personally, whenever I visualize something in Buddhism, I use Christian iconography, because it emotionally makes sense to me. 

Welcome, good luck - and don't hesitate to shout out for any more help or questions. There is no serious arguments and the flu is not usually as serious as polio. Actually, terrorism often has reverse effects. Eg. a Palestinian state has been set back decades. It was once seen in Israel's interests. Let me take a wild guess at his views on climate change, universal healthcare, and guns. I agree. He was probably Republican though. Of course you can! Loads of energy at 18! Plan it out well, watch videos and read comprehensive blogs to see if you'll miss out a step or not, don't forget local laws and approvals, and go for it!

Don't forget to document your process for others to follow (your age will be a great selling point, and you could probably earn some money back with blog ads, YouTube ads, donations, plans, etc.)

Good luck. It was great, thanks for posting. The Hitchcock discussion especially. Haha. Mystery!

Surprisingly, Michelle Obama "is a nice person, and people should get off her back". No, you're missing the point. It's saying Tim Tams are more popular to Australians than Oreos are to Americans. 

i.e. Oreos sell more world wide. But Tim Tams have captured a larger section of their country's customers. 

It has implications about why nations choose the foods they do, what makes for successful brand loyalty and advertising, and hence helps marketers, manufacturers, etc. Healthier, and much better for the environment than cows, too. Probably in the top 1000 - 1500 of spoken EnglishNoA solid school education and plenty if international travel will doThe world isn't completely subjective, and people having ignorant views has real world negative consequences.Samurai armor back in the mix - excellentYou've got that the wrong way around, and jumped to offenseGood point!I'd go with (c) your usernameWhite or black, poverty leads to really bad voter turnoutHaha, right? Then go out all night after working and not even think about itNone of those examples hold at allHaha, thanks. Or, you have to really, really put in the Reddit hours to get them ;)I'd go as far as not very well informed. *Maybe* with a high prevalence of anger management issues. 

But definitely not a crazy nut, or likely to blow things up. That's very rare.He has some kind of weirdly strong on screen charisma that stands out in that film, right? You can see why they cast him. Or, you know, someone completely different!Bound?You can't say isolated cases of terrorism "worked" in any of those examples. If anything, they may have provided temporary setbacks and loss of support. Two of those examples were "won" by other means, including conventional and/or guerrilla warfare. The others were losses anyway. No, guerrilla warfare is *not* terrorism. Terrorism involves the deliberate targeting of civilians. Guerrilla warfare is asymmetric warfare on military targets. 

And people weren't showing Mohammed anyway on TV and print, besides a small minority. It is culturally insensitive, so you would not see major outlets doing it (just like you don't see cartoons of Jesus being raped, or whatever).

If anything, the backlash has made more cartoonists depict Mohammed, has led to antagonistic cartoon competitions and Koran burning stunts, etc etc.  Source: I make shit up on a regular basisIt was actually an honorable and religious duty to be involved. I think they've found hidden graffiti behind stone blocks etc to this effect. And more time between Cleopatra and the release of Nevermind than Nevermind and todayWorld War ZemuThere was a great /r/bestof recently with a guy having to look after emus and one fell in a covered swimming pool. Absolutely terrifying and hilarious. Two hands?Me to, only it was someone else doing it, so I can't feel proud. 

Which is handy, because my countrymen do bad shit, too. So cool to imagine. Thanks for that!If you care for people on heroin then criminalization is the worst system. Not only does it make people less likely to seek medical help, it hands over supply to criminals, who get wealthy whilst having little interest in controlling quality and purity. 

An ideal situation would addicts purchase purity tested chemicals, and inject in a safe medical injecting room - surrounded by nurses, social services, and anti addiction outreach.

Not only would it reduce deaths, it would undercut criminals, and reduce crime and policing costs to the community.Let me guess, you have money issues with your ex wife. If you believe in any noun you're just as stupid, IMHOAn orca with a planThanks for this! The point that his "self" is both a cause of his anxiety *and* an illusion is an important one. 

Do you remember those remembrances daily? If so, when and how?If it turns out exactly like Sogyal Rimpoche describes in his 1990s book *The Tibetan Book of Living and Dying*, then (between freak outs) I'll probably think "damn, they were right about this, too!"Wait. You disagree that guaranteed purity and on hand medical care saves lives? Or you think it saves lives but you don't care?

Ditto fighting crime, reducing costs to the community, etc etc. Great! I'll try in your footsteps. 

Do you do anything else before or after practices? Dedications, motivation setting, read other texts, or anything else? And do you find this beneficial?Italian pizzas =\= American pizzas. The most common toppings are likely just oil, tomato, garlic, herbs, and cheese. I made my own wine. It's still impossible to get all the insects out of the grapes before they're crushed. 

There's maybe 100 spiders and insects in each bottle of wine would be my rough estimate. Ok, apologies :)Erm, me?

And that's a bingo. Step 1. Emigrate away from countries where you need to read about getting locked in the trunk of a car. "The five love languages" theory makes better sense. 99% of these posts have nothing to do with zen, TBHYou've read the script, and know which actor better suits which role?She's not that hot, nor stylish.Happy to go with the obvious, Seven SamuraiPossibly the most unpopular thing to say on /r/movies, but loved the Cohens' The Ladykillers, and found the classic version so old it was almost unwatchable.I tried "best film ever" The Searchers last week. The whole thing seemed messy, overlong, and the characters almost incomprehensible (as in, difficult to judge if they're meant to be likeable, evil, comical, ambiguous, etc.)Upvote for Animal Kingdom, haunting, satisfying film.

And if you like that, even closer to NCFOM is another Australian film, "Mystery Road" (with an excellent Hugo Weaving). We have this in Sydney. Nurses are also on hand with drugs in case of overdoses, too - works well. Lots of wisdom in this! Thanks, and as the kids say, respect. Even if it has happened to you, it's foolish to project your own experience onto others. And if you do it says more about you than the subject of the news story. Delicious word salad, thanksNot True. He was killed due to a loser's desire for fame, and lax gun laws. The Jesus thing was decades earlier. Er, not just on EarthPerfect answerDon't you even Withnail, dude?You're just wrong, dude. Japan has better customer service, and it had nothing to do with the US. Read a little about Japanese history to see where it came from. South and Central American countries have diverse stats, but some *do* have the highest murder rates - outside of war zones - in the world. 

I had a female friend go to Mexico with two friends - one didn't come back (raped and murdered).

To some extent, some fear of *any* new place is normal, that quickly subsides once you're there. 

Ask yourself why you are going, perhaps subconsciously you know there are better suited places for you (eg. SE Asia). If there are good reasons, take common sense safety precautions specific to each country (read the Lonely Planet), and the greatest probability is you'll be fine. Just a heads up. I converted all my income to "passive" income, and hated it. What it leaves you with is administration, like chasing down lost checks, bookkeeping, etc. 

Better than *passive* income is *passion* income, IMHO.

i.e. things you'd like to be doing or learning anyway - and that make you feel like you're making a positive difference to others, or self improvement for yourself. John Lennon - moves to the US - crazy guy gets a gun - shot - unable to survive his injuries. 

George Harrison - stays in the UK - crazy guy can only get a knife - stabbed - able to survive his injuries.Nope. Look at what happened to George Harrison for an example of a crazed fan with a knife. It was much more survivable, and his wife was able to fight him off with everyday objects around her (much less possible with a gun).Vegans don't eat honey, so I would say it's a definite issue for someWell, obviously not. Magnum to the upper body in John's case. Right. Well, I'm a Buddhist, so we're taught insects, cows and humans all want happiness and don't want suffering. Eating one cow between many, versus 1000 insects (plowed up farming vegetables) can be seen as preferable in the Tibetan tradition. 

Which is further complicated by cows being fed corn, for instance. Yes, one or two massive holes straight through his body. 

No way near as survivable as the numerous stab wounds George had to suffer. Username relevantAs someone else mentioned, lots of middle aged Vietnamese Republicans!Even Richard Nixon has got Soul...I like your well thought out theory on bests and their effects!I don't know, but I'm guessing that - unless you're addressed by name - you assume they're referring to some other group. I'm sure if you went to a FPMT.org center they would have some for sale, with the extra good karma of supporting teachings and overseas monksWell saidMay as well go out on a high!FalseMany thanks for doing this! An ideal outreach activity, IMHO!

I have two questions that I hope you'll forgive me if they're too direct. 

\u2022 How do you find the structure of practices, teachings and activities that have been laid out for you? Do you feel like it's "the most efficient" for achieving liberation? Or is there some tension between tradition and modern ideas, and tradition and experimentation?

\u2022 What have the effects been - on your perspectives and understanding - of such an intense program? 

I expect some of the more familiar changes, like being calmer, more accepting, etc. But have there been any deeper or more subtle changes that you have noticed?What practice did you do to reach those results? It's interesting to connect practices and benefitsThanks for this! What practice led to these results?Agreed. You have to be earning a decent amount over your required income to do this however, and I switched when I was just on my required income. Popular, even influential =\= qualityI think there's an end if the world seed bank near there. 

Also freaky underground caves filled with preserved animals that fell through holes in the earth tens of thousands of years ago. Seen the size of some gifs though? Sometimes the video is less :/Police officerLol, well playedNo - really?

Surely you want a well informed military on international affairs? Fox News viewers score worse than watching nothing at all. Not the word I'd useTrust your feelings, PainMatrixYou're assuming they want Russia to "go away and leave us alone", when in reality it's probably more like "come all in and fight us."Well that's about the dumbest thing someone could say in this threadSave it, you're dealing with whatever idiots happen to have an internet connection. Canadian rektBoth matter, and both are possible. A lot of people think it's either/or. Because it can be bothIt is. You get *weaker* outcomes when you choose only from one gender. Actually, bisexuality in women is the norm. Gay males are higher than the figure you have, and chances are - given the right circumstances - you have a little gay in you. They did it to sell tires, not test them, but otherwise correct. I'm serious. If you want the military to be successful, particularly in counterinsurgency, you want them to have *excellent* knowledge about international affairs, for dealing with local populations. 

Eg. The difference between Qatar, UAE and Saudi, or Shia and Sunni alliances, or Pakistan's aims in Afghanistan, etc. 

The last thing you want is people buying into the "all brown people want to kill us because they hate our freedom!" malarkey. If other countries get unlimited healthcare without paying anything out of pocket *within the same healthcare taxes as Americans already pay*, that - relatively speaking - is close enough to be called "getting it for free". There was a nice quote posted yesterday that pointed out homosexuality was extremely well known in Ancient Rome, Greece, and elsewhere. People discussed when it was, and wasn't, allowed (age limits, gay marriage, etc.) 

Yet Jesus said nothing against homosexuality, even given how widespread it was. You could go as far as to say that's indifference or approval. Lots of human studies, too. Such as the link between having older brothers and being gay (presumably since having *more* kids isn't required, but that the existing ones do well is).He seems like an ok guy, but I have no idea why Americans (Canadians?) are obsessed over this terrible painter. PCR = the polymerase chain reaction technique. 

I thought maybe it was a US TV show or video game or something.Partly because if you are a taxpayer and unable to get a good job because you're a female, that sucks. 

And partly because if you subconsciously have a gender bias you choose from a smaller group of people, and get a worse result. 

Programs that hide gender when assessing applicants tend to get better results. Yes, but that's not what this is replacing. The old system is the opposite of choosing on merit - it's choosing on maleness. Where is this mythical "free market healthcare is the best"?

Check out the top 20 countries by life expectancy, for example, and see what the systems are like. No (actually yes, this is already done), but you could argue this is training, happening with official media, not leisure, happening on private laptops, TVs etc. 51% of the electorate is female. The parliament is there to reflect the views and priorities of the voters. 

The opposite isn't "choosing on merit", it's "choosing on maleness", which is a reduction of the pool of talent. Yes, and that can never be the case if it is regularly 80%+ male. It's statistically impossible. The US is perhaps the closest, and it's one of the least efficient systems in the world. You can see how easy it must be for scammers in life, when people so easily fall for basic tricks.Lol. Probably. Yes, but we're so used to the opposite, that we can't see that that's the case there, too. 

Measures like this are only ever meant to be temporary, until that *existing* impediment on merit is removed. Haha, that's so cool.Just because a bias is unconscious, it doesn't mean it's not also artificial. Ok, don't choose any people from wealthy backgrounds. Have a cabinet just from working class backgrounds. Do you think it would govern as well for business?

Or, don't have any people from the West of the country, just have a cabinet full of people from Quebec. Do you think it would govern as well for people from Vancouver?

We all have unique experiences and perspectives from our life's history. Making sure that decisions are made by competing views and opinions leads to better decisions, and is the essence of democracy. 
Is John at the Captain of Galaxy Quest's house? That's a plot twist I didn't see comingThat's for doing this! Record your thoughts watching ESB, please!The two are interrelatedYou're implying that women can't be sexist against women - they absolutely can. Depends if I'm on Reddit or notYou have no ideaPope is at the top of his game at the moment. Beautiful likenesses. HuhHe can't hear you :,(Risk of sex = zeroEvery flash reduces the intensity of the colors a tiny bit, it sucks the life out of them (particularly the blues and greens)Headslap. 

Different era, not "better". He's saying it's Michelangelo, but everyone knows it's the Venus de Milo. 

Boom crash. Mikey likes menNo rabies in Australia. Or large predatory mammals too. Would camp outdoors in Australia over North America any day. Do you do that in a bowl? I'd be interested to know how. 

I buy my own brown paper bags, put some popcorn kernels in (and plenty of air), and scrunch it roughly airtight. Microwave for 1m 20s on high. :)Fat doesn't offset vitamins, but a too fat-heavy diet is bad if you are already overweight and aren't going to exercise it off. 

For starters, those empty calories are usually at the expense of other foods - like fruit and vegetables - with vitamins, minerals, and fibre. He's right, he just said it in an unnecessarily angry way. Thanks for this! Neat photos of a pink and blue one on google images. 

I take it you mean the method is simple, not "simplistic" - although they did fail because he simplistically didn't think the marketing through well enough. I hear he crushed an elephant with one of his opponents houses to show how unsafe they were.  A bit like the Pilgrims weren't looking for freedom, they were looking for the opportunity to be repressive. Being back the Steve Buscemi posts Enough goddam Bob RossReagan, too, tightened gun laws. So talented yet still hasn't won an OscarIt's a baby troll!The story is an image of (the painting would be wider than the house). And it's probably apocryphal.ELI17We were taught at school, it's like an electron is missing from the "last" atom in a chain of atoms. So they all pass their electrons forward, to fill the missing one up. 

That movement of electrons can be used to make heat, light, magnetic fields and hence motors, computers, etc. Spiders kill a greater proportion of Americans than Australians, too. 

Walking in the Australian bush is mainly a few birds, and silence. 

The only animals you'll likely see are kangaroos, at dusk. Maybe a possum or a koala if you're lucky. 

It's quite safe to sleep on the ground, even surrounded by your food. The Australian emergency number is 000. I still wonder why the US has a harder one for kids to remember. Wow. You must have a lid, or do you let them go everywhere?The President takes intelligence briefings daily on them (better than you'll ever read), and has been leading the campaign killing them since he took office. 

But red team good/blue team bad, amirite. From memory it's more like microwaved spam, but all day breakfast has been a failure too for them, apparently. 

Something about only a few people ordering it, and a lot more hassle. Here's an idea: try to offer good value, tasty, healthy fast food, that I can safely eat as much as I want. 

Enough with the copying others, and get-fixed-quick plans.I hate Mosquitos so much. So yeah, best take a tent. Thanks!

I'll call it the Ms Stark method :)Lol. It's nice, and it's an interesting take on John Ford's work. 

But "best scene in cinema" is really not something you should say too often out loud.Stand by, while we prepare to make the jump to hyperbole. That movie merchandise and dressing up as characters is adult behaviorDespite Hollywood's efforts to convince otherwise, dingos are not a danger to adults. 

I have similarly also never seen or heard about a "wild dog" in Australia.  No, per capitaThe spider death rate per 100,000 people is much higher in the US than Australia.

Seriously, there is no spider risk camping in Australia. Nope. Domesticated dogs in suburban USA are much more dangerous than dingos. Very far North, it'd be like camping in Woodstock, NY, and worrying about gators in Florida. Haha, best reply yetAnd what benefit is this overweight person getting from their large amounts of fat? (Or large amounts of sugar?)

The fact is, they will be getting less vitamins, minerals and fibre eating fat over - say - fish or vegetables. They have an interesting personality too. A bit like when you see a strangers' cat in the suburbs. 

You want them to come closer, but unless campers have been feeding them, they are annoyingly distant!

Super rare, too. It would be a very small percentage Australians or tourists who have actually seen them in the wild.Honestly, bring your baby. It's more dangerous for it in the suburbs (regular bees, domesticated horses and dogs like pit bulls are Australia's most dangerous animals).Google image search "bandicoot", a perfect example of an example of a particularly terrifying one. Death by snakes is really, really rare. Probably approximately the same as the US (per capita even). 

The most dangerous Australian animal is the domesticated horse.Death toll = 0. Ever. Lol, a few, but only in their natural habitat. It's a pretty strong one, I think it will be ok. About the same risk as the USA. Ditto USA. There is 0% chance of me dying from a spider bite *anywhere* in Australia. 

Per 100k is a common way of saying exactly what you have said - a per capita figure. More people die from spider bites in the USA than Australia. Either as a raw number, or corrected for population size. Seriously, you should. Much safer, cheaper and more fun than, say, France or Italy (though you should visit those too).I love your country's pastries!Dude, misleading title. Did you read the article?Right. Not everyone who *even live on my street* are good - people are just people. We're talking about pre-packaged popcornHaha. No. In the US you get a $1,000 bill for it thoughWow, one of the best quotes I've read in a while. Thank you. Good adviceSome great advice here, especially helping others. I challenge you to help others in a real way, say a full day every week, and come back in three months and try say you're not feeling better! It honestly short circuits the self introspection, in an amazing way. For some reason, many people don't try it however.

Some other things maybe not mentioned:

\u2022 Fix your fundamentals. Is your house/job/sleep/social life/etc all ok? For me, having all those as "positives" is vital. 

\u2022 If you hear a voice in your head say something helpless, hopeless or negative, imagine a hand or stop sign, and hear the word "no". Like a dog chewing the furniture, your brain will soon get the idea. 

\u2022  Check out http://CureForDepression.org for a nice, non-drug way forward that is best done *with* whatever medications you are proscribed. 

All the best, we feel for you. /u/Buddhism - or however we call the mods! Can we perhaps somehow collate all of this advice when it's done and put it in the sidebar? 

I feel like it's a common enough situation - quite central to why many people first come to Buddhism in the West - and would be really handy for people to have easy access to.  IMHO that's a very sectarian thing to say. Zen could just as equally criticize the other traditions as being "Un Buddhist". 

Diversity is a good thing.That's beautiful. 

Food waste, generally, is terrible, considering all of the insects and other animals that die even to produce our grains and vegetables. Get to know some respected teachers, and even just long term practitioners, in person. That's probably all the "proof" a person might need. Hi Matt,

I'd suggest you start by visiting your local Tibetan centers, attending classes, and getting to know the people there. This will help you find out if the school is the right one for you. 

Look up on http://FPMT.org and http://Rigpa.org for the nearest Toronto ones. 

Best of luck!Haha. I hope he got the girl thoughWelcome to Reddit, where everything's made up and the points don't matterI agree, it would encourage sectarianism to answer your question phrased like that. 

But to phrase it positively, if you follow Zen you could point to the efficiency of it as a means to enlightenment, and its reduced risk of being caught up in temporary, ultimately unimportant mental states and theory. Both are the essence of the Buddha's teachings. That makes no sense. 

Please don't answer.$2 a week, or fortnight, and you're covered if you're employed, unemployed, rich or poor?

That's pretty good - only $2 a fortnight more than under a single payer system.Great. 

We could look through for the best thread, and link to that. Or we could add the suggestions from a bunch into a wiki?No, we're thinking "there sure are a lot of douches on Reddit"If you haven't been to film school, those reviews are a perfect "film school in a clip", particularly the first one. It's hard to overestimate how clearly and efficiently they describe the essentials of making a good film. I like the pizza rolls. The misogyny I skip, although it's nice to see her get her revenge/watch Star Wars with him. Joke, but yeahRight, but there will always be idiots. It's a fool's errand to try to convince everyone of something. The Tibetan groups do the worldwide network thing really well. They're really welcoming too, with their libraries, sitting areas, and beginner to advanced programs. There will usually be someone interesting to ask any questions to, too. 

Enjoy!Great!

Do you have to pay extra for your "regular insurance", or is that free?I think it's because cultures were objectively diverse, and everyone could see that. But we had a common sense instinct that - beyond this - we were all pretty similar. We'd get small pieces of evidence of this all the time. That confidence drove us forward and led us to put effort in. 

Now we objectively look similar, and multiculturalism is the default. But the nagging feeling is that inside we're different. Fear replaces hope. Now we see evidence of difference, say in the news, that again speaks to our nagging suspicion. 

Both of these are responses to us being basically the same, and a little bit different. 

We've also gone to the right in the media, and the wealthy have much less need for low wage workers. That's nuts. You know you're paying for that - and everyone else on your insurance's inflated prices - through your premiums?He does have a remarkable control over the tone and content of his newspapers. He set the low-bar template, it's successful, and he makes sure it's maintained.I visited the site after maybe a 3 year break. So many boob/sex related stories!Just your downvote would sufficeThanks for your thoughts OhioIt would be worseTaylor Swift is all woman alsoIt's on his website - BenCarson.comWhat are they elsewhere?I seriously doubt it - surely it's Chinese. Lol. 

Unfortunately, I'm talking to you from the real world, where the US is currently at war on several fronts against IS, AQ, and the Taliban.Neil Young. Next!It's all downhill once you leave Hungary for pastries! ;)SPACE CAMP. DO. YOU. SPEAK. IT. Australian in Australia. Amazed I've actually been to that cinema you're talking about. How much of a difference did you feel you noticed?

I figure I'm immersed in the film or I'm not, so..."What did you think of the QT film?"

"The dialogue was a bit amateurish"

- no two people everTry Mystery Road. Slower but a nice payoff in the end. Exactly what I think. Unfortunately that's not what we've had for the past 200 years. The angry way you talk about it maybeUsername irrelevant This doesn't happen in Australia because there's not a likelihood that the person the police has on the ground has a gun. Guns, thenBrickI don't? 

Whenever I do I always think "a formula film rebooted for profits", and slightly regret spending the ticket price. Better than "A New Hope"It's angst for kids who are new to angst to enjoyMarwencolI assume the white haired one is Craig, and it must be Lazenby because he mentions one film - but it's impossible to recognize any likenesses. Transformers is probably better than the prequels, because whilst bad, we don't have that much invested in them. I changed my mind after watching his two films. As problematic as the scripts were, the tone was the closest match to ROTJ as I could imagine. 

BUT goddam they have to get someone amazing and non generic to do the script. All of his films have been problematic, IMHO. George Miller, Steven Spielberg, James Cameron, Ridley Scott, Duncan JonesGWTW is a terribly dated film. The drama is now funny and vice versa.A few rules I have:

It has to have over 85 on rotten tomatoes (critics), unless a rare exception (especially bad, etc.)

Movies other directors have found influential, or recommend on twitter, etc. 

Watch upbeat ones alone, and draining or tense ones with others. Not really, There's so many above that to get through, and it's my go-to if I'll come away thinking it was worth it. 

What did I miss?What was it about the direction (not script) that you didn't like?This is a relatively common, fair and neat way to reduce traffic in pedestrian zones. 

I wouldn't be surprised if other major capitals, like London and Paris, have at times used this. Qantas is fatality free in the modern jet era, i.e. since World War Two, which is remarkable. 

In the 1940s there wasn't really a distinction between Qantas and the Australian Air Force (two were shot down in active duty).

https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Qantas_fatal_accidentsI don't know how that works though. Are you covered if you lose your job? What happens if you can't pay for a few months or years?Yup, haven't seen any of those! I figure each one I watch knocks out something higher. But I'll check out the reviews. Thanks!Attack from the sunWow. I can't think of a more beautiful Star Wars shot since *Empire Strikes Back*. This is the best Star Wars thing I've seen since the original trilogy, I think. Or allies' planes. It's long been a dogfighting tactic to attack from the sun so you can't be seen. /sThanks!

/s thanks!

Aw, crapI disagree. R2 and C3 unrealistically moving through sand dunes, snow and forests has bugged me since the 1980s. 

I imagine if you were being chased by the Empire it would be even more annoying!Agreed. It's both in keeping with the world, and a development. 

Ideal, in fact. The first shot is one for the ages, but I like the second a lot, too. 

Cropped like that it has a Jabba's palace from ROTJ kind of scale and feel to it.I'm impressed there's so many already, actually. I'm still a hater, since the traditional Japanese (not European medieval) influence on Star Wars is my favorite thing :/Sith are gone...Somewhere it was said it's the weapon you have when you're dirt poor, the cheapest thing you can have. 

Although she has a pretty neat hover thing and robot, but whatever. Really? It went right through his arm in ROTJ. That would be the parts I'd want protected, IMHOIt is a little Space ObamaIs it though?Should I watch it or not, do you think?It's gonna be greatI've heard that one :(Ok, that's cool. Glad that's sorted for you. 

It sounds like it's a not insignificant amount though - which just seems a waste, as most consTrued don't have to pay that, and we pay approximately the same amount of healthcare taxes as you. Ok, this is an interesting topic. 

Can you give me an example? That wouldn't be something that he was locked into with the script?Lol, alrightHuntsville! You guys have some big pine trees down there (and rockets)Ah please do! It's pretty amazing how accessible it is in the west. Try to do that with, say, Taoism is impossible. 

Have funI think it works out still, because:

- "takers" are still a drain on the economy, either way

- it's much more efficient (the government is just basically a huge insurance pool, so there's economies of scale)

- for some reason it pushes costs down, not up. Someone described putting out a tender for 6 million artificial hips, not 6,000. Businesses drive down costs and drive up quality to win such a valuable contract. 

- Efficiency benefits with everyone covered. Folks can change employment without thinking twice, healthy people without debt can get out of poverty easier, and but more products, etc. Wow. Ok, that does sound great :)So you exclusively use French in France, German in Germany, Norwegian in Norway, etc.?I'd like to see how long this woman could last on her holiday in Paris without speaking any English. Otherwise, you know, glass to her non-French face.This one is going to be beautiful on the big screen. One to see at the cinema, IMHO. Unless you're making a *Grease* reference, then no. I predict wear bad sunglasses.Doofuses. So they shoot abroad and profits go overseas. Great campaign. Great, encouraging story, and 100% negative comments. Stay classy, Reddit. The London Ripper tours were really interesting on this. 

Apparently methods like OP posted enabled the FBI (in a recent exercise) to pinpoint the likely street - and even possibly house - where "Jack" lived. 

Unfortunately records were so poor that we don't know who lived there, so that's where the investigation ended. But had they been used at the time they likely would have worked. Wouldn't an asylum have pretty good records? You kinda want to know the name of the people you have in your cells. And governments keep records for ages. Interestingly, I think I read somewhere serial killers are a particularly "white" illness. People "enable", or encourage others to go into dark places they otherwise wouldn't (riot theory). I imagine it's more common than you'd think. "Love in the wild, fight in the gym" is still good advice.There's going to be some blood on snow, U guarantee it!You missed the point then. Watch Kurosawa and John Ford, amongst others, to see how it fits into and expands the history of film.That, and the feeling when you're watching of "I've seen this scene. Oh here's that scene", over and over. He also stole that from Scorsese or someone like that, who edited together WWII dogfight footage as a class project everyone loved.  Finn's accent is weirder to me. Even novels have different covers in the UK, USA and Australia. Different cultures want to be associated with slightly different things. Loved those scenes though. Gets a pass. That was George Miller with *Fury Road*, IMHOI thought you said Galaxy Quest for a minute, and there was going to be fighting words ;)You kind if miss the point, then. He doesn't try to be different than other directors - he remixes other directors' work to make something new. The Polish thing always struck me as a little bit too "it had to be a foreigner, no Anglo person would do it" thing... an immigrant probably did it... when just on probabilities and what we know about serial killers now it was more likely a local. 

How many foreigners have gone to the USA or UK since then to be a killer? Or before then? None I can think of. 

That theory also started at the same time London received a massive influx of Polish immigrants, with all the prejudice and stereotyping that that insures. That's so great! Tibetans talk about karma and things like that being a good sign (but also that things take a long time, and when time is ripe another place might "open" for you). 

But I'm glad it worked out for you. Something like 85% of the most valuable things I've heard said in my life have happened at talks like you went to tonight. Nope. Weapons escalate problems. Having only recourse to fisticuffs (and a reliable police force) de-escalates violence.

For instance, there is very clear evidence that women are much more likely to be murdered by their husband or partner if that home has a gun in it.That, and the one with Han Solo with all that floaty CGI shit all over him... which I obviously don't like :PHe lives in LA now, and I'm guessing his family visit a bitThey actually use zebra fish in medical research for their relative similarities to human DNAWhat's with the "hot" bull?What's your point?How did he make phone calls from Ancient Rome?A marginal theory and very unlikelyNo more faux news pleaseIt's *about* a pretentious bunch I mid characters. It doesn't mean it *is* pretentious. Cremaster, greatAndy Warhol's Dracula, or Frankenstein (whichever I saw first)He's an interesting director, so this is the only one in this genre I'd watch. Unless they make a Donkey Kong movie or something. Haha. For once, I'd say watch the new one first. Miller has said they are all "legends" about what happened, so they're not strictly linear. Besides, if Fury Road is still up in a cinema somewhere, you can't beat that. Fury Road

Animal Kingdom

Mad Max 2

Wake In Fright

Dead Calm


I may have followed a theme ;)Sounds great!Seconded, one of my favorite filmsJust wanted to add, it's ultimately the director and perhaps producers' responsibility - if an aspect is not working, it's possible to restart. 

The miscasting in Back to the Future - and restart with Michael J Fox - is a good example. You should really see the three films from the 70s/80s first. It will add to your enjoyment if you do. Second Looper - earthbound sci fi with some really original touchesAnimal Kingdom - like Fight Club, twist as the point of the whole movie. 

I guess Sixth Sense should be in here, too. Nope. Bad reviews yes?Most people vote for whomever the Murdoch press tells them that everyone's voting for this timeSame, same. 

I was surprised when I visited how green it was though :PYou idiot, she calls the police. This is the successful system in every Western developed country - all of which have a murder rate that is a fraction of the USA's. You. Fix. The. Police.

Or is that not possible - yet it's possible to go to the moon, or invade and foot patrol Iraq?No, that's not what Man of the Year means. It's a measure of influence, not morality. Not what it means. Nice try, but your posting history shows your biasThis is not a place to post news stories. Even if they are really great for your anti-immigrant agenda.Interestingly, China is now Australia's #1 source of immigrants, and Australia's immigration rate (and proportion of immigrants in the population) is around double that of the US - one of the highest rates of immigration in the world. Lol. 

"Person of the Year (called Man of the Year until 1999) is an annual issue of the United States news magazine Time that features and profiles a person, group, idea or object that "for better or for worse...has done the most to influence the events of the year".

Despite the magazine's frequent statements to the contrary, the designation is often (spoken of as an award or prize). However, Time magazine points out that controversial figures such as Adolf Hitler (1938), Joseph Stalin (1939 and 1942), Nikita Khrushchev (1957) and Ayatollah Khomeini (1979) have also been granted the title for their impacts."

I suggest you hold off discussing world events until you at least have the basics at home worked out.Dude, it's classy to be able to admit you didn't know something. Thank folks and move on. I think we take around double the rate of asylum seekers as the US, too. But yes, boat arrivals is still shameful. Eat your vegetables, and stop trying to argue why you should just eat ice cream. People still have to be nominated and elected...Bizarre. There are literally tens of thousands of ways to make money and they choose putting large migratory animals in captivity. Lol, this is so wrong it's funnyYou should probably add: "Degree program must be in one of these fields of study: Medicine, Veterinary Medicine, Dentistry, Podiatry, Optometry, Law, Chiropractic Medicine, or Pharmacy."The murder rate in the US is higher than a number of African countries, including Malawi, Senegal and Sierra Leone. He should get some counselingTell OPPrivate zoos yes. Most big zoos are public, and not for profit. Oh ok. I was making a joke about your use of the present tense to refer to a long dead president. 

All good :)I'm straining to think of a more famous geographical fact. The Statue of Liberty is on an island? The Pyramids are in Egypt?That is bizarre you missed it. 

How about all the water around it, with huge tourist boats passing every few minutes?

Or the famous "Left Bank" on one opposite side of the river, and "Right Bank" on the opposite side?

Or, maps?LolTBH, I've never noticed the internet being different anywhere I've been - the USA, UK, or Australia. i.e. in each place you get what you pay for, and prices were roughly comparable. 

The only places I thought were amazing were Romania, Hungary and Korea, with fast free passwordless wifi everywhere.Not sure if you're putting on a comic persona or not, but most of Asia isn't communist (I wouldn't even call China communist any more), and many Asian places have faster and cheaper internet than Australia. South Korea is one of the world's best. The UK is incredibly restrictive. Employers have to show that there is no one *in Europe* that can do your job, or you have to invest (or be paid annually) a very high sum.You might want to read up on the UK requirements a littleAnimal Kingdom. 

Kinda. Sorta. It's complicated. It costs money to train doctors, so if they come in for free that's a bonus.The average American dies years before they would living in other Western nations. Up to four years earlier in some cases. That's all I need to know (the rest is a bonus).I'm not from Canada and don't know what an EMT is. But I can give you a really confident sounding answer, if you want ;)Insert kangaroo as I'm Australian*American, maybe.

Seriously, it's one of the most famous geography facts in the world. At least as famous as Central Park being on Manhattan Island. I just copied and pasted from OP's linkYep. They need lots of them. It's already pretty crowded, with old characters and a whole new bunch. And Lando was originally meant to be a Han Solo substitute, if Ford didn't want to come back. Not just coral reefs either. There's great images of NY using old subway cars. The only thing that stops a bad guy's gun in a lake is a good guy's gun in a lake. Gee, it's gone up since the last politicized posting of this a few hours ago.Username knows what he's talking aboutA majority of the movies filmed in Vancouver were filmed in Vancouver?Lol, no. The UK has requirements that jobs must be sourced from the EU first - Australia has no such system. It pops up as a TIL quite often, maybe search in the sidebar?Films' film is film (until it went digital)60% of TILs seem to say Steve Buscemi was a fireman, and women are evil. It just gets a little tiresome, even if both were True.  I wouldn't say that. 

I did see more of the extreme high end cars on the road in Romania, and the internet is great. But they are both beautiful and developed.Because what?Guess what! Every city has buildings copied from Britain. And Britain has many buildings copied from France, India, Ancient Greece, and Ancient Rome. Let us know what they think!!The recombination of the "best of" film history into one film. George took the coolest aspects of:

- 2001

- Samurai movies

- Westerns

- WWII movies

- Old serials, including Flash Gordon

And other things... using them in a seamless whole. 

In doing this, it was simultaneously (1) completely new feeling, and (2) completely familiar, both at the same time. 

It's the opposite to movies today - even Star Wars movies - where people are copying a known formula. 

In a way, the closest today is something like Quentin Tarantino's project - only Star Wars wraps it all up in an uplifting, family friendly, feel-good package. A perfect recipe for success. Just the fact that no Nazis denied the holocaust is enough IMHO - even if they were on trial for their life.He turned down James Bond because he thought it would be too greedy and confusing for him to be both Wolverine and Bond. 

Along with his charity work, he's a class act, IMHO. He went to Africa on a goodwill mission, and met a poor coffee grower there. So he went back to NYC and started a cafe, to share the profits with the man. Now this guy is quite wealthy, apparently.

Besides the great acting, got to love a guy like that. Fun tip, the writer was brought in to do emergency last minute script work on the third Star Wars prequel, leading many to speculate why that was the "best" and "deepest" of the three. TVtropes.org is great for this sort of thingThe Castle!The best one to come, V! 

VI is also my guilty pleasureGood answer. War is hell. The same could go for any number of Vietnam movies. Animal KingdomNo, this is a common theme in Asian traditions, particularly Taoism (and Zen). 

It reached Lucas mainly through Kurosawa's films. Watch Seven Samurai for a few examples - the village elder who gives out advice from beyond the town limits being just one. Your question could be taken a number of ways:

- *What makes you say this?* 
It's been said by others, in relation to Holocaust denialism. 

- *What makes you believe this because I think it's unTrue?* 
It's True - Nazis involved haggled over the numbers killed (400,000 not 800,000 at one camp, etc.), said they didn't know, or said they were just obeying orders. But none denied there was a systematic program to kill Europe's Jews, Gypsies and other groups. 

- *What makes you believe the reports of this, reported only through historians, journalists, eyewitnesses, lawyers, etc.?* 
Ah yes, good point, how can we truly know anything. We need more female Jedi - great job. There are some nice articles about it online, including comparisons to some of his concerns in theatre appearing in the movie. All of it off the record and uncredited, of course!I ran around Paris once, finding shots in famous movies. The final scene from Frantic is particularly fun to do (Seine, West of the city, around the small Statue of Liberty). Seven Samurai would be perfect, but I don't know if everyone would have the attention span. 

Karate Kid? Avatar? Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels? Any of the Hobbit films and Star Wars prequels. 

More recently Only Lovers Left Alive is on an extended pause - even though he's my equal favorite director. Young Einstein!

Japanese movies have this theme quite often. Seven Samurai (group of rejects does good), Mr Jiro Dreams of Sushi (doco), and Tampopo (woman makes noodles, and possibly the best movie *of all time*)

Other docs: Dig!, Spellbound, American Movie, Marwencol - all beautiful. Even if we leave out the commercial movies, or commercial interference... try making a *good* movie, within a limited timeframe. 

The amount of compromises, unforeseen disasters, and difficulties is immense. Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels - I won't say who hit who!Just go back to the trials themselves, you can read the accused's own defenses. None ever said "you're making this up". 

There are also numerous memoirs by those involved in the process, including prosecutors and defense lawyers, a psychologist, guards, and you can read Albert Speer and other Nazis' letters and writings - often to confidants and family members - during and after the war and prison. 

The British also bugged POW accommodation for captured high ranking Germans, which makes for fascinating reading. I'll check it out! I already have a really fast invoice system on my phone (invoice2go), so that's not quite it. 

It's the pain of writing a preamble email, explaining late or overdue invoices, dealing with excuses, and following everything up. 

One day they may make software to do all this... but I don't think we're there yet!Best in ShowAll of them, except Burton's Batman, 80s Superman and Watchmen. 

The rest are either loveless commercial crap, take something childish much too seriously (Nolan), or are predictable to the point of being a recipe (Marvel). Film not digital. Practical effects also age better than CGI - which is always changing rapidly. Mystery RoadProbably not, no. Inside OutAustralian films often have A Grade actors but very small budgets, which you could call B films by Hollywood standards. 

\u2022 Mel Gibson in Mad Max

\u2022 Hugo Weaving in Mystery Road

\u2022 Jackie Weaver in Animal Kingdom

\u2022 Geoffrey Rush in Shine

\u2022 Nicole Kidman in Dead Calm

etc etc.


With a nice coffee and maybe a visit to some interesting galleries afterwards?Thanks for this!Lol. I guess "it takes all types" is the opposite advice...According to that logic, the US should be the safest Western country. In fact, it's the least safe. "We the people" includes every drug addict, burglar, wife beater, and just plain old angry dude in America. The pacing is bad, but what's worse, IMHO, is Jackson telling us what will happen with every piece of over-acting. 

Bilbo finds a ring, lies about it, and Gandalf gives him a skeptical look? Well I guess that ring's going to be bad... no need to watch more. 

In a tree, surrounded by wolves, blowing lovingly on a butterfly being released? Well I guess some magical creature is going to rescue them... no need to feel any more tension. 

It's a weird disrespect for the audience's intelligence, making them almost the *Star Wars prequels* of Tolkien.  HAN IN THE MO FO SNOW!!Aaaand... he's back alreadyStill about four times higher than similar countries though :(There's an iridescent, semiprecious DINOSAUR SKELETON in Adelaide, Australia. 

Seriously one of my favorite things. That kind of mangles the joke a bit. The largest State by population is just below them, New South Wales (where Sydney is).

Those guys are called "Mexicans" for being South of the Border (well, they were in the 1980s by a few jokers, not so much any more).Almost as rare as another species, the happy lawyer. Serious question: do Americans tip at McDonald's?It's a pliosaur in Adelaide too. Opal buddiesGroan. This was only a big problem to evangelicals post around 1980, when one church leader used it to win a church vote. 

Before then, there was a range of Christian views about when life "began", and the importance of the life of the mother. Oh man, I love the Netherlands. I'd move there in a heartbeat if I were allowed. 

Best at life, maybe?Wow. All of that to learn a little bit of The Middle Way... perhaps the TL;DR or BuddhismYour body surely *doesn't* exist as a separate entity. 

Buy a bag of oranges. Look at the strange oranges. Where did they come from? Who knows. 

Eat them over the week. Now where are the oranges? They *are* your body. They are flushed away partly in the toilet. They are exercised away in the things you did. 

The illusion of a body is no more real than a wave on the sea. Yes, it has a shape, but its substance is constantly moving and being replaced by other things. 

The same is True for your mind, possessions, house, the sun, and everything else you can think of. You disappear from existence much before this. Like - from always!Human life is very precious, because we can realize enlightenment. 

But it's not so clear cut - an ant may accidentally walk around a temple and make good merit. Similarly, a human's life can be full of difficulty so as to never learn, and they can murder or otherwise give themselves terrible negative karma for the future. Not necessarily. You can find advanced and simple teachings in all three. Take the above post's advice and see which center, teacher and group near you fits you best (for now). 

You can't really go wrong, because it's your karma to have the range you have open to you now ;)No one is doing that though, just you and him talking so far. 

And a comment is not an essay prompt. Haha. FunnyOk weird, why is that?

Seems those guys need it more...Don't cooks sometimes get a cut, or tip? 

And aren't they more or less compulsory on most bills, even if service is no better or more involved than at a McDonalds counter?Right. So arming everyone is a pretty messy (and therefore dumb) system. Only because we've reached a chemistry limit on efficiency, and it makes as much sense to do that as anything else. We need the new materials paradigm shifts to come into working prototypes before that changes. Nonsense. That's a sports stadium in a medium sized town, or a convention center in Germany. I love it. Tell is about the secret crappers. Samsung is the same, only they're worth less on resale. Apple products hold their value remarkably well for electrical goods. I'm as far away as is possible from Canada, have never been there, and don't know the difference between a lawyer and an attorney. But I'd say "so-so".Yet they post pictures...They get funnier with each retelling :/I like the passive aggressive angle, and the unoriginal angle. Hard to pick a favorite. I like your forward thinking! Check out /r/IWantOut for general tips. Melbourne is a great city. 

Personally I'd stay in a hostel or couch surf for a few weeks, before looking at apartments in person. You'll have a better idea of what areas you like, and be able to meet people (a share house with your own room is the usual starting point for people while they get established). 

Online ads are on Gumtree.com and RealEstate.com.au, although you might find some expat Americans with rooms on Craigslist (less popular here). 

There are also Australian "backpacker" rental groups on Facebook - I rented one of my favorite rooms in Melbourne off of there. 

Good luck and have fun.Sometimes you have to nip things that happen much too often in the budWhen Europe outlawed slavery, and you guys were ramping it up. 

And then just modified it slightly when it became illegal. Pretty closeRock n Roll was a black only phenomena in the US, widely looked down upon. (String instruments from Europe. Drums originally from Africa).

It took British groups to make Rock n Roll a worldwide thing (including in white America). Groups like The Monkees were invented to try to recreate the British Invasion's success. 

K-Pop is actually a great example of South Korea, not the US or UK, being the current preeminent cultural force in East Asia.

There are interesting stories about unexpected cultural influences like that in France, Nigeria, Russia, Australia and elsewhere. English is my only real language, and I would tell you to fuck off if I saw you walk up to an Italian and start speaking straight off in English in, say, Italy. 

It doesn't take 10 minutes to learn at least "Excuse me, do you speak English?" in the language of whatever country you're visiting. And older parliaments, colleges, banks, buildings and everything else. But yes that too!It's connected to white middle aged men no longer feeling in control of their country and culture, apparently. Great work! Smart yet punk is a perfect mixDon't you have a FM radio show you should be doing?"the word is on the veld that the fire in your hearth is out"It's a good option because you're not locked into one place for too long, and flatmates give you a social base, really nice when you're in a new country. Gradually your new social networks open up new places. 

Good luck, and drop me a PM when you get close... I can let you know the best areas to live in (and what you should pay). Anyway, here's WonderwallAnyway, here's WonderwallChanting something every night before you go to sleep helps.

Lol, just jk. Good luck with school.And a musty smell to prove it!

Love the UK... don't go changing ;)Is that high/good? Sounds like I'd rip through my phone data plan. Funny, but actually Obama got his so that the world could say "THANKS FOR NOT ELECTING ANOTHER BUSH" to America, in a way you could hear over domestic news. Not in Law - you could imagine some unemployed graduates gobbling those up. 

I think Canadians are now wealthier than Americans too, on average. That opens up your kids' options, amongst other things. News Limited columnist?That's True, there's not a separate "name" for black people in the UK, they're just citizens with a different background or skin color. 

There's fascinating Reddit posts about black British people coming to, say, NYC and suddenly race is a big deal, and them describing that experience ("suddenly I'm expected to act 'authentically', non-intellectually, and hang out with my own race", one guy said). 

But I think it's more than you suggest. America's homicide rate is higher than even a number of African countries (Malawi, Sierra Leone, Senegal, and others). Does the US really have less social support than Malawi? I doubt it. 

What it does have is loads of guns, and conspicuous wealth and inequality. Private jets vs unlivable minimum wages. World's best research hospitals versus no healthcare at all. 

I think the only reasonable conclusion you can make is that guns and desperate un-equalness can never work out well. Sure, but you can point to bad environmental lead levels as just another aspect of poverty - along with bad schools, bad employment options, etc etc. 

Three countries with high gun ownership also have the top three deaths by gun rates in the developed Western world - USA, Switzerland and Finland. And the latter don't have major lead or poverty issues. 

IMHO there's too much argument about if it's inequality *or* guns, when it's pretty obvious to anyone without an existing bias that it's both - and effort should be made in both areas simultaneously. I feel like you've saved me a lot of time, thanks!Australians..... all let us rejoice....

FAH WEH... are young... an freh

(I'm not sure that comes across as well on Reddit)I appreciate the thoughtful logic you're putting in to this, by the way. 

One logical error there is you're not just isolating *race*, you're isolating *poverty*, also, in the US figures (since there is generally a very broad racial income difference - whites are overly represented in upper professional levels. Violent crime is a larger burden on lower income neighborhoods).

So to get a good comparison you'd have to isolate off the poorest ~35% of the UK's population also, and their percentage of the homicide rate, and compare to that. I would imagine the UK's murder rate then would be very, very low - much lower than the "US white" rate that you're saying it's currently analogous to. More than half off the UK figure I would guess... possibly two thirds off?

More exactly, I'm not sure how you'd do that, unless there are some race-based UK homicide figures, and the level of racial disadvantage is the same (which I don't believe is severe...). But it might be close enough for an analysis. 

Personally I think it makes sense to see Mexico's problems stemming from the US (US drugs, money, and to some extent guns), as the other way around. So interesting. Wage roulette! I'm sure you get pretty savvy at playing it by living there. Lol. 

I'm not sure I was really doing any of those. It more felt like when you are reading your magazine on the bus and a stranger wants to tell you about their pyramid scheme, or dream, or doctor's appointment. You kind of bat it away with whatever comes to mind and try to get back to what you were reading. 

But I like how you said it. 

Where were we. Something about Tinder?Welcome! 

Thich Nhat Hahn is an excellent suggestion. I like "The Heart of Understanding", but they're all pretty good. The Dalai Lama's books are also pretty accessible. 

Just on the Tibetan Book of the Dead. It's a famous one, but *very* esoteric, and not for 99% of practitioners in the West. See if you can pick up a copy of The Tibetan Book of Living and Dying (similar title) instead, for a modern, more accessible book. 

Personally I started off with a meditation focused book called "Mindfulness in Plain English", and I'd go back in time and do the same, if I had to choose again. 

From Japan, Zen Flesh, Zen Bones is more like a book of light short tales, but it gives a sense of how different Zen is to the others. 

Otherwise, treat yourself gently, and pace yourself. There is no need to convert, tell anyone about it, or deny your Christian upbringing - the important thing is *what can practically help my life now, and in the future*. 

Lastly, see if you can go to a weekly beginner's group near you - Rigpa.org or FTMP.org are excellent. Otherwise it's just like reading recipes, rather than actually eating delicious food. 

Enjoy!Lol, I love it. Why is Zen any more commercial than say Theravada?It's not offensive to me. If Buddhists can't roll with something they really ought to practice more. 

Just FYI though. It's generally considered bad karma for *you* to mix Buddhism and commerce. 

The idea being that thinking of Buddha at death can help you stabilize or your next rebirth be close to Buddhism... but all you'd get is burgers to help you at that critical time. 

But if you don't believe in that, then BB it is. If you want pretty solid Western discussion to cite, the Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy (SEP) is great, generally better than Wikipedia for such matters. 

http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/buddha/#CorTeaWow, five hours... in the deep end! They have beginner classes you know ;)

Every center is different, so I suggest you get there 30 minutes and ask someone behind the desk just what you've asked here. 

People are used to this, and they will know their specific traditions and procedures. 

Good luck!Whilst not disagreeing with the other comments here, there are good essays on the influence of Buddhism on ancient philosophy. Google the last six words in that sentence and see what comes up. 

Buddhist statues have been found as far North as the arctic circle into Viking culture, and there are many links we are yet to understand. 

Indian thought also later found it's way to the West, possibly through Gnosticism - possibly even via the writings of St Thomas himself. IMHO beginners get too hung up on posture, and staying still for the proper time. There are bigger things to worry about, like just learning all the different types of meditation, and getting used to what they're like. 

Remember, it's possible to meditate while you stand up, jump about, stretch and itch! In fact, bringing our mindfulness into everyday life is an essential part of practice. 

If 10 minutes is your limit, that's a better practice than most. Try 10 in the morning, and 10 in the evening. Or try 10 minutes of chanting or walking meditation, then 10 minutes of sitting in a chair. 

Remember you're in the driver's seat, and *your* ideal practice takes your own situation and personality into account. 

Try also making a little half smile when you meditate. Have fun. Yay! Good karma, luck, or just well deserved effort on your part :)

I wish you all the best with it.Seeing we're often praying for our teachers' long life, I think it would be incredibly good karma, and it would mainly help our practice, knowledge and experience deepen. 

But we'd need a good body and health too, as that's an essential part of learning the dharma. "Buddha" is not exactly unknown though...I don't think you got the right takeaway from this storyWelcome to Reddit, aka Germany 1936Mainly American folks reading news headlines and not traveling much. 

So Europe is all "Muslim invasion!!" (not quiet and prosperous).

Australia is all "Snakes and spiders!!" (not urbanized cities).

China is all "Ghost city iPhone nets!!".

etc etc. 

Added to that you've got a few right wingers posting as many scary sounding stories as possible, and it's a nasty mix. Haha! Too good :)University lecturer here. The main flaw with this story is the idea that we'd put in any more assessment time than is strictly necessaryLol. I would say the opposite. There's probably as many teachers saying they had the president in their class as there are supposed pieces of the True cross. "Now you're meeting our enemies today. Don't tell them our secret plans."

"I'm sorry, I cannot lie, it involves..."Yes and noHe made up his law degree on the same printer as his birth certificate did he?

Jokers to the right. Irrelevant reference. But well done for working out the copy/paste combinationWoah, please leave then. Nationalism is for morons.Gawd, that "two equal sides of the story" approach is seriously, really outdated thinking. 

No one believes we should give 50% of the debate to climate change deniers, anti vaxxers, anti-evolutionists, etc. 

A better approach would be to give children materials that promote *informed objectivity*, not *balance*. 

I looked through a couple and the loony view was full of False facts and logical errors, terrible things to give to our children.Wow. So much wrong with this theory. 

WE DON'T HAVE DIRECT DEMOCRACY
We vote on issues, sure, but on the whole we vote for candidates who represent our interests. This is not Ancient Greece where everyone is voting on the price of olive oil, or trade treaties in detail. 

WE HAVE TERM LENGTHS TO ALLOW DIFFICULT DECISIONS
Politicians know unpleasant things need to be done for the good of the country. Typically, pleasant things are done before elections. Unpleasant things far away from them. And that's what term limits have evolved for. 

WE VOTE ON PAST PERFORMANCE AS MUCH AS FUTURE PROMISES
Do most voters know the complex ins and outs of Iranian politics? No. But they know that foreign policy didn't go well under Bush. All the more reason to not vote in "bomb bomb Iran" McCain, and vote in "I didn't vote for Iraq" Obama. 

WE ASK FOR BROAD IMPROVEMENTS, NOT SPECIFIC ONES
Few voters spontaneously call for a goods and service tax, or a free trade agreement. Most vote for broad things, like "improve the economy", and "more jobs". How politicians get there is a job for the public service, policy research, experts, and politicians themselves - but not the public. 

WISDOM OF CROWDS
We do not need to have a crowd of bridge experts to guess the length of a bridge. People naturally guess too long, or two short. Yet together, the averaged crowd vote gets remarkably close - perhaps closer than a single expert. Similarly, a group of geniuses does better with the inclusion of a single idiot in the decision making process. 

Democracy has evolved over a long period, and has overcome Fascism, Communism, technocracies, and other dictatorships - even at war. It is worth stopping to appreciate what an amazing invention it is. Given that this is addressed in the article, it's difficult to conclude that you have read it. And that's addressed in the Canadian, UK, NZ and Australian examples how?There are so-called economists who deny math and science, should we call them economists?

There are historians and scientists who don't follow basic tenets of their profession. 

We can all agree that - at the extremes - labels become less and less useful. I sense an unusual amount of fear for something as trivial as a prequels discussion thread.Thank ChristPretty sure Australian researchers are always doing that, via the CSIRO. That is *not* "keep playing with the numbers until you get the results you want". Weightlifting, swimming, etc also possible. Do you think it's likely True?

Investigating corruption is a sign of strength, not weakness, and you will find the vast majority of stories here are about Western problems, mistakes, and illegality. She's poor with the trunk thing, but my dog definitely does this if I'm upset. Buddha was a historical figure, and claimed no supernatural abilities. The closest contemporary analogy might be psychology. Another weird thing. Certain Indian temples contained Jesus in their pantheon, and one suggestion was that Thomas went south, when other disciples went north. 

Early European missionaries were told "we already know about Jesus". In at least one situation, Europeans burnt down the temple as the work of the devil. 

For some time Tibetans were also thought of as "the lost Catholics" for their similarities to Rome (incense, robes, a Pope like figure, etc.)For a religion, it is remarkably atheistic. If something is contradicted by science, science should win. Everything should be tested, and not taken as dogma. 

When Buddha was dying, it is said his followers asked what they should do with him gone. "Be a lamp unto yourself" was his last words - rely on your own intelligence and effort. Quite remarkable that it wasn't "pray to this", or "have faith in that".Comprehensive histories of Tibet books for stories like that. It might even just be in "Seven Years in Tibet" (a fun book).

But for more philosophical discussions, there is a book a Catholic priest or monk wrote with the Dalai Lama together, talking about what they both believe, and how it's similar. It's called "The Good Heart", or "A Good Heart", and really good!

Another early Catholic with an interest in this area was called Thomas Merton. Oh no, that sucks. I hate hearing about injustice like that. 

It's not something "extra" to be a good waiter or waitress, it's your job!!Haha. 

I suddenly saw that evening in my mind's eye. You seemed to miss all of the article that talks about the UK, Australia, New Zealand and Canada, which is weird. Just an example of what that sentence means. Insert your own sports there as you like. Gawd. I can't wait until you guys are just talked about in history books. 

SCIENCE IS THE INDEPENDENT TESTING OF ONE PERSON'S FINDINGS BY OTHERS. How bad were the French Kings? Yet I bet you think the French Revolution was justified. And the American Revolution was over much less injustice than Assad. It's not that simple, in either example. Bandicoots are amazing IRL. Like little kangaroos that could fit in the palm of your hand. I saw some in Tasmania. Britain wanted to turn Australia into a bit of Britain. It *is* surprisingly British in places, particularly Tasmania and parts of Sydney. Not the same thing at all. The fighting in the American Revolution was sponsored by foreign governments - namely France.  Americans die 4 years before Australians, have very low mean wealth compared to Australians and Scandinavians, and the murder rate in the USA is 4-5 times higher than most European countries. No American city is in the world's top 25 most livable. We could go on. 

No country is perfect, but the strongest asset a country has is to be self critical. Rian's scripts are amazing though. I would be surprised if LK wasn't paid to have a read through and provide notes. He might even edit some dialogue here and there, as will JJ (lots will be uncredited for things like this).We don't know for sure who is writing 9 yet. Sources on that are sketchy. It did "feel" like ROTJ in tone though. Sort of upbeat and lite. Check out Looper. It's actually got lots of Star Wars like elements, including hover speeders. 

Besides, your username is perfect. He's also a mega Star Wars fan (the first thing he recorded was x-wing toys flying between couches as a kid), and smart as hell. One of the most promising American directors working today. 

There are "bigger" directors (Spielberg, Abrams), but their work can be a little formulaic and commercial. Rian's work always seems deeply personal, philosophical, and shows a love of the history and craft of film. Kind of the ideal DIY, self financed first film, right?

It was even shot in his old high school during the holidays. Ditto. I'd actually like to see him do an anthology film ("take the universe wherever you want to go"), but will be excited to see him move on to his own post Star Wars projects. Ah, so (just as an example) they originally wanted character Y to live until IX, and Rian wanted them dead at the end of VIII?

Or, say, they predicted Z would be the focus of VIII, but he wanted to focus in on another old or new character?Rian is my #1 pick, but they definitely wanted JJ to reboot. It's kind of his specialty. 

Also we don't know who is scripting IX and are you sure about Rian producing IX? I don't know if he's ever produced before. I'd also like to know this - if anyone else has any more guesses or information. &gt; Rian has asked for a couple of things here and there that he needs for his story.

I take this to mean Rian has shifted the trilogy's plan a tiny bit - deemphasized or emphasized a character. Added one in or killed one off. 

But it struck me this line came in the context of Rian being completely in the loop with the production of VII. 

*What if it means Rian asked JJ for little changes to VII?*

I'm thinking of things like:

"Could you just put this glimpse of a character being present when X happens? I want to show later that they were secretly involved."

Or "can you not give away X is related to Y yet... I actually want them to be revealed later/ have a different relationship."

Exciting to think about!

Really smart answers, too. They're the exact questions I want the people in charge thinking about. Is say the hype was *bigger* for Empire than Force Awakens. 

VII is massive amongst the Star Wars community, but they're having to push it into people's heads a bit otherwise. Even though masses will go, I don't hear random people discussing it all that much. 

Yet Empire was something that was just in the air - if you were a Star Wars fan or not. Well, producer. Plenty of directors have been told to do things they don't want by producers. Oftentimes they don't even get to approve the *editing* of their footage!Yes, and I hadn't even heard that much critical about Super 8 from others, and he volunteered his own criticism of it. Which is really thoughtful and interesting. He saw "under the hood". I'm sure he had to work furiously to fix big things with the scripts that we don't even notice now. Well, Rian is changing the direction somewhat in VIII (JJ said). But it's on the level of professionals who respect each others' work. He can also see dailies in LA, so no big deal. This was one of my favorite parts too. He totally gets it. 

(Casting has always been one of JJ's strong points and interests, though.)Han used to work for the Empire too, didn't he?The arm detail was great, too. Props for inviting the props guy in!Looper is an even better example. He wrote the script on that too. I'm predicting VIII to be better than VII, with IX the worst, but all better than I, II and III. Way to take a Wired interview personallyThe Rian/JJ stuff is fascinating. 

It implies Rian has altered slightly the plans for the trilogy. But also perhaps implies Rian asked for a couple of changes to *VII* to make his story work well.

I'm imagining the equivalent of "don't make Leia kiss Luke, I've got plans for those guys!"No one is shitting on you. You're a paragraph of text people scan past, with an unfamiliar username above it, and that's all. 

People just want to go back to not knowing about your private issues and get back to the subject of the post. Right. We could have some confused people otherwise ;)

I re-watched Looper the other night, and noticed it had some of the dialogue wizardry of Brick, but much more straightforward. With his subtle force style stuff too, I think it's exciting that that's his last script before VIII. Well, JJ will have a pretty small role in VIII. It will have its own producer (a long time friend of Rian's, and previous collaborator, helping him focus). Kathleen will also be a bigger role. 

But it does seem remarkably well thought through. Makes sense - it has 200 million people. About 9 or 10 "Australias" in oneAmazing right? They fit a perfect role somewhere between snack and a meal. Buddha statues too, which is from twice as distantIndia is India, so to speak!I'm not so sure. I think it would be much vaguer than that, and from Lucasfilm and Disney, not JJ or LK. 

Something like 

\u2022 keep the look of the films consistent

\u2022 update them but go for the style of the OT

\u2022 bring in a new cast of young characters (plus the costumed ones, that we can replace with other actors)

\u2022 make it about the Skywalker family

\u2022 give each film, and the trilogy, a beginning middle and end

\u2022 make it so anyone can pick up the films at VII

\u2022 no jar jarYes, I read that. But that's just their job - make a film that works on its own, or as part of three. 

I imagine it's something like "there's this group called the Knights of Ren. They are obsessed by Vader and in conflict with the Rebellion but we don't know what their relationship is to the First Order yet. Is it stable? And what happens when Kylo finds out about Luke? What happens within the Republic when the First Order gets more powerful and breaks the truce?"

Pretty basic stuff that is inherent to the characters, and Rian could answer or change - in any way that flowed or twisted in an appealing way. I doubt it's "X happens in VIII, then Y happens some time after that."I'm not saying that example is wrong, but FYI you can be rich and a refugee, and even from a ruling sect. Refugee doesn't mean "poor". 

Being gay, being atheist, having a feud or business disagreement with someone in power... there are lots of ways to fear for your life in a dictatorship. True. For $350,000 you can buy citizenship in Cyprus, buy buying a property. SERCO is a private companyOnly that's not what he said at all. He said it's 50:50 serious at risk refugees vs others, with a range of professions, personalities and backgrounds. Actually, Australia is one of the most bipartisan pro-immigration countries on earth. 

We have the third highest rate (after UAE and Luxemberg), and it's an important part of each budget's GDP growth. 

Even at the height of "turn back the boats" you never saw Abbott say a word against *migration* in general - Hockey would have had a stroke. I believe we have the third highest rate of immigration in the world. I'd like more and bigger cities in Australia too, but it's likely also huge demand.What about when someone you thought was a genuine refugee was told they wouldn't be settled in Australia because of the way they arrived (and would instead go to Cambodia or PNG or something).

Did you ever see that? And how was their behavior after this?

No agenda on my part in my asking - just a difficult question. There is no proper channel in, say, Afghanistan though. That's hilarious. 

Any good stories or memories from any of these meal time conversations?Well, in their defense there is little to do *but* complain about the food, it's not like you can work. Also they might have a teensy bit of stress and trauma others mightn't have. That's no different to air arrivals though. I know it's the toughest question in policy at the moment, but wouldn't your solution encourage more people to try to take leaky boats?

How would you solve that issue - more naval support? Official boats? 

There doesn't seem to be any easy answers IMHO. This was a great writeup, thanks!There's a rich Egyptian billionaire who wants to make an island for refugees to live on. People would be "free" to work and study, yet not become a citizen of another country. It would be funded by rich countries, who could send people instead of maintaining places like CI. 

I can imagine it would be pretty empty of rich economic refugees, who would prefer to go home. 

From your experience, what do you think that society (and solution) would be like in reality?Right. But I also believe that was the point of the movie - "my tribute to the Spielberg movies of the 1980s", hence the name. 

I may be wrong but SS might have been an executive producer also. Script is done for VIII though. Shooting proper in Jan, so heavily into sets and things. Worked for the OT ;)Right. That is pretty unique!Hi there. I feel for you, and have certainly been there!

Two things. Firstly I tried too hard to be open about Buddhism, and to "share" it with others, when I started. 

But later I just realized that I had a very normal wanting of others to acknowledge my True self - and to benefit from what I was getting - very common wishes! We're all on out own paths. Keep things separate, IMHO, from your practice - you only need to mention Buddhism if it comes up naturally, and is skillful to talk about then. 

Secondly, the spiritual community (sangha) is one of the precious "three jewels" of Buddhism. The other two are Buddha and his teachings, so sangha is pretty damn important! It sounds like you are instinctively feeling this for yourself. 

IMHO go to the Rigpa or FPMT websites, and find a center near you. Even if you stretch the truth a bit ("I'm going into the city to study!"), taking a beginner (or intermediate) class will introduce you to loads of people like yourself. 

My local center even has a group *just* for under 30s - no 31 year olds allowed! So enjoy. Like anything, Buddhism is best done with a sense of play, enjoyment, friendship and enthusiasm. 

Fascinating isn't it? I'm still thinking about it, and I guess I don't know enough to say. 

*Cutting Through Spiritual Materialism* certainly suggests the ego can use anything to strengthen itself - even progress in eliminating the ego! I have no doubt that's possible in zen, too. Check out the various countries for tips. Eg. Theravada is prevalent in Thailand, so you can search for Buddhist festivals there. Whereas Mongolia has Tibetan Buddhism, and might provide some tips. Also historical books like Seven Years in Tibet will help you on the Mahayana side. 

Best of luck! Enjoy those school years, you'll wish you could go back to revisit them one day.  The "sacrilegious" part was it was a Hindu temple, with a massive pantheon mural of gods, and Jesus just as one incarnation (we can safely say not near the top). 

Enough to get something burnt down in those days, I would guess. The Qantas theme isn't our anthem?Oh man, I read it ~20 years ago. Possibly pre internet. No chance!So True. It failed even in the job it gave itself (a movie for young kids to get into Star Wars). What's interesting is it happened after his Satori experiences. I guess anything less than full enlightenment can become twisted, forgotten, and obsessed over. It's pretty common to hear Zen guys advise others to treat a Satori like no big deal. Forgive me for saying this - and I totally respect people who got into SW with TPM - but I "rewatched" the film through the Mr Plinkett review on YouTube. 

It's such an expansive, detailed and smart watch, I never go away without being entertained. It's like watching TPM with a buddy, and in its explanations about protagonists, continuity and blocking is practically a film school semester in itself. I think I've seen an original gnostic scroll in the British Library, with parts of the Gospel of St Thomas on it. Amazing text. The whole idea that you have to pick one philosophy like a football team - and not many like a diet or wardrobe - always seemed strange to me. Wow, that's a lot. But money in the bank, IMO. We know! Just have to wait out this stupid Turnbull agreement with some right wingers. There's too much potential in the "off the wall" ideas of the anthology movies, IMHO. Some will suck and some will be amazing... and the amazing ones could spawn a whole new series, or even genre of film. Agreed. It all depends on the quality of director and writer. Never be commercial and paradoxically they will print money forever. Even then it had that predictable Marvel cookie cutter script about it. Disparate group have to work together, to win the big two fights at the end. Meh. I didn't like any Trek film before Abrams' first. Seeing Spock swim with whales aside, of course. Seeing he turned down the job of doing Star Wars originally, I'd say no. You could put Looper in there ... vague force powers and hover bikes. Crystal Skull?Which I prefer, IMHO. If there's a fight I like little clever ones like Rian Johnson does. Ugh, I hated both films. First was boring, and the second pretty right wing. No, it's ultimately the producers' and studio's movie. Woo. Who is a fancy Mac person?It can never be undone. It will never go away. That Carson character definitely has some funny materialYou're supposed to watch the teevee with the hood *off*Kathleen will have a bigger overall role than JJ in the next two though.William Shakesman quote. It basically means don't waste my time. Who has a mile long stick?That sacred bond between Director and viewers. 

Give me a break. JJ does casting better than anyone, and this looks no different. That's what she saidIt can be both though - a feedback loop. 

For instance, right wing policies entrench poverty, reduce the middle class (and hence business demand), and provide little government funds for research, investment, and setting up of new industries.No, I'm talking about formal migration programs - the amount of people the government seeks to invite in. 

That's different from emergency situations, when people flood borders due to war. 

Something approaching 1 in 3 Australians were born overseas, and it's now over 50% that have at least one parent who were born elsewhere. 

Direct family experience with immigration is now the majority of Australians' situation, and not something a politician would easily denigrate. Even extreme right wing groups in Australia often take care to qualify their statements in this regard. I've read 28% and 31% from different government sources. Check out Demographics of Australia in Wikipedia, might be a good easy to find source.This is Australian tax dollars going to the US instead of local hospitals and whatnot. 

Well, probably to Larry Page and Tim Cook's tax shelters, but you know what I mean. That's enough for big projects like two of those German fusion prototypes we could be building. *Every year*. Fade Chevron in Australia to blackI wouldn't quite go that far. I think it was thought of to win votes, saving lives is a side benefit.Honestly, it's really worth watching at least the first one. Think of it as him deliberately pretending to be a dumb guy, so it's put into language that even a "dumb" guy can understand. 

I fast forward a few bits, but it definitely made me smarter about film. That was great info, thanks - I wonder why the media hasn't told us about that program.Sounds like a good philosophy of life right there!I never thought about that side - thanksI'm no Murdoch editor, but it could say SOFT ON BOATS: LABOR LETS MURDERERS OUT FOR TREATSTime and place, manThat was pretty damn funny. I'd forgotten what it was like to have a PC, too. 

(Reboot! Get a new copy of Windows!)Nonsense. What a crappy teacher!NopeArt professor here, I'll try a year's course in a an ELI5 (ELI17?) 

Why is it worth that much money? Because it's important in history, there's only one of it, and a lot of people want it.

(There are thousands of Ferraris, but only one of these paintings, hence this will be worth a lot more than a top end Ferrari.)

It's a good investment, by the way - the owner gets to enjoy it for years, and then sell it for a *profit*, so it's a canny move. Blue chip art outperforms stocks many times over.

If you still wonder why it's valuable, think of Walt Disney. His cartoons pushed animation forward, and help us move from black and white Steamboat Mickey, to the Pixar wonders we have today. 

Each original cel of *Snow White* is a valuable aesthetic, historical and collector's item. Someone will know how much a nice one with Snow White in it will go for. 

OK, so imagine there wasn't *thousands* of cels in Snow White, there was only one. *Now how much do you think that single cel would be?* 

Art doesn't just try to look realistic or tell stories, though. It's more like pure research or philosophy, looking at what humans can create *in the abstract*.

Think of art like the most extreme free styling sport imaginable. Anything is possible. The person who wins is able to do the following the most:

\u2022 They do something that hasn't been done before.

\u2022 They do something consistently, eg. for years - they believe enough in it to do it for a long time.

\u2022 They do this thing in the context of "art" (usually exhibitions, galleries and museums), so other people know it's in play.

\u2022 They generally know what art went before them, and is happening around them. 

\u2022 They do something that speaks about their life somehow, or personality - they believe in it.   

\u2022 Ultimately, they do something that influences other artists, so it drives what we think of as "art" forward. 

Sound easy? Personally, I think it's one of the hardest things to do in the world. 

If you can do all of that, you can be a great artist, and eventually your most original contribution could be worth $25,000,000 to a collector one day, too. You have no idea how the outside world - or even just Sweden - works. 

Basic concern for refugees has nothing to do with anti-semitism, and indeed is quite the opposite. 

International agreements about refugees evolved, in part, from wanting to avoid the type of civilian horrors that occurred - to Jews and other groups - in WWII. 

Sweden and Germany's sense of care comes in part from being so close to those terrible events. Basic ignorance about the world from a substandard education system. Well put. 

I was trying to explain to someone who mightn't agree thinking about "what painting actually is" - or philosophy generally - is worthwhile. 

But you're right of course, and a great concise answer if someone wants to understand art a little further. The difference is we're used to one of themYou poor and angry little flowerHaha, edited thanks. It was the iPhone version.These type of clinics get attacked, physically and verbally, on a daily basis. 

Recently a nurse listed all of the attacks in a small period of employment. They included gas being regularly poured under doors and lit, gas being put in air vents, et cetera. 

This guy is not saying "no more baby parts" and attacking a wheel alignment store. If this isn't terrorism, then the word is meaningless, and there is no point using it for anything. Exactly. And I think even with 1,000 times the dose there was a mistake - drugs like LSD don't follow the usual body weight calculations of, say, anesthetics. I think the first dose by the person who discovered LSD was some ridiculously large magnitude, and he was fine. Well, keep going until it's one of your friends someone else happens to not like. NeitherThere was some research that and I think that's been discredited recently. If someone is outrageously racist or whatever on a forum, it's better if folk *calmly* call them out on it - it takes away the fun and the illusion that a majority share their views. I take it you've never read any Gore Vidal, Hunter S. Thompson, or any of the gonzo columnists in the US?Plenty of dumb, anti equality women though (anti feminist women on tumblr, say). Sure, just speaking generally. Making all this public is I guess good for her, and good for bringing it to people's attention. He lost his job, it's in the articleIt's not just "good fortune" though. She's been producing content for as long as I've known her, including a quite uncontroversial opinion column in the Adelaide Advertiser for a few years. Then gradually building up her voice over regular, unpaid articles online that got picked up by major papers. She's definitely a very hard worker and committed. 

It's fine to say you don't like her style, or disagree with her content or approach. But one thing she's not is just lucky.Mean wealth is really low in the US (how much the average person has after all debts are accounted for). It's about five or ten times higher in places like Norway and Australia. 

The killers in the US are healthcare and college debts, that don't batter people's wealth in other developed countries. Mean wealth (how much the average person has after debts are removed) is really low in the USA. Australia and Norway are around 5-10 times higher. 

Things like single payer healthcare, and interest free college loans, are just smarter for the individual and country as a whole. Caring about a sing-song more than people is just about the definition of fanaticism. Republicans deny affordable healthcare to so many Americans that it brings down the average American life expectancy. 

Australians live for four years longer than Americans on average, for instance. All she did was screen capture some of the stuff he said to her. That's hardly a thin skin. It's a comment on a forum, but I've got to say you have the best username for your comments.One were passively exercising their freedoms and rights, and hurting no one. 

The other were tyrannically, and even physically denying others their rights. 

Anyone who respects democracy and freedom should respect the former and stand against the latter. This wasn't on Reddit, no such rules apply. 

Personally I think it's great. Look how big the guy is - it's easy to imagine it would be difficult for a woman to stand up to him in person. The story he was referring to was along the highways if Iraq, not Syria, from memory. It was posted in /r/worldnews. They do get medals!

But I agree, very little civilian casualties, precise, and no need to counterproductively "hold" territory and get blowback. Total respect for these guys, and the decision to use them. My dishwasher cutlery basket has a little handleThey're clearly called bikiesI met some South Africans in London, who were freshly just out of the regular army not long after the end of apartheid. 

They talked vaguely about some terrible things from missions near the border and you just knew they weren't bullshitting. Mainly just from how spun out and traumatized they were, surrounded by regular folk in a peaceful country. You're not incorrect, but also there was a story from a US expert about how well trained *some* of the Daesh fighters are. 

Basically they employed a lot of the ex Iraqi military trainers that were out of work, so quite a few have pretty decent, national level style training. What do those letters mean? 

And why are they effective - general cammo, or harder to hit the head?You got my vote. 

But in terms of holding territory, I'm happy for all the proxies to do that: Russia takes part, Turkey takes part, Kurds and even Iran take part. 

Ceasefire, allow civilians to change zones if they feel safer. Let things calm down, and allow zones to voluntarily rejoin - or stay independent - as they wish. Well, we can trust other groups to work in their own interests too, they just mightn't ally with the West's interests. Actually, taxpayers fleeing ISIS territory is perhaps one of the biggest strategic assets we have - maybe more important than the air campaign. 

As is having refugees visibly welcomed in the news, which does great damage to their "IS is the only safe refuge for Muslims" propaganda. Until the Paris attacks, little and distant Australia had the second largest contribution, which is something you don't often hear about. Because they're made up of loosely organized individuals from all walks of life?It would be popular thoughI'm sure there are some Aussies, Brits and Canadians in there somewhere. That is.... brilliantWhich great director was it that said he was really nervous starting, as everyone around him knew more than he did about something (lights, production schedule, how to act, cameras). 

Then he realized his job was just to have a consistent vision, and to clearly communicate it to others. They needed it, even. That was what he was good at, and everything else was done by those experts. I just come back from Romania, Hungary, and the Czech Republic. Maybe you'd call that more Central Europe? But it felt like it had its s*** together more than Western Europe. 

Everything felt clean, safe, happy, and fun. In comparison, London, Barcelona or Paris can feel dirty, full of scams, unsafe, and with lots of unhappy people. On an iPhone it just gets stuck on the "location" step, even if you hit "auto" or add in manual coordinates. 

It's a pity as it stops you using the service. I'm actually looking for people a long way away. 

It's a feature, not a bug ;)It fits all of those three points you yourself raisedIt has long been pointed out that Muslim Americans have high wealth and socioeconomic inclusion, and Muslim Europeans low wealth and socioeconomic inclusion, on average. 

The fact that the US has extremely low levels of Islamic extremism has similarly been long connected to this fact. I can assure you, there are not prison of war camps with 1,000s of ISIS soldiers being held. 

No one will be able to say "oh we had no idea nearly all the POWs were being tortured and murdered".Some people do care about our system of legal rights and protections the West has precariously built up over 2,000 years, and successfully defended against all types of enemies. Not at all. He's talking about one of the most accessible and well known philosophical works of the last 30 years (The Iraq War Did Not Take Place), and swapping it from Iraq to Paris. 

Since this is where the original text was written, it's a pretty neat little analogy. Great article. Shows how much you can still do with just a laptop and 2,000 words. What's your other top 2, because this is goldFax-Machine-Confused-Travolta.gifI totally loved it. ThanksLink?I thought it was all fine (and the first one fantastic)... they just weren't in space very much. 

With a whole universe of space to explore, no one wants to see a Star Trek happening mainly between London and San Francisco.Movies can be subjective, *and* critical opinion can coalesce around a consensus. 

That's how everything from "best holiday destinations" to "best red wine" or "best cheese" works. AKA the most basic principles of movie criticism.Europe is about the same size as America, and China - larger and poorer than the States - is rapidly connecting its cities with similar technology. Japan, Europe and China have adequate air transport also, but that doesn't negate the usefulness of trains. 

Rail is just often much quicker (door to door) than flying, and it can be cheaper, roomier and more pleasant, too. And it increases demand during a time of low growth, further benefiting the economy. 

It's nuts not doing this type of thing when interest rates mean it's almost free to borrow money. Chinese engineering is pretty amazing on high speed trains at the moment. It's really fun to take just to feel the intense drag racing-like acceleration in your chest, while being surrounded by middle age Japanese people calmly reading the newspaper. 

I'll never forget an old guy getting up and coming over, just to make sure I was looking the right way to see Mount Fuji. The figures are from before the Paris attacks, and the article quotes numbers for the Paris hospitals network. You know, I don't remember a single person looking at a phone, now that you mention it. Just lots of newspapers, books, and office notes, and/or people quietly having drinks or nibbles. 

That might have been the clientele though - lots of older people playing it cool, and a smattering of tourists giddily pointing at the countryside zipping by. Like China, you mean. I'm not sure you read my comment. 

So many Americans are dying early from poor healthcare - including middle class Americans - that it brings down the average lifespan figure. There are many separate data sources to combine. But the most basic is life expectancy by country:

https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_life_expectancyChina has a coastline 14,500 kilometers long, comparable to the USA minus Alaska and Hawaii. I think the comparison is fine. If the *average* age of death across 330 million Americans is up to 4 years younger than similar countries with single payer healthcare, that's a structural problem. 

It's too big to be something that just affects poor people. I'm not sure if there's a joke in there, but of course one of the biggest errors made by the coalition - and led to the chaos of Iraq and rise of ISIS - was the dismissal of the Iraqi army.

It left many to take their skills to terrorist organizations, in part to support their families. Look up Riot Theory. It's much more complex than some people have X view, while others have Y view. 

In fact it's a range of views that encourages some to think - or do - things that they wouldn't normally. My guess is we'll trust the Iraqi Shia government saying they will be more inclusive, and we'll be back to creating an ISIS 2.0. The US is around four times as dangerous as Sweden.

Mexico is around four times as dangerous as America.&gt; Nozick expresses serious misgivings about capitalist libertarianism, going so far as to reject much of the foundations of the theory on the grounds that personal freedom can sometimes only be fully actualized via a collectivist politics and that wealth is at times justly redistributed via taxation to protect the freedom of the many from the potential tyranny of an overly selfish and powerful few.

That certainly does sound like someone who is serious. Although it's also just Centrist common sense.Balkanizing Iraq into three is the only plan I can realistically see working. 

And despite Turkey's fears, I think a normalized Kurdish state is the only thing that will work for Turkey's interests, also. Actually America has a quite average rate of diversity, and a very high murder rate. But it's good you got through your class ok!Australia didn't ban guns, they just took away the ones most used in mass shootings (which was just 20% of guns).

The removal of these "first choice of mass shooters" guns, and the freedom to replace them with other types, resulted in public mass shootings going immediately to zero, and staying there for 19 years in a row and counting. Only due to population size. If you correct for it (eg. at the Olympics), results are pretty standard. Showing the flag is seen as a pretty ugly thing to do in many countries. Germany and (to some extent) Australia, for example. 

It's perhaps seen like bragging about your own achievements on Facebook, or posting only selfies. Thanks for doing this!

On the personal Adsense Manager front, I went to a live Adsense conference in my city of around 4 million people (free entry). It was really easy to book a one on one session and get some Googlers' email addresses there. It might be worth a try?

Your approach *exactly* matches mine, about the same number and types of sites, with one big difference. My traffic boomed, then dropped right back, and yours stayed high! 

For me, this was due to:

\u2022 Getting Google hit with a (panda? penguin?) algorithm change, that I think hit all sites that didn't get updated very often (I may be wrong about the reason), and

\u2022 I found it very hard to maintain interest in adding constant new content to my sites - even outsourcing this - after about 3 years on each. And even just managing spam! It became very sterile, and it was the thrill of making something new, and learning, that kept things going in the first place. 

I never found an answer to the above, and my income dropped right back to a few hundred dollars a month. 

What would be your answer to the above problems, and how do you deal with it?Rupert Murdoch's quote is something like "no one ever lost money by underestimating public taste", or something gross like that. 

Fox News - The Sun - his Australian newspapers... it's all pretty much the opposite of human progress. My only problem with Maz is she seems exactly Whoopie Goldberg's character in *Star Trek - The Next Generation*. Which makes her feel like a massive cliche. 

But anyway, here's the article (to reduce The Sun's clicks by a few dozen):



Lupita Nyong\u2019o\u2019s Star Wars role cut down drastically by JJ Abrams in the final edit. THE force is not as strong with LUPITA NYONG\u2019O as StarWars director JJ ABRAMS first thought.

Despite wowing with her breakthrough role in 12 Years A Slave in 2013, landing an Oscar for Best Supporting Actress for her efforts, it seems not everything she touches turns to gold.

I\u2019ve learned that Lupita struggled so much in soon-to-be-released Star Wars: The Force Awakens that her role has been massively cut in the finished edit.

Maker Disney used advanced motion-capture technology to transform her into alien Maz Kanata for the biggest movie event of the year.

However, JJ must have been pretty unconvinced by her performance, as he ordered a lot of her dialogue to be re-recorded.

A Star Wars insider revealed: \u201cThe CGI seemed to be what Lupita struggled with, perhaps because it meant she felt less of a connection to the character. 

\u201cThere was a general sense that something wasn\u2019t working so a lot of her scenes ended up being either re-worked or cut. Unfortunately she just didn\u2019t end up delivering.

\u201cIt does happen in Hollywood, but not usually with Academy Award winners.

\u201cHer part in the final film will now be a lot smaller than was initially expected.

\u201cIt\u2019s ultimately quite embarrassing for Lupita but she\u2019s still thrilled to even be in such an iconic movie.\u201d

Fans have been wondering why so little has been released about Lupita\u2019s character, who JJ recently teased is a former space pirate. Interestingly, the director also confirmed that Maz\u2019s back story would feature in the film, which comes out on December 17.

According to a source, this wasn\u2019t always the plan \u2014 and this is another example of a revision that was made after the actress shot her scenes.

But in spite of the awkward performance issues, it doesn\u2019t look like anything is going to stop The Force Awakens being a success.

The next instalment in the classic franchise has already broken all ticket pre-sale records in America and experts are predicting it could replace Avatar as the highest-grossing film of all time globally.

But I have a feeling that Mexican-born, Kenyan-raised Lupita won\u2019t be getting her own Maz spin-off film afterwards.

Agreed... 95% of Sun readers would know there was a new Star Wars film, and that two British people were the two leads, and Harrison broke his leg, but that's about it. It's a little bit dull and obscure to be something made up. 

I also like your other reasoning. They are trying to make a script with double the usual cast (the old one and the new). It makes sense that editing requires a lot of "we need to cull this right down to work".Hahaha. Why's the captain leaving?Well said. I think. Good points.

As a pretty normal male friend of hers (a bunch of my male friends are too), I can say she's not anti-men personally... just the 5% biggest dickhead ones.As a man, I can't say I've ever got derogatorily hassled by a woman through private messages, they're usually pretty respectful etc. She's not a troll, she writes for a lot of different publications on a bunch of topics and voices. This is definitely the topic she's most well known for, though. I kind of agree. I mute even real life friends *I agree with* who are kind of annoying on Facebook. I made the punk rock statement. 

That Grrrls punk attitude... "take that, asshole"... is a pretty big popular culture thing, especially for women aged between 17 and 35. 

She wrote like that on her own blog, and the main newspapers hired her to publish some there. 

I'm surprised they did it - especially considering their demographics - but I don't think she should change her voice to fit a new readership.She does write on a bunch of topics... if you did a thorough search you'd see all sorts of neutral stuff, even quite conservative stuff. 

I remember one where she was against Bill Henson photographing underage kids (with their parents' permission) for artwork, which was pretty much the Liberal Party and Christian position.  Not really. It depends on what she's writing about. Some of her Advertiser columns were Centrist or even socially Conservative. Not really. She's written on sports, dull arts policy, music, moving to Sydney and setting up a house, a bunch of stuff. I would guess if you were a female in your 20s it would be pretty refreshing to read her. Their views are not exactly represented by the morning TV breakfast shows. That would imply you actually were in front of a real person, not an online debate, so I'd hope you wouldn't. Don't bother cherry picking. She writes on a bunch of stuff. We've now reached self parody level in the comments thread. I flipped 180 degrees somehow, from being *very* anxious, to unusually relaxed about it (I was shocked when people remarked that that was a recognizable thing about me).

The top 3 things that helped were:

\u2022 Faking it until you make it. There's a point where you don't know if you're faking it or not! Then you're fine. 

\u2022 Taking on some role where you're "supposed" to talk to a bunch of people. For me it was teaching. There's something about putting on a cap that *makes* people listen to you ... it turns your relationship to social interactions around completely. Now I yell at strangers on buses to behave, etc. 

\u2022 Not drinking. Being around drunk people is really easy to do, because they're semi oblivious. You can take that sober confidence with you to other places then, too. 

So, it's very possible. Good luck!I think of myself as a Christian *and* a Buddhist (Buddhism to some can be a type of psychology to help with calming the mind. I think they actually support each other).

I think it's like parenting - the fact that you're interested in asking how to do well will mean you'll do fine!

It's not so different to going to church really. The fact that Buddhists don't try to convert or encourage others to join might be the main difference you'll notice. 

Have fun! I wish more of us did what you're doing.  Absolutely!

For Tibetan Buddhism, I'd recommend FPMT.org (The Foundation for the Preservation of the Mahayana Tradition).

They are a pretty conservative (as in "we just want to preserve the traditional teachings. They are quite liberal otherwise). So you won't have massive controversies anywhere. Lots of pictures of the Dalai Lama around, a pretty organized worldwide structure, and usually pretty nice people working there. 

They're also huge, with quite identical programs, bookshops, and practices around the world. I've "slipped in" to communities easily in the US, France, India, Australia, the UK and elsewhere. Sometimes it's my first port of call (for a while their noticeboards were my "trick" for finding nice people to share a house with).

Another good one is Rigpa.org. It might be a fair bit smaller, but they're in the main Western cities, and really pro with their centers, online content, etc. Sogyal Rimpoche is their main teacher.  So interesting, thanks!Perhaps appropriately. I've debated with Tibetan monks about if the Earth goes around the sun, or vice versa. I'm pretty liberal, if something looks like it will hurt someone (eg. racism or hate speech), I just say "that's not cool".

For being mild, it's surprisingly effective, too.  You sound more Buddhist than lots of people who call themselves that! I would just say keep reading and exploring, and keep what speaks to you. I think the Dalai Lama's response to his country's situation would be most illustrative. He now wishes that Tibet had had better self defenses. But after the invasion, he always preaches nonviolence, and even calls his "enemies" precious, for their ability to make him question his own views and emotions. 

I personally think violence can only be justified if it immediately helps save the lives of others (a policeman shooting someone who is crazy with a gun, or an army stopping a genocide). 

Beyond that, without working on your own delusions first, you are likely to be yet another person spreading their imperfect (but highly held) views and abilities onto others by force. This is a little simplistic, I feel. There are many ways to deal with desires. You can hope, as a way of increasing your own compassion and motivation. But you can't pray, as in "take away someone else's own agency". 

It's within the realm of hubris to claim to know the best thing for someone else. What about the Explain like I'm five years old part? ;-)I strongly encourage you to read Sogyal Rimpoche's *The Tibetan Book of Living and Dying*. He goes exactly through this, in great detail, in really accessible Western language. 

The crux of it is it's the best time to reach enlightenment, but to do so you need familiarity, context and forewarning of what you are going to experience. That's a very good point. 

You actually reminded me of an article of hers where women were being regularly raped along one stretch of road, and her comments helped change the focus from "women need to walk there less", to "we need to put more resources into catching this guy". 

In such a situation speaking out can make a really obvious and significant difference to someone's life... besides all the more subtle and hidden benefits you mention. No, actually it was the uninformed one. I think to her credit she modified her views when given some balanced and additional information. Two very quick examples, from a single Google of her articles. 

\u2022 The piece she wrote on her two abortions, which were very sincere, honest, and hardly trolling. 

\u2022 At the other extreme, articles like this, which include where to buy a good pair of jeans, or which bars in Melbourne have a good cheese platter:

http://m.theage.com.au/entertainment/about-town/my-melbourne-clementine-ford-20120517-1yt5e.htmlNo, I think you're right. Even as a guy, it's easier to call bullshit on certain behaviour if you can use a language we've heard before.

Eg. A guy saying at a pub women should dress differently so as to not get raped. 

It's handy if we can quickly say "c'mon, you're not one of *those George Pell guys* are you?". It doesn't seem like your reply comes from outer space.That was actually a thoughtful article, and I liked the Foreign Minister's response. 

Thanks for posting. Hmm, feedback loop maybe? Gets reader interest, gets clicks, gets revenue, gets paid for it?

It's obviously something she's passionate about, but if there was as big a market for - say - her roller derby or best contemporary jewellery shop articles, you'd naturally see more of those. Isn't there a whole civilization of Engineers, not like just one with a Project?Which was what was so great about Star Wars: A New Hope. 

They just blithely refer to the Clone Wars, and Anakin once being a good guy, and that was enough - on with the adventure. 

I mean, it would be horrible if they made a bunch of films about how he *became* Darth Vader...Agreed. "Don't waste my time", as someone wise once said. I like how Miller watched all those epic American space, gun and True crime movies. 

And said "well, we don't have so much of those things. But we've got a pretty insane car culture in Australia, and lots of desert. I can use that."Action movies are an important genre, particularly today, with franchises and the like. 

Yet action movies had also reached a point where they were all becoming very similar, CGI filled films. Nothing really at stake, and fake overblown emotions. 

Fury Road showed you could put energy back into the genre, by using real effects, a quite unique format (one long car chase), and talk about real issues (women being empowered, modern day slavery, etc.)

Plus, it had incredible confidence and verve for an old guy, who made his first in the series in the 1970s. He was confident enough even to put his main selling point (Max) in a supporting role. 

It was kind of the opposite of the George Lucas story, where George Miller just got better and smarter and more knowledgable about his craft, and didn't listen to yes men. He also worked on it for 15 years, and moved production to Africa to get the right sand :)

I know a lot of young directors working today were really impressed, and it made them excited again about what smart people interested in film could do within a well funded genre. I like that even he had an (un spelled out) back story, and his guitar and flames all had to actually work, too. Great attention to detail. Well said. I disagree though, I found it realistic that the sex slaves would be bonded as a group, quite un street-wise, and be busted out en masse. 

It wouldn't be worth it for Furiosa to risk her life for just one of them, say. If you're on an iPhone press the circle button under the words. A black Cuban official once went to North Korea, sort of a solidarity of ex-Communist nations thing. 

When he landed he was absolutely *pummeled*, as in brutally beaten, by one of the first groups of North Koreans he came across. He was expecting a little bit of cultural difference, but not "black man means evil" level of ignorance. 

Dial that back 99.999% for China, but for a while the two countries were very close and similar. There was a great "Making of Jedi" I once had on VHS. I always thought it would make its way to YouTube, but I've never seen it - in whole or in part. 

Anyway, it's great, and seeing the remote control Jabba eyes working without the head is amazing. We wiped yours too. It was for the best. It's like he recorded little MP3s of key moments for later :)Plus, it brings the Ewoks around, and changes the outcome of the war. 

Pretty damn important character and contribution, then. Ok, I'm going to have to watch a couple of films again to know what you mean, but could be!Your a Star Wars StarThat's great, and overall I agree with you. It does seem easier to start again sometimes after a knock. 

How do you keep interest in the same sites and content, year after year? I get to the point where I can't care a hoot about French Cookwear, or Skydiving, or whatever the (once interesting) topic and site is?We're all laughing, but besides the cathartic jokes we're perhaps missing one of the key clues here to the mystery of Islamic radicalization. 

It is not a coincidence that Americans who shoot up their school, or a black church, or kids in a cinema are the same gender and age as kids who shoot up a Paris concert venue. 

Scientific research is finding many commonalities - from Riot Theory to the way copycat acts spread like viruses. 

They are both distinctly young male problems. It's likely that a solution for one of these will give us solutions for the other. That's not why the US hasn't adopted the metric system, since it's a per capita cost, and both larger and poorer countries have achieved it. 

The reason metric hasn't been adopted is the same reason the penny exists - a combination of nostalgia, inertia and a self-referential media environment.Absolutely, as I've never heard that combination of words or know what you're talking about. The real reason Spain remained neutral in WWII was Britain paid people in their government and military enormous bribes. There's a group with a name like superidentifiers or something that are especially good at itI think the FBI said her information was usefulThe lawyer is still dragging it out. 

She just has to fix up that last bill for September and pay the $700 filing fee. Before it happenedEven if one article did say something different, it's still not a good idea to jump straight into full conspiritard. That's beautiful. There was some damn barbaric stuff that went on there.I thought she said she slept with some *nerds*, like it was a fun thing to do after it came out. Angry birds pig?Sorry, do you mean physical landmarks, or is that some kind of poetic way of describing words? 

For whichever you mean, do you think other countries didn't also have them?The Columbine killers and Oklahoma bombers planned their attacks as a group. A "lone wolf" (Muslim) shooter was recently apprehended on a train. Australia recently had two isolated individuals inspired by ISIS (one in a cafe, another was 15 years old and did his attack down the road from his school).

There are cultural differences, sure, and we can draw circles around each one. But the similarities are also obvious and persuasive. Haha. I'm going to put it down to the right personality having the right job. 

Thanks for being so helpful to us with your questions. It's a great reminder too that this business model is still possible :)Lots of countries have states or provinces bigger than other countries - Canada, Australia, Russia and others - it's not unusual. Saudi Arabia must be #2Er, yes ones full of people. China has a lot more of those than America, for instance. North Korea doesn't have anything to do with Communism - it's a nationalist hereditary dictatorship, theoretically based on the "Juche" philosophy. Yep, nothing beats face time, as in the non iPhone variety!

Have funLittle Australia is the second biggest coalition contributorEr, no. The Saudi King was nearly killed by ISIS, ISIS is in a life or death battle with the Iraqi government, etc etc. "If you like what I'm saying in this comment, you might like some of my other guilded comments..."Out of a bunch of random shitty comments that was definitely one of the bestIt's well known that petitions have zero effect. They are by people who don't know how the system of government works. No one is paid to consider petitions in an official or unofficial manner. If you can show a law where it says otherwise, please post it. That's not in your job description though. Petitions are an undemocratic system. They are not even a real system, it's something some people made up that sounds official. It has a population similar to one large US stateArmy trainers, special forces, intel, Air Force and support. I'm not sure if there's Navy too. Who is to say what "significant" means? The number not signing is always going to be the most significant one. Not at all, it's the lazy way. 

The correct way is to call your local representative and make an appointment to discuss your concerns. 

That's what they're there for, that's what companies do, and that's how you actually make a difference. Then it's a problem with the page. 

It should say "petitions have no part in our democracy. If you have concerns, speak to your local member or get involved in politics."Ah great! Yes it's amazing what's out there now. Best of luck!You should, if you feel strongly. You're lucky to have an influential representative. You can also call up opposition members in your constituency for them to put on the pressure and speak to their party. There would be 100,000 people who would want gay people castrated, adulterers stoned, and black people deported. 

Petitions have no part in our democracy (thank god).I think you're underestimating what a massive undertaking that involves. It's much more likely to be right wing terrorism just on probabilities, so until we know that's the safest wild guess to make. Republicans, most probablyNonsense. Australia stopped these 100%Actually, that's not too far from accurate. It's nearly impossible for a terrorist to get a military style assault rifle in Australia, and attacks like this are zero. Republicans, yes. That's just on probabilities likely True though.  Donald TrumpThere have been no cases of 4 or more random people shot in a public place. 

The last public shootings involved 1 or 2 people being killed, precisely because of the difficulty in obtaining semi auto weapons. Lol, Breitbart. 

But yes, terrorists have only been able to shoot *one* victim, each. 

There was one case of *two* being killed. That's in 20 years in Australia, and a daily occurrence in the US. The Monash guy killed *two people*. The couple of other random public ones killed *one*. 

In 20 years, that is what success looks like. The fact is, events like this can be reduced to nearly zero, with no danger to public safety.This seems to be the most detailed information at time of posting. 

http://www.latimes.com/local/lanow/la-me-ln-up-to-20-shot-in-san-bernardino-active-shooter-sought-20151202-story.html

TL;DR: Work argument, three guys go home and get guns (because they can), return and spray the room randomly with magazines full of ammunition. 

Utterly tragic, unnecessary and preventable. This should have been a fist fight quickly broken up by others. I would advise you to look at countries who have actually solved the problem (every other developed Western country), before some extreme and untested fantasy solution. Australian gun owner here. You don't have to ban guns. You just have to take out the 20% of guns most often selected by mass shooters to practically solve the problem. 

The remaining 80% can safely be left with law abiding people, to hunt, shoot for fun, or whatever else they want to do, in whatever quantities people like. 

80% (90%, 95%) of the benefits come from 20% of the actions - The Pareto Principle. You're implying 6 jets making daily bombing runs is a small amount, that's just not the case. There have been a couple of hostel fires, that have themselves been dealt with by (fire safety) laws. 

It's a direct example of the Pareto Principle in action - reduce the worst 20% of the guns (the actual amount), and see 80% (- 95%) of the beneficial effects. I don't like what you say, but I'll defend with my life your right to say it.No, in Australia it goes:

"First they take out just the top 20% of gun types most chosen by mass shooters."

"Then they reduce mass shootings by 80% - 95%."

"Then your rights are fine and people are safe."

It's called the Pareto Principle, and it works well for everyone: gun owners and non gun owners alike. It's tragic. I'd guess if they had to think about it for just a few hours longer, they probably would have started to put their mind something else - getting a beer or the neighbor playing the radio loud or what was on TV - whatever. This was likely a work argument that escalated way out of handWhat's crazy is you don't even *need* to worry most NRA members to stamp down on these tragic events. 

You can take out the top 20% of guns used in mass shootings, and reduce events like this by at least 80% (the Pareto Principle).

Heck, Australia's 20% led to an over 95% reduction in mass gun killings. 

Amazing results are sometimes predicted by this rule... but people don't understand some basic tools we have at hand.Ah that's True! That movie is truly nutsI've sen that profile picture in 3 different countriesHunter here too. The point is 80% of guns can be safely left (like I use) and these events can also stop. Only they don't. Our family hunt in Australia and it's fine. Any rifle designed to kill humans, not deer.  It's important to realize that even Australia's "strict" gun laws only outlawed the worst 20% of guns - those chosen most often by the worst mass shooters. 

This 20% resulted in an 80% (actually 95%) drop in mass shootings, as predicted by the 80/20 rule. 

There is no need to argue it's private gun ownership, or safety from mass shootings. You can have both.You can go to the individual raw government agency stats if you'd like, but this makes it easier (The Age is perhaps Australia's most respected newspaper, and the situation is largely the same 10 years later).

\u2022 Under 700,000 guns removed from over 3,000,000 total (approximately 24%)

\u2022 19 years 7 months later 100% reduction, to zero mass shootings (call it an 80%-95% reduction, to allow for different "mass shooting" definitions)

\u2022 The laws remain popular with voters generally, as well as farmers, hunters and sports shooters, who are largely unaffected

http://www.theage.com.au/news/opinion/a-safer-place-after-howards-gun-buyback/2006/04/27/1145861484114.html?page=fullpage

The Pareto Principle is fascinating in itself, and can be applied to an amazing range of seemingly unrelated phenomena. 

https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pareto_principleI'm guessing because lots of other people had guns :/

This simply does not happen in my country, you don't even need to think about it. Violent crime **did not** go up dramatically when Britain and Australia "banned guns".

Australian mass shootings went down (to ~zero, for 20 years) just by taking out the fastest shooting 20% of guns. 80% of guns were left. 

Murders in Australia - not the target of the laws - just slightly declined.

The UK result was similar I believe, just as common sense would predict. That "European shithole" probably has 4-5 times less murders than the US - and a hell of a lot less mass killings. College ethics regulations have a lower bar than criminal law. 

A professor openly supporting domestic terrorism is very much a sackable offense. &gt; What happened to violent crime in australia after the gun ban?

Australia is generally the safest it's ever been. 

But how would you like to define "violent crime"? If you can tell me how in a way a government body would collate, I'd happily do it for you.

Spoiler alert: like murders, they're probably better than 1996 - but unrelated to the gun ban.You're all over the place now. 

But you said something about dead European babies earlier. The US has 33 countries that do better than it in child mortality - most of these are European countries.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_infant_mortality_rate&gt; how can we effectively stabilize the region after ISIS has fallen?

"The Czechoslovakia solution". 

If that country can decide it was an artificial construction, and would be better off as two separate countries, then surely the people of Iraq and Syria should be allowed a similar process.&gt; European nations with strict gun control laws have substantially higher murder rates than those that do not. 

\u2022 US gun ownership is *four times higher* than Finland. 

\u2022 The US has a murder rate *four times higher* than most developed countries.

\u2022 The US is as dangerous to a European as *Mexico* is to an American (4x more dangerous).

\u2022 The US also has a higher murder rate than a number of African countries - Malawi, Senegal, Sierra Leone, and others.

&gt; Are you really suggesting we emulate a country where people have to be 18 to buy kitchen knives? If you want to live in an over-protectionist society, then by all means move to one.

\u2022 Many US States deny alcohol to consenting adults. The USA banned *lawn darts* in 1998, because three kids died over a 20 year period. 

\u2022 The US has a Schizophrenic attitude to "freedom", seemingly applying it very selectively, and against common sense.Why is the US rate higher than a bunch of very poor, ex war-torn African countries, then?

Gang warfare, poor education, lack of access to mental healthcare, etc...

Guns are like adding petrol to a fire: not the only cause, but they obviously make everything much, much worseSomeone in the family is 22 times more likely to be shot by a gun in the house than an intruder is. 

But safety to you, to.IDK, you're probably 100% reasonable. 

I'm just exhausted from arguing with people from

\u2022 the only Western nation with weapons/ high murder rate problems

who argue that 

\u2022 all the other (safe) countries are really awash in some hidden secret violence, and have much worse weapon laws. 

It's like debating someone from the USSR. Eventually you just want to say "yes, your system is better", and leave them to it. There were two mass shootings in America *today*. 

There have been 1000 mass shootings in the 1000 days since Sandy Hook. Guns are like petrol on a fire, it makes everything - poverty, domestic violence, argument on a freeway - much, much worse. 

In many cases it makes things worse that would never have been fatal otherwise. America has a higher murder rate than a bunch of African nations, including Malawi, Senegal, and Sierra Leone. All of which have gang problems, poverty, and a lack of mental health support. 

The truth is that guns exacerbate problems, including ones that would still be problems - just not lethal quite as often. That's a False concern, and a False argument. 

Following the 80:20 rule, or the Pareto Principle, Australia only outlawed 20% of its guns - those 20% most frequently used in mass killings. 

This reduced the rate of mass shootings by 90-100% (depending on your definition).

Sensible gun ownership generally was not affected in any meaningful way - speaking from an Australian family of long time gun owners. 

Knocking off the military stuff is the only smart thing to do.The Constitution says nothing about every man and woman being their own policeman. 

That's just something average Joes have made up and run with. Check the US on the link you just posted (3.7 per 100,000 - most figures put it at 4.7 but let's go with yours). 

Now compare that number to Malawi, Senegal, and a bunch of North African countries. 

Your link even says the USA is worse than Egypt and Libya, which have a complete breakdown of law and order, and undergoing the most violent civil wars of their recent history. You're right, but borders are still important at finding a solution. 

In Iraq for instance, Sunnis rely on their Shia enemies in the army for security, and we rely on the Shia army to half heartedly fight ISIS in Sunni territory. 

In this situation, it is in moderate Sunni's interests to support ISIS. 

If there were a Sunni state, the army would be moderate Sunni, there would be no Shia threat, and moderate Sunnis would be *against* ISIS - and stop it from taking control again. Besides being a particularly poorly written amendment, the Second Amendment is itself a gun control amendment. 

If its authors had wanted no regulation on guns, they would have not made any qualifiers - such that there be a well regulated militia (meaning well organized or efficient, up to you), or that guns be limited to the context of a militia (which, at the very least, supposes some kind of meeting of men, and one would guess discussion of duties).

None of this relates to guns being owned by angry, antisocial individuals, whose only enemies are law abiding citizens. Gun regulation is inherently part of the American experience, its traditions, and its Constitution. HahahahahahahaLolAre you serious?

She was giving information to investigators about the actions of conspirators leading up to the worst crime committed in the US's history. We're all on the bad end in some way, even if it's just viewing others' tragedyNo it was really great. 

I'll always remember the time the American guy said the problem wasn't guns, it was apps. Maybe you meant the little iPhone earbud microphones too. It's still pretty funnySpeaking as a social Conservative, largely from a Christian perspective, it's a sad fact that right wing terrorists (a loose term combining extreme Christians, racists, and anti-government extremists, all with political aims) have killed more Americans than Islamic terrorists since 2001. Left wing extremists had that dubious honor before the 1990s. 

It's instructive that you haven't heard about these types of attacks, especially given the vast media attention and public resources (at home and abroad) to fight Islamic terrorism. 

It's up to us to keep an eye out for *all* domestic threats. If you'd like more information just read through every case of domestic terrorism since 9/11. You will find more than enough examples to give you a picture of a very serious issue. 

Edit:

People have asked for sources. I'd just add this is not meant as an *argument* - that one is not worse than another (left wing terrorism is still a threat according to the FBI - eg. animal liberation organizations - particularly to property. Some law abiding forestry and agribusinesses deal with that stuff every week).

Rather, I figure if I'm asking moderate Muslims to become critical and speak out about Islamic extremism, then moderate Conservatives like myself should do the same by example. 

It has made for interesting and chilling reading, and is well worth doing. 

There are lots of sources for the "right wing more than Islamic terrorism" claim. I've chosen NPR but there is also the NYTimes, FBI submissions to congress, and others. But this is a breezy read. 

We should keep in mind that there are *more* right wing extremists in the US, so we should expect a bigger number. Also massive resources have gone into fighting Islamic terrorism, so we can assume it would be bigger otherwise. 

Hopefully everyone can agree we should combat terrorism in whatever shape it comes in. 

http://www.npr.org/2015/06/24/417192057/right-wing-extremists-more-dangerous-than-islamic-terrorists-in-u-sExcept people get killed by these terrorists. Many leave detailed political manifestos. No, the modern period began with Muslims (usually mistaken Indian Sikhs) killed, sometimes en masse, in "revenge" for 9/11.

It includes anti abortion attacks, which are constant, and attacks against government employees and facilities out of a libertarian or extreme right wing agenda (often clearly stated as such). They kill more in the US, so it's a legitimate self defense position. Haha. They all doIt's not an argument or opinion (all types of terrorism is bad!).

It's easily checked though through looking at the individual cases, however. The FBI naturally have it as a major concern. America is around the 85th most diverse country, just behind Spain. It's about average in Western democracies I believe. It's a pretty good time marker, it's when we've stepped up our attention and reporting on these types of things. Not just in the US but worldwide. You're around 4 times as likely to be murdered in the US than in similar Western countries. 

So if you want to start profiling then the real danger is "Americans". Every country is unique, and the US compares itself to other countries in every other area of public policy, from schools to health, air transport to junior sports. That's pretty interesting. 

There are few areas where the 80:20 rule doesn't hold. Australia used it on weapons involved in mass shootings, so the 80+% reduction happened there. 

I have no doubt something similar would work on general homicides, but they are so rare in Australia the need hasn't come up. 

Interesting to think about, though. Source added to my original comment - thanks Added aboveI like your way with words broYou know it's possible to move to countries where there is no need to carry any weapons, no risk to life?Right. Yet doesn't want to move anywhere safer, which by the sounds of it is anywhere there is civilization. In the country I live in, *one person seen in the city with a gun* (not drawn, with no negative consequences, other than the fear that instills in others) can be a leading national news story. America is about 4 times more dangerous than Australia though. 

That's like an American going to Mexico - you'd expect a bit more than that for Mexico. Australia and America are both beautiful places. 

The three most dangerous animals in Australia all came from Europe though - the horse, the dog, and the bee. Open carry can especially scary for tourists, probably more scary than someone yelling "Allahu Akbar!" in a crowded cinema. You just don't know what they're going to do. 

In my country someone "open carrying" (no victims other than fright) can be a leading news story on national news.Actually more people die of spider bite in the US than Australia (per capita), and snake deaths are pretty much similar. I figured it was a joke? Most of their animals are cuddly, furry and sleepy. You can't hype up drop bears too much, but you're right about the other stuff. It's more dangerous camping in the US than Australia, IMHO. Except for taking enough water. A non insignificant number of Australians have been shot going to the US though. One guy was just jogging in a park. 

The only Americans that I can think of that died in Australia was some kind of diving boat thing.  Nonsense. Have you been to Germany or Sweden?Even per capita though. That'a four times safer down under. I find Australians quite PC. Especially over sexism. It's almost the opposite of the cliche. 

Crocodile Dundee, for instance, was really a film against racism at heart. Australia does have the third highest proportion of immigrants in the world though. About double the US. I once Donald TrumpDomestic violence is a major slice of US gun fatalities. That doesn't affect tourists either. The US rate is 3.8, it's 1 everywhere else.I saw an Australian counterterrorism official being asked about the likelihood of people getting guns like the Paris attacks in Australia. 

He said it's pretty much impossible, which reassured me. They should make a drop bear hurricane movie. For public awareness as much as anything else. Al Gore, Joe Biden, Dick Cheney. Yup, you get the picture. 

Some people just get used to being listened to by the media. My country could be either, depending on which country this is happening in. Lol, have an upvote for humorActually if you go by murder rate, a bunch of African countries are safer... including North Africa (which is currently going through some s****)Actually, interesting point. 

There were two ISIS inspired attacks in Australia in the last 12 months (ish).

Because it was impossible for then to find semi auto guns, all they could find were single shot weapons. 

Both only were able to kill one person, before police opened fire with their unlimited bullets. This is a really thoughtful comment. 

Maybe there should be a "safest city/state/country" awards, with gold medals like the Olympics, to get some nationalism into safety.They make amendments for a reasonOne or two in Florida I believeYou generally have to have a reason that fits the type of gun in Australia, and a magazine isn't really needed to shoot kangaroos. 

Self defense isn't allowed as a reason as the murder rate is so low.  That's the same for every democracy. 

Actually you could say the US has less of that, due to the power of lobbyists, including the NRA. Belgium actually has US style laws, and is a major problem for Europe. 

A lot of organized crime guns go from Eastern Europe to Belgium, and from there wherever the criminals want (except the UK and Ireland). Yes, and this is his point - there should be better warnings like that so tourists know where to avoid in the US. You'd be surprised. I would have zero fear of being mugged driving around Europe, Canada or Australia. Driving around the US it would be something to keep in mind. Mugging (and car jacking) is really only something I'd worry about in the USA, South/Central America, Russia and South Africa.It'd be disappointing if you didn't know this in advance. Actually, these sorts of warnings (both ways) are quite often a joint decision. 

It's a major issue to upgrade them - it took Turkey shooting down a plane for Russia to do it. Two, husband and wife. 

They dropped off their 6 month baby beforehand. 

It's getting out of hand. I bet in 5 years people like this *bring* their baby.  Gun control FTW. They were fortunately very low impact events. I've travelled to the US quite a bit. 

In Washington DC the (nice quality) hotel drew big red marks on a map around places we shouldn't walk at night. We went out for a stroll, and white people "bunched up" on street corners to walk together. 

Similar hotel warnings happened in New Orleans. These were *good* locations in two of the most popular US cities for tourists to visit. 

None of that happens as a tourist in Australia - go to a city and you can walk pretty much anywhere. Mass shootings are statistically lower in cities where every toddler open carries. Lol. Wow. This is before you chose your username I take itSigh. 

The laws were aimed at reducing *public mass shootings*, not murders. They reduced mass shootings to zero for now twenty years. 

(Call it a 90% reduction if you want to quibble about "mass shooting" definitions.)\u2022 Pad (paper stuck together on one side)

\u2022 Feature length movies

\u2022 Usable production of antibiotics

\u2022 Swimming

Life on earth also started in AustraliaActually Australia has supported America in every major war its been involved in since our country started, and is currently the #2 largest contributing country to the war against ISIS.

This contribution has even included wars the public didn't agree with, but supported helping on a friendship and alliance basis. Many - including those who wrote the Second Amendment - realized it needed to be periodically updated and changed to be worth fighting for. Limit guns to the national guard then, since that's your definition of a militia. Because Australia is around four times safer than America for murders, and police response times are in the single digit minute area in capital cities. 

There is literally no need to have a gun for self defense in Australia. Horses are the most dangerous animal in Australia. In Washington DC, LA and in New Orleans - three of the most popular tourist attractions in the US - I seriously had to think about personal safety.I'm pretty confident a policeman isn't going to shoot me, as a tourist, in America. 

A random male I've never met in my life? I have no way of knowing what his character is. 

I assume a k-bar is a crowbar. I would be worried if I saw *any* weapon, but a gun in particular. I can outrun a crowbar. Not a good comparison country, of course. That's the thing though. Americans can *practice* shooting. 

The Australian ISIS guys had to secretly get single shot guns from a friend of a friend... keep it secret... it's a completely different level of militarization. If you don't know, I suggest you do some kind of basic drop bear safety course if you come to Australia. 

The Parks and Wildlife service have printed information at airports - simple dos and don'ts you can read on the shuttle bus.

You can sign up for certified courses there too, and they're good quality. The private ones can be really good or really bad, so it's best to just go with the government ones. If it's an Australian tale, I bet the last known fatality was "*maybe* a child in 1903, but even then we can't be sure".France and the UK I'd agree with you maybe. Germany is almost too serious in its safety, I always feel (don't cross the empty street!)There is a Wikipedia homicide ranking link on this page. 

Most Western countries are 1 per 100k, the US is around 4 per 100k. Sure, you have to trust your own sources. You can go through the domestic terrorism fatalities one by one, if you prefer. 

Start with the Islamic attacks, because there's so few, and see how long it takes to overtake that. The Sikh temple attack was particularly horrific. Driving from LAX to Downtown, then out to Disneyland. I definitely didn't feel safe off the freeways, particularly after dark. Our intelligence agencies are pretty good, I'd be surprised. 

One was a kid still at school, and that would have raised some eyebrows, also. No, this is actually a major topic of discussion at the moment amongst our agencies. 

It's practically impossible for a terrorist to get a Paris-style gun. No reasonable person would think the death toll would be as high in Paris with single shot guns. I love everywhere I've been in the US. Just walking from the hotel into the middle of the city at night has been an issue, which is a very normal thing in Europe, say. Perhaps this is replying to the wrong comment? Mine was about FBI designated political terrorism, not workplace attacks. I thought it was Romania? That s*** is fast. Would you call Mexico low? Because that's 4x the US rate. 

400% is a very large difference. There are no ferries into Australia. Customs catches enough guns and ammunition for both to be prohibitively expensive on the black market. Hand made guns are both extremely specialist and much less efficient for a mass shooting. 

Australia is remarkably successful at stopping attacks, whilst maintaining excellent access to guns for professionals. Comparing it to the US or mainland Europe is not really possible. Are there any USSR or Russian jokes about the west?This idea wins, I think.

If you like this article, make sure you read Malcolm Gladwell's recent one on mass shootings and riot theory. 

It's about US mass shooters, but they are of a similar phenomena, I think. His piece describes how progressively *less* likely killers join movements, as a critical mass builds. 

"Tipping Point" also looks at the virus-like growth of negative and antisocial actions, and how they can be stopped. 

Also see Alain de Botton's book "Status Anxiety". Basically it looks at how ego consolations have always been with us, and the full "palette" of options we have (religion, Bohemianism, etc.). 

Great stuff. 

Enjoy that road trip around Mexico, then. 

And this stuff is real - one of the five or so Americans I know in person was nearly killed by a serial killer.Japanese art and craft stores are just the best thing on planet earth. 

I imagine there's some folks there that took what he said pretty seriously. Story group does that... I imagine it's a pretty back and forward processJay Jay is the key to all thisAgreed. Rope swinging, eye tentacle popping up in trash compactor, goofy dialogue please. I'm sure Ford would. JJ would love it too. It's not my fault...A lot is C3PO, and they can keep him going foreverKathleen has straight out said it's about the Skywalker familyDownload Brick tonight! It's such a joy. 

First film, self financed, mainly shot at his old high school - yet somehow a classic, too. Start with Looper, but make sure you see Brick. I wonder how Rian and Kasdan know each other. Working on these films obviously, but "he is a friend" seems more than that?I'd love to see the deserted buildings of Detroit though - on my top 4 things to do in the USA list. That's usually a joke, but I'm not sure in this case. 

The #1 most deadly animal in Australia is the horse, animal deaths are about the same as the USA.That sounds an awful like nihilism, which is seen as erroneous as essentialism in Buddhism. 

Once we recognize the Self is constructed and everything is *really* inseparable, including our consciousness, who is to say how we will see the rest of the universe differently?With dying insects I figure they wouldn't want to be on their back (unusual), would rather be outside (familiar), and would probably be under a leaf (less visible to predators).The "opportunity to expunge its negative karma" is a slippery slope, though. 

There are stories of Mother Theresa's hospice withholding basic painkillers from poor Indian patients at the end if their life, so they wouldn't miss out on this "wonderful opportunity" to work away sins, and get closer to God.

I say we do what we can to reduce suffering. Google "Zen Flesh, Zen Bones", the whole book is online as a PDF and is great :)Haha. I'm in!What you say is True. However anti abortion attacks, anti black gathering attacks, and anti Muslim attacks are much more readily labeled as right wing extremism, and regularly are so by the FBI. Sovereign citizen plots are another. Also, anti Jewish attacks where the perpetrator was a member of Stormfront, or other NeoNazi groups, are fairly easy to classify. 

Personally I find labels for all attacks against strangers - by left, right or Islam - part of the same phenomena. I'm talking more about here just where law enforcement can find these people. And as citizens, what to look out for (and try not to inadvertently encourage).I personally do think there is a connection between what makes us happy, and what we "should" do. 

But that should be tempered with a logical plan to make this work in the real world. 

Ultimately trying things out and testing them is the best way.Wow. Any guess why? Like the originals have some kind of unwanted associations to a French ear?Did she like the "the one with Han in the thing" actual movie when she saw it?We don't like her either. 

She should be careful. UncannyThat's not True at all. If you look at the lowest murder rates in Africa, generally they have some of the better governments. 

Libya, which I'm guessing you're referring to, is an outlier here. A recent report found AK-47s to be around $15,000 on the black market in Australia, and as low as $700 in the US. 

Ammunition, also, is very difficult to get through Australian customs, and the small amounts are very rarely shared. It is very cool sounding, almost like a new David Bowie album ;)

Thanks for that, I'm happy you approve of the changes!

(Sacrilege for French Belgians, I know, but I also feel the same about Tin Tin, Snowy, Captain Haddock, etc.!)I'm not sure how much you follow investigations like this, but the FBI would have wanted to build up as complete a picture of the months leading up to attacks as possible - who they met, where they went, what they did - down to the greatest detail. 

The possibility of their making copies or printing a letter as a group - and seemingly excited about it - would definitely be keenly sought information. I tried to find it again for someone else a couple of weeks ago, and had no luck. 

But it was a survey of black market prices around the world that was tweeted by some news source - prostitution, drugs, weapons, and worse. 

The obvious reply is "there are vastly different types of AKs", and I believe that was reflected in the comparison.I know it's a joke, but Australian animals and American animals have about the same kill rate. The only difference is America has more deaths by lightning, Australia by fishing/drowning. The Australian answer was basically the Pareto Principle in action, otherwise known as the 80:20 rule. 

This says, there's nearly always an important 20% that controls 80% (or more) of results. 

Australia looked at which guns were the 20% of guns most used in massacres, and got rid of those. That left 80% of guns around, but led massacres to drop 80%-100% (really the latter, but it depends on your definition). 

So yeah, 80% of guns stayed, and mass shootings of humans ended. Yay, statistics!The US banned lawn darts because some people died, anything's possible. Weird because they were done by democratically elected Conservative representatives, and overwhelmingly popular there. The cops don't go there because of guns, it's a vicious circle. You've hot to break the chain sometime. Funny though, guns were an integral part of Australian culture and its frontier self image. "Roo shooting" is like deer shooting in the US. The farmer's lobby is really powerful. It is a remarkably similar analogy in a lot of ways. 

What it took was a massacre and a *Conservative* leader saying enough was enough. (He was kind of like your Ronald Reagan.) This let it be accepted by practically everyone. Gun massacres and terrorism don't really obey all those rules though. Australia had a bad massacre problem, a love of guns, and instead of acting slowly, fixed the massacre issue all at once. Gun massacres can end in a few months (which was the Australian experience). To dramatically reduce massacres you don't need to get rid of guns like you're describing. Just the ones *most often chosen* by the mass shooters in the past. 

80+% of benefits come from the key 20% changes. The important thing in Australia is 

\u2022 Guns and ammo are *expensive* on the black market. Young punk kids can't afford them (and have to do something else). 

\u2022 Importing groups like the Mafia *keep* their guns, as they're too rare and too much of an advantage. No reason to sell them to an angry school kid or office worker. 

\u2022 It takes time and connections also to find an illegal gun. Most people can't, or their anger cools off. 

\u2022 Guns that kill a lot of people quickly aren't really imported, as there's no need when even semi auto pistols are pretty rare. What's ingress?Simple one shot, or low magazine rifles for hunting are cheap and legal for that - just get a permit in case the gun ends up in a crime later. If it never does, no problem. Australia did some tricky "stages" thing too. 

1 - you get $250 if you hand in your old pistol this month!

2 - you don't get anything this month, but you don't go to jail - which you will if we find you with an illegal gun on you

3 - whoops, penalties for using a gun in a crime doubled!

4 - there's an amnesty if you hand your guns in this month

Etc etc. All these little things got them out of the hands of average criminals. Aussie laws were just for 20% of guns, of a certain types. The US already bans weapons of certain types. Plenty of guns will remain.None of those bombs worked though, thank god. 

Taking the most usually lethal weapon out *does* make an unusually large difference. Yes, laws like this definitely need to be national. No way would Australia's have worked if it was just a couple of states. Australia's buyback was for "market value", I believe.Same everywhere though. Australian mass murdering kids used to copy American kids' clothes, guns, plans - you name it. 

Now there's no real city gun culture they send snarky tweets at their enemies instead. Australia just banned 20% of their guns, not 100%. No way that's unconstitutional. People still smuggle drugs into Australia. Guns are *much harder*.

\u2022 Can't hide as easily from X-rays

\u2022 You need to store them secretly *forever*

\u2022 The whole ammo issue

\u2022 Drug demand goes up if there's not many drugs. But gun demand goes down if there's not many guns. 

Etc etc. Same in Australia though. We just learnt to focus that love on the sleeker, slower loading types. People worry about gun laws making it worse before it gets better. 

But it actually just gets better - less guns make even *criminals* feel less need to carry them around. Australia's coastline is as long as the equator. Drugs get through all the time. Yet guns don't. If there's less guns in the community, there's less demand. 

You're imagining how it might be with *current* demand. But it's the opposite. Must have some kind of engineMass shootings are way, way up. 1000 in 1000 days since Sandy Hook. 

When this article was written it says "two a month". It's so different. 

- guns not for self defense

- old guns

- few big cities

- within an *actual* militia contextNo police bribes in Australia. Or Western countries generally. I agree. That's why it made such an impact when the old guy interrupted me - me seeing Mt Fuji was too important to him :)

The UK though - that's funny. I live there quite often. The UK is just "normal" to me. That's a little silly, like saying 9/11 was "just" a plane crash, and not statistically important. 

Massacres are a type of terrorism, and they have a terrible impact all over the globe - that's what they're designed to do. A lot of news outlets. Here is a quick google - it's now up to 1,055 in just about as many days

http://www.theguardian.com/us-news/ng-interactive/2015/oct/02/mass-shootings-america-gun-violenceThe financial part was *not a financial incentive*, it was just because our Constitution says if the government takes something away, you have to be fairly compensated. 

The Australian laws said if you had the small proportion of guns of a type used regularly in massacres you *had* to hand it in, those types were now illegal. Handing them in to your local police station was compulsory - you just got a check when you did. That's what I'm saying though. Australia changed that day (for the better). And removing guns also removed demand. It's the opposite than you'd expect, when they're not around the desire to have them disappears, it doesn't go up. \u2022 France is very safe: *All of Paris' hospitals combined* usually get around five gunshot wounds a year! 

\u2022 The murder rate across Europe, Australia and Canada is less than a quarter the US. In Asia, it can be as low as *thirty times lower*.

\u2022 Every historian will tell you that "the Jews should have been armed" is a False view of history. The Nazis were widely popular to regular Germans, there was no chance, or even really desire, for resistance. Even France - with the next strongest military in the world - could not stop them. 

To answer your question, nearly every developed country is safe enough to not require a gun for personal safety - except perhaps the USA. From the Australian perspective it was a change in the law, with due financial compensation. It was much simpler for us to call it the "buyback". Definitely. I've seen some funny stuff in Indonesia, that's for sure. Every car company is moving to some kind of zero emission model. You're right it's a smart move. Much safer than an investment that predicts current fossil fuel use to remain (which, although rare, some are still doing).I think the answer is there's room for both to make lots of money.And $2B is not much money for such a huge business opportunity. There are $1 billion conference halls and small city football stadiums that cost that much. Tesla's cheaper car is on the way I believe. All BMWs are going electric. And in 10 years I'll be able to get one of those second hand BMWs ;)BMW just announced no more petrol powered engines will be designed by them. 

They are going to move their entire range to electric over the next 10 years.

http://m.nasdaq.com/article/bmw-going-all-electric-cm519474The BMWs will have a small, gas powered generator to charge an electric motor, so you can have the performance advantages of electric, but also pretty much unlimited range if you need it. This is your chance then, do it!I know right? I remember reading about Tesla, and it seemed like the most improbable, I'm going to lose a lot of money style, failure. Even the name seemed funny. 

100% wrong on that!Totally. I'm from Australia and that's medium sloppy. Agreed, I don't arrive *anywhere* new after dark. 

Chirpy morning time is the best time to see if you want to stick around someplace. I've often thought you could make a lot of money betting against Redditors who are certain about long shots. News excitement levels:

Force Awakens: 20

Rogue One: 10

Episode VIII: 40

Han Film: 15

Episode IX: 20Lawn dartsHe could only afford low production values, so he put something like 7 years into an amazing script. Really interesting and kind if the opposite (in a good way) than most films made today!On the internet too?As a foreigner it's perhaps even more frustrating. Like the Israeli/Palestinian conflict it's on our news every day, but we're powerless to change it. 

At least in the US you can regularly talk to your congressman about it.The Australian laws just took out the deadliest 20% of guns to work. 

There's no need to go full alarmist about changing the Second Amendment. Yes, but mainly basic hunting types, that don't easily allow for gun massacres. 

20 year run without a gun massacre still holds. Like the right to lawn darts, the right to eat certain cheeses, the right to have a beer when you're 20, and the right to bet on the Super Bowl?It's disingenuous to say gun massacres are statistically insignificant. That's like saying September 11 was just a bunch of plane crashes. Australian here. Massacre type guns were compulsory to hand in. But it was with compensation and we were overwhelmingly happy to do it. You could chose not to, but you couldn't buy ammo for the deadliest ones, and if you were caught hiding them you'd be in massive trouble. Internet 101: don't trust any neutral sounding website you don't know the organization behind. Targeted gun control does control mass shootings, though. Just taking out the worst 20% reduced Australia's by over 80% (some say 100%). The biggest cognitive error - from an Australian ex gun owner's perspective - is people guess 100% wrong what will happen after a targeted gun ban. 

After experiencing it, just reducing 10% (or in our case, 20%) of guns makes you *less* want to keep yours. Suddenly it feels lighter, and more safe. Which sets of a virtuous circle. 

People seem to fear an *explosion* of illegal guns, but in actual fact it's the opposite. 
This. Property taxes should be doubled, with a 50% rebate if you live in it or rent it out (with proof). You're welcomeWhatsth at ?Australian researchers looked at the types of guns chosen by mass shooters, at home and abroad. They also looked at the weapons that caused the largest amounts of casualties in those events. 

It was found that easy to reload, military style rifles, and semiautomatic pistols with a certain magazine size caused a disproportionate amount of deaths (over, say, bolt action rifles, or six bullet revolvers).

This 80:20 rule is found in just about every human endeavor - a relatively small amount causes the great majority of effects. 

Fortunately, these types of weapons were only 20% of all guns, and amongst the least useful for the large proportion of gun owners - hunters, farmers, sports shooters, etc. It was this able to be passed with almost unanimous support.  Sure, I guess. 

For the record, our family rifle was on the "ok" list - we had a use (farmers), and it was a simple bolt action 22. 

Yet we read all of the debates, decided less guns was an important thing to support, realized we could farm without a gun quite successfully, and so voluntarily handed it in. That's really interesting. 

What I want to hear more from is Americans who have lived in *Australia* for a number of years. 

We hear people say dumb things like "if guns are illegal, only criminals have guns!", and "crime spiked in Australia after the gun laws!". Both of which are unTrue, of course. 

It would be great to hear some Americans say "yeah, I was over there. It seemed really safe. Everyone likes it and it seems to have worked out quite well."I'm from a rural family in Australia, I followed the debates pretty closely!

The Australian laws largely targeted semi auto and fast reloading weapons. 

The way they chose to define that was you needed to show a reason you required the type of gun you were applying for a license for. 

If you said you wanted a semi-auto AK-47 or M16 variant for shooting rabbits, you would be denied - as a single shot hunting rifle would suffice. As *no-one* "needed" them, they were effectively outlawed. Very efficiently it got rid of urban criminals, office workers, and disaffected teens stockpiling slightly modified, military grade weapons. My point is gun massacres have a nation-wide effect (even international effect), in ways that are not irrational. They are designed to instill the maximum amount of fear into everyday people, going forward. 

They are definitely worthy of removal by those employed to keep us safe. I'm not sure what your point is. Some guns were made illegal or required proof of use. Some were handed in anyway. The total was 20% of all guns in Australia. 

It's just interesting that, if done well, 80% of guns can remain in a country, and mass shootings can cease. Yes, but mass shootings have a copycat aspect, and are designed to make a few hundred million Americans feel unsafe. They're a pretty unique threat. Again, by choosing random victims, posting manifestos, and picking very public locations, mass attacks have a much greater impact than a mere death count represents. Stop wasting money on air safety then? That's absurd, laws are based on the wants, needs, and desires of the population - guided by research and successful precedent. Yes, but much less often. 

We are talking about the 80:20 rule here: the smallest things we can do that have the greatest positive impact. Ugh. Even that website's name is a combination of nationalist imagery, and a sniper position. 

Find an article from a respected newspaper of record if you are interested in the facts of the example. 

Besides quality research, the next biggest evidence is twenty years of voter satisfaction with the laws, and the end of the fear around endless copycat attacks.\u2022 The "gun ban crime rise" is a myth. Only an American who hadn't visited Australia would look at the statistics and project that onto it. It simply does not make sense to anyone who has lived here. 

\u2022 Lower amounts of some things certainly does decrease demand. This is True for countries with weapons too - if your enemy has 2,000 bombers, you will want 2,001. 

It's called an arms race, and the only thing that stops such a vicious cycle is things like the arms treaties between America and the USSR. 

Heck, even the police (and most criminals) don't even need guns in many Western countries. Not True. 

\u2022 It made my household much safer from risk of suicide. I can think of three occasions when they might have been used. 

\u2022 It allowed us to escape an irrational faith in a weapon to provide safety, and made us much less fearful as a result. 

An analogy would be finally selling the parachute you wear when flying on American Airlines - if that parachute was actually a serious risk to you and your family. I think we should control mass murder suicide media coverage, in the same way that we control suicide media coverage. Partly for what you say, but also partly to reduce copycat attacks. 

I doubt that's likely, though "freedom to know what happened at my local cinema" yadda yadda. 

The other idea - of government *or* for profit media installing rationality in all areas of our lives is even more improbable. Actually this is False. Guns are known to researchers as a "completer", increasing both the likelihood, and success, of suicides. Differing suicide methods is one of the main reasons more men die of suicide attempts more often than women. 

Australia's laws were targeted *only* towards reducing the public murder of strangers. Yet, suprisingly, researchers found a statistically significant reduction in Australian suicides, particularly in rural areas. This has been labeled "the icing on the cake" of Australia's laws. 

The above fact has led to some to suggest we have gun laws targeted *specifically* towards reducing suicide, but these have not have the same political imperative or impetus, and potentially face stronger farmer opposition. Oh, I see what you mean. You're saying *my family* gained no statistical increase in safety from suicide in giving up its gun. 

This is False. We have a family member who suffers from severe chronic depression, which has a 15% fatality rate. We gained a significant safety increase by removing a gun from the house, at no cost to our safety from intruders, or any extra work on the farm. Net benefit. This would be a local tax, targeted at wherever a significant problem exists. 

If communities in Florida think it's fine to have a lot of unoccupied holiday homes, no incentives need to apply. 

If, however, like Vancouver empty houses are pushing workers out of reasonable commute times, then apply financial incentives to remedy the situation.  If you think the risk of death by an intruder in Australia is *anywhere* near the risk of death by suicide for a depressed person in Australia, that is a very warped world view. 

\u2022 The risk of death by an intruder in Australia would be something like 1/10,000,000

\u2022 The risk of death by suicide to a chronic depressed person would be something like 1/100No, these things are very different:

(1) An ammunition shortage, but you can still legally buy it, keep it, and find it in some places

(2) A nation-wide banning of ammunition, an increase in customs checks, most illegal ammo handed in to police and shown on TV being destroyed, increased penalties for hiding ammo, and buying any requiring massive payments to organized crime who have very low stocks, costs are very high, and they don't want to sell to anyone outside their group, much less get caught. 

The latter is what we had, and I can assure you, the desire to break the law and find that ammo decreases to near zero. 1) Drugs are completely different to guns. I don't know if I've explained in this thread, but guns are much, much, much harder to smuggle than drugs. And demand actually drops if other criminals and civilians don't have them. 

2) Australia and the US were different, yes, but perhaps more similar than any other example, with the possible exception of Canada. &gt; Let's ignore wildlife

What?

This discussion has a very tenuous connection to reality.

I live in Australia. The amount of lives that have been saved by someone having a gun to shoot (or scare off) wildlife entering a home would be... at a rough guess... ZERO. In the entire history of humans having houses here.

Do you think we would shoot a killer koala? 

Perhaps a polar bear that smuggled aboard Norwegian Airlines?

All of your "reasons" for guns in the home are fantasies, and the risks are very real. It's a shift in awareness I don't think I will be able to achieve through this conversation. I love this stuff, I've read about that too. The Wisdom of Crowds book has great anecdotes about it. 

It would still be illegal to win money, I'd guess. 

I was more thinking about how ridiculous it is what we apply laws to, and what we don't. Lol. Australian here, who would have to drive for three days, and still need to cross a sea to get to another country. 

Somehow, with this disability, we are still able to know how other people's date systems work. &gt; That is the dumbest thing I read all day. 

&gt; Their gas engines aren't going anywhere

Yet a source has been addedIt's the vibeBesides it being a really funny movie, the other achievement was selecting a cast, style and scenario that could last 6 movies, no mean feat. 

If he can do that with George Lucas' Star Wars, that is a massive achievement. And create an entirely different timeline, with everything different *and* similar to a classic timeline. Interesting point. 

Lost was, of course, a "give me a series about people stuck on an island" request from someone else - a different gig. Lawrence Kasdan (Empire Strikes Back writer, et al.) recently came out saying Rian is making "some weird thing" for VIII, which I couldn't be happier to hear. See something else then. Hateful 8 will be amazing. He very nearly turned down Star Wars to do it. Actually, Spielberg has always been very close to Star Wars, and has even helped out on some aspects of previous films, inducing at the story stage, and even setting up camera shots in the prequels. He made lots of money out of A New Hope. 

He's watched The Force Awakens three times and given notes. Link to that comic? That sounds awesome!He has mild autism/Aspergers, I think. Poor grasp of emotions and other people's opinions, and an obsession with technical issues and geeky details. Let me know on this web zoneAgreed. He's like agreeable script antimatterMaybe it is?I've watched Star Trek a bunch of times. Still good. Rushed typing. 

Buddhist politicians working within the Anglosphere - UK, Canada, USA, Australia, NZ, etc. Oh man, thanks so much. 

Amazing it's like the worst script you could ever write, yet has it all in there (somewhere). It shows you just to jump in, and develop lots of stuff before you narrow or down. 

It really helps to understand all of the subtle complexity of A New Hope, too. He had a lot to reference!

Anthropologists, Owen and Beru - of course!Yes, we weren't stuck by a linguistic prison over that, thank god. 

The only one that affected the 1996 gun laws was "people have to be financially compensated if the government takes something away". Which was fine.We dodged a bullet by not having a second amendmentMore isn't better! 

It all depends on the results - and Australia is doing great in nearly every area.Being informed is actually overrated, if you can believe that. (It's complicated.)

Very well educated people believe some very False things. Eg. Many people who studied Economics believe higher minimum wages leads to less jobs (which is False).

What you want is people engaged with the electoral process - speaking to their representatives, voting people in or out if their situations improve or suffer, or if bad decisions are made. 

Voting on past events is as important, or more important, than voters trying to "steer" policy. 

Full voting leads to not only a more balanced electoral system, but better decisions, too. You're forgetting that a Constitution is amended by voters, if it is ever needed. Laws are also decided by elected officials, who have to face voters. 

It may be that this provides for a more flexible and advantageous system in some cases - like Australia's 1996 gun laws, which wouldn't have been such an efficient and responsive success otherwise. They also offered the USA every advanced secret technology they had (Britain was probably the most advanced tech country in the world at the time), for the use of US factories I believe. 

The USA said yes, which turned out to be an *excellent* deal for them. Kangaroos have two vaginas... Thanks!&gt; Protection from the tyranny of the majority

Which is how the Constitution is accepted in the first place... just an *old* majority, not the current one. 

The main difference is slow versus fast change, which can be negative (gun laws) or positive (some aspects of freedom of speech). What the other guy said. Pull up a chair, you're in for a fun ride. I couldn't get into either. American Graffiti seemed like a slow episode of *Happy Days*. (a) He doesn't want to, he wants to become known as a director

(b) Diversifying the creators and appearance is a smart move by Disney. *One* of the combinations, at least, is going to be a standout classic, and can serve as a model for future new Star Wars movies. 

Think of them like having lots of unique Star Wars babies, instead of just one (in three parts).They've said it will set up a three part story, yet work as a single film, too. It's part of the gig. (1) I've already mentioned elsewhere in this thread about how weapons are vastly different to drug importation (much harder), and how a removal of a significant percentage *does* have a positive impact. 

Remember we are discussing *mass killings* - these are usually done by previous non-criminals. They are amongst the easiest gun crimes to reduce by reducing a few gun types. 

(2) You're misunderstanding what the process was like in Australia. The Conservative Prime Minister had to wear a *bullet proof vest* to address groups of his own major constituency (he later regretted doing so).

It was the opposite of "sure, take away these guns". There were serious discussions at nearly every kitchen table, in a way I can only liken to a country going to war (perhaps more serious than that). There were protests, angry callers on the radio, threats, etc. 

But what won the day was a rational public debate, politicians willing to lose their jobs for a cause, and a willingness to try. (Probably, too, seeing Americans being even worse at contemplating changing things.)  

The affection for and acceptance of the gun laws in Australia, ultimately, came from experience of their success. We thought murderers would come through the windows, and they didn't. Guns fell off the radar. People could focus on other things.

It was one of the hardest things we've done, but also - as a consequence - one of the things we're most proud of doing. Maybe you're talking about Rian Johnson. He has written and directed all his movies, so it's appropriate they don't muck up his system. But also he would have had enormous *cough - oversight* support. It's not a new theory, but I think it has possible meritGreat list. 

One red flag that took *too long* for me to work out is a partner *enjoying* talking about things they did that hurt others.

Example: a sexy new girlfriend who tells "funny" stories about cheating on her ex. 

In the early stages you think "Wow, she really didn't like her ex. Great. She's much more into me! We will be different." 

Later you realize it shows massive lack of empathy on her part. It's normal to feel regret for acting hurtfully, not joy. 9 times out of 10 she will use (or *is* using) that same lack of empathy against you. 

As they say - marry the person who speaks to your better nature.

My other red flags:

\u2022 I am mentally thinking "if I *were* to break up, when would I do it?

\u2022 I'm letting the relationship break up by obvious neglect (even if I rationalize what I'm doing)

\u2022 You can't agree on some major life goal, like living abroad or having children, and have deferred talking or acting on it because it's too fraught, or difficult. 

\u2022 I'm caught in a "should I stay, or should I go?" mental trap. That nearly always means I should go. (Secret everyday fears and sunk costs are probably 30% of the reasons I'm staying.)

Best of luck to anyone dealing with these! And an obligatory mention of the book *The Five Love Languages* if you want to become massively smarter about your current relationship. I could have saved some good relationships with that book. That was so great. 

Unfortunately I semi-often get girls with stable boyfriends telling me they used to have a crush on me :/Excuse me for asking, but you seem really knowledgable about this wealth stuff!

I sometimes bump into Hollywood stars (A to B level) through my job working at public art museums (run by various governments, not private galleries)

Normally they come in just after closing, in that window of time when staff are still around, and "average" people have left. Or on the "closed" day. They look around, and just do the same type of things you and I might do. 

I've always wondered... are they buying this access? i.e. Paying some unadvertised fee, to visit alone? 

Or is this well known to institutions, a world wide "privilege" - employees just let them in, because they know (like a handicap) crowds are difficult for them? 

Or is it *not* really cool, not officially, but someone in middle management is just doing it... perhaps to get some famous person face time?

It's always puzzled me (and slightly annoyed me that they might get this, over a regular person, without benefit to the institution). 

There must be some system that would make it all make sense, but I've never worked it out. 

Any insight would be great!You could say the same thing about 9/11 - a blip compared to gun deaths or road crashes - but that would be silly. Terror *is* terrifying. Oh man, you're good at this stuff! 

I never thought it could be about wanting to be told they're attractive, or fear of rejection (as I guy I care little about either, just success$.

You could totally have a Dan Savage style advice column.

Thanks so much. No, you missed my point. Terrorism - including massacres - hurts more than just those physically injured or killed. Sandy Hook is less about a "small" statistic, and more about no parent feeling completely safe about leaving their children at school. 9/11 is about every American being horrified, and also afraid a little to fly. 

All these things matter. I'd rather have 10,000 people killed by their own actions in car crashes, than the same number killed in more 9/11 style events - they are completely different things. 

Do I care about the right to defend oneself with a firearm? No, because I know it is the cause of problems. It's a little like saying "do I care about the right to drill holes in my head to relieve headaches?" Sure, it's a "right" I guess, but a pretty damn silly one.You're saying like you have to get rid of all guns. 

Australia only got rid of 20% of their guns - those most used with massacres. And practically stopped gun massacres overnight. 

80:20 rule is amazing. Exactly. The US stops hand grenades getting to high school shooters and domestic terrorists just fine. 

It could easily do the same with military style rifles.Type of gun is more important than number of guns. 

Australia's success is because they *left* the useful ones, but *banned* the "kill a lot of civilians and police quickly" ones. 

I'm pretty sure they have just as *many* guns as ever, but crazies and terrorist gun massacres are now near 0. White powder for black powder. Paris is a very short drive and no border from Belgium, which has US style gun laws. 

And in fact that's what happened - the guns came from Belgium and they drove down. 

The French laws *were* a deterrent to them, they just could get around them. 

Obviously they need better laws in Belgium, or border control. All the Paris hospitals *combined* usually only get around five gunshot wounds to treat in a year. I love that they didn't though. 

Intelligence, and just British a Police badassery. The murder rate in the UK is small, around 1 in 100,000Only one serious injury, no deaths. I love this idea. 

I'd award you a Nobel Prize but of course I'm just one vote on the committee.She's going through therapy to get over the therapy. Later on Fox News: UK doctors have to take so-called "efficient" public transport to get to work! They are too poor to afford a car or helicopter under the single payer system. He could tell a similar story in parallelThe intelligence services agree with you. I'd love some really good psychologists to spend like a week with this guy. 

"What news do you watch"

"What did you think about X attack"

"When did you decide to do this?"

"How many friends do you have"

Etc etc. It's the Harry Potter one that knows ahead of time. "I would have gotten away with it if it wasn't for you pesky kids!"It's a source of pride they're not armed, and it feels nicer being around them. "Ah shit. We're out of police! (rifles through drawers)"Australia too. Islands are handy real estate these days. The point is, no gun mass attacks in the UK, Australia, Japan, etc. Which is the same thing as here in Australia. 

How come you guys have the same results, but we seem to have to do most of the debating with gun nuts on Reddit?This. 

Have a bad day at school or get angry at the news and you can't suddenly start stockpiling them. Theology rekt"It's *my* day on Tuesday. C'mon don't be like that brah"Haha. Conceded. More fighting fire with petrol, IMOThey're pretty amazing. I lived in London for a couple of years. 

I couldn't tell you the amount of times I was pleasantly surprised by something the police were doing and thought "respect!"Actually, proper access to religion is seen as *reducing* the likelihood of radicalization by the authorities. These guys are usually lost boys or recent "converts". That's someone trying to talk to a strangerBoth. 

Same shit - young men go crazy, whatever the justification. It's just better if it's punk rock or whatever. 

Worse - the atomization of media is leading to an almost infinite amount of subgroups finding each other. Racists, Islamists, Extreme Libertarians, etc etc. It's actually a bit counterproductive to say that. 

Research is doing great work in finding how this and say a white attacker on a black church have similar causes. 

It's distinct, but also related. "You got to narrow it down brah... Assad, YPG, Turkmen...which bit?"This was really successful policing. Credit where credit's due. Plenty of nihilists go on massacres. It's 20 something males that's the common denominator. Username checks outBelgium has shit laws and governance.Sure, you can if you like. They are still amazingly rare. This was probably a Brit.Check out Malcolm Gladwell's piece on Riot Theory in the New Yorker. Link in about his fifth latest tweet. Like white nihilists don't shoot up schools"We all know if everyone had a gun this wouldn't have happened"I think he was speaking horse tranquilizerThe news already voluntarily doesn't cover most suicides, even "spectacular" ones, to not encourage more. 

No reason why murder-suicides can't have a similar policy. Streakers and most suicides are left out of the newspapers and TV news, too. They found they can lead to copycat chains of events. I think actually the average Canadian is wealthier than the average American now The Australian solution, that used the 80/20 principle:

\u2022 Remove the most often used guns in massacres (just 20% of total guns), reduce the amount of massacres by at least 80%.We're talking about gun massacres in this thread, by crazies and terrorists. 

Less fast shooting guns obviously works. Lol. I don't think you'd like GunPolicy.org's advice on what to do about gun deaths.

Belgium is the hub for on sold Eastern European guns, and doesn't even have a single government equally overlooking all of its territory. No, there is zero international border controls around Belgium, very different. There you goWe don't have armed attackers in this country. 

We have good policing, and hardly any guns available to low level criminals. 

It's like far people saying to skinny people "let me tell you how to lose weight, you have no idea."

We do have a good idea, we've worked it out, and you should listen to us. Hah! I actually know a bit about that, as setting up online businesses is my job. 

1) Get a nice Wordpress site. Make it look professional, eg. base it on Dan Savage's blog on *The Stranger*

2) Start a twitter and reddit account/subreddit on relationship advice. Offer free answers. Focus on quality work, and always post answers on your own site first, and link back to this on both places for traffic. 

3) When you get a few thousand visitors per day (not difficult), monetize your site. 

4) Take your audience numbers to small and medium sized publications - online and off. Offer your column, for a fee or free (this is about growth). Still post to your own site first, so Google sees you as the author. 

5) Leverage their larger than your readership to increase your audience numbers, income, and repeat step 4 with a bigger publication and fee. Perhaps you don't need to run your own site any more (perhaps you like it).

6) You should now have a full time income either way. Supplement it with books, speaking tours, TV slots or whatever else you enjoy doing. 

Thanks again for the tips, they're really good! 
Er, I don't?

I vacation in Europe and Asia. Much safer, and no desperate need for health insurance. &gt; as long as a single country on any continent has guns

Asia has Afghanistan, porous borders, and yet also has some of the safest countries in the world. 

Asia has some safer countries even than the UK, Europe and Australia.

America *is* the problem you're worrying about, not the countries across the border. It certainly has more guns. 

Australia, too, showed you only need to remove the fastest shooting 20% of guns, to have an over 80% reduction in gun massacres (the Pareto Principle). Mass shootings stopped 100% immediately after the ban, and stayed that way until today 20 years later. No other changes were made. 

You can change that to 80%, 90% or 95% reduction if you prefer different definitions. Regardless, it was the Pareto Principle in action. America is around four times as dangerous as China, Korea and Indonesia (the latter a Muslim majority country, with over 300 million people, violent separatist and religious conflict, and some of the most impossible to patrol coastlines in the world).

The US is around 20 times more dangerous than Singapore, which is pretty incredible. 

Even some ex war torn African nations are safer than the USA. Firearms are like adding gas to a fire, they exacerbate existing problems (including domestic violence, disputes and suicide).

You don't need to be a genius to figure out that without guns, the number of lethal events in the US (4x higher than in most other Western countries) would be remarkably fewer.Apply that logic to September 11The JJ Abrams Star Trek "DVD extras" making-of documentary is also really good. It has some great information on how they invented new techniques that make CGI become "practical" effects. 

Hard to explain, but really useful for understanding how he'll go about The Force Awakens. Pulling hair is pretty much vanilla now. I know I'd be disappointed if there wasn't *some* physicality like that, from both parties actually. Yes, and now imagine if every Japanese house had firearms.Exactly, it's got a "capital of the world" feelingI thought of that, but it looks like they're on different planets. Sure, and 90% chance an ambiguous comment is likely to be sexist on the internet. 

I just didn't want this thread to degenerate into "rough sex is bad", either. I'm trying to think of something we have better statistics on than crime. I think I'll go with sports. Which there aren't any, at least not in connection to 99% of civilian guns. "You should be able to buy cereal, and if there's any doubt how this is interpreted, it's within the context of having a good breakfast."It's an amendment, we can make it say whatever we want. 

"In 2015 the citizens voted to update it to, 'you can have guns but nothing crazy, and don't cram us in when we fly economy, too.'"Both completely made up and False.

You will never hear someone who has visited or lived in Australia try making that up. I'd put it the other way. 

Stats are what they are, for whatever complex reasons. 

If there is a significant issue in any area, you can take targeted action, one of which is reducing the ease of access of whatever is involved. 

Canada has not such a massive problem there, so it can stick with the status quo. Australia did have a problem with gun massacres, so it applied a targeted measure and it stopped. 

I have no doubt Canada could do something similar if its citizens thought gun homicides were a top 5 problem. You're implying that Australian arson and stabbings didn't happen before the gun ban, and that the US doesn't also have arson and stabbings in addition to their unparalleled gun carnage, both of which are unTrue. There has been an attempted arson in Australia just about every year I've been alive. I could name three with mass casualties from the 1980s/1990s that haven't been put up on Wikipedia yet. It has been such a serious issue that we have police driving around the hills in peak season looking for them. 

Obviously, the solution to reducing arson attacks and reducing gun attacks do not have to take identical forms.Yeah, and that's while Presidents have had more guns. Checkmate. As someone who likes Michael Bay movies, it checks out/r/threadkillersRed M&amp;Ms are like 100%People playing Anakin Skywalker have a low working again rateThat's how you can tell how old they areJust aboveIt's just a different culture. We say "we think you have very bad policies."But I thought having a good guy with a gun nearby would make everything ok?Come move to Australia. As in, not even joking. A friend of mine was "next in line" on a serial killer's list, but they caught him first. 

I only know five Americans IRL, and I can logically tell have a warped sense of how common this is over there.Bill Cosby too. But he bounced back.Speak to your people over there. I think Aussies and Brits should be able to sign each other in, or be able to have a borrow of each others' passports. 

I'll put my keys under a flower pot and meet you in Hong Kong. Tibetan Buddhists love debate, but they also have fun with it. So I'd suggest laughing and not taking things too seriously. 

One of the central things in Buddhism is you should test things yourself, and see if they are True. Ultimately it should make you less self cherishing, and happier. 

So if anyone claims something should be done, you might ask them how they tested it for themselves, and how it makes them happier to act in that way, beyond hopeful faith and dogma. STEM graduates are over represented amongst terrorists with a degree, it's from probability analysis that has been done to try to catch them. The Paris bombs were unusually well put together. They have experts. There are reports of stolen biologicals protective gear in Belgium after the attacks. It would be remiss of us not to look out for their access to all types of mass casualty weapons. No that's cool getting noodlesParis is about the same size as Chicago. 

Would Chicago see around 5 gunshot wounds in its hospitals per year?That's just the nearest city the same size, the US doesn't have many in that range (most are smaller and a couple are bigger). 

The next nearest in size is Houston. How many gunshot wounds would Houston's hospitals see in a year? Serious question, and just out of interest. Edit: I'm an idiot

Pre edit:

No, it doesn't work like that. 

Having police not armed actually reduces the need for criminals to be armed, and the data supports that. 

Americans seem to have this idea that less guns means criminals suddenly grab more, like orcs overwhelming the Shire or something. 

In actual fact it's the opposite, less guns de-escalates things, and people chill the **** out. The 80:20 principle still holds, no matter how big the example. 

You could have a trillion guns, reducing the biggest killing 20% of them still reduces killings by 80%. Haha. Yes it was totally woosh. I didn't see the context.

I've got 40 gun nuts firing their weird world views into my inbox. I shot quickly back in self defense, and I'm sorry there was a little collateral thread damage.Ooh Jeeze, I remember from the news they were stolen from a hospital... boots, full bio gear, maybe even some equipment. Maybe Google "Belgium Hospital stolen attacks" in google news. 

It was partly why they were so frantic with arrests after Paris. 

That wasn't the creepiest thing in the news then though. Remember the "female suicide bomber" (sic)? Neighbours of her elderly mother said two cars full of scary big bearded guys, with Belgium number plates on the cars, drove up to the French house and *cleared it all out* right after the St Denis raid. The thought was they were using it to hide stuff. 

The idea that there are a team out there, all quite happy to work together to collect obviously connected evil stuff, without one contacting police on the side, is too horrible really to think about. No, I hear you, and while I think gun control and (voluntary) press control would both work to drastically reduce copycat attacks, they are both inordinately difficult. 

Just because Australia, the UK and even US states have done it, I actually think "magazine size control" is the easier of the two options to achieve.Google "The Pareto Principle Wikipedia" for the research underpinning of the 80:20 law. 

Then look at the Australian mass shooting experience, or the UK experience, for an example of that law in action. 

Whilst doing both, remember what a disincentive having to make 5000 rounds of ammunition that won't get jammed would be. 80% of the mass shootings would come from a certain group, yes. 

I would guess it's something like US males aged between 17 - 28.

But then again, it's a lot more preferable to lock up 20% of useless bits of plastic and metal than 20% of the US population. We're talking about mass attacks here though, which have definitely gone up, and how to stop that phenomenon. 

They are like a virus or infection running through a hospital, and we're trying to look for a way to put the breaks on that. 

Studying countries that have had a similar infection, and have stopped them, however "radically different", is well worth considering. Comment tree liberty has to be watered with the blood of virgin men now and again. It would work. A few important tips from Australia's experience:

- You have to pick the right 20% of the thing you want to reduce. Analyze police reports from past crimes. Find out which type of guns, ammo, way of obtaining them, or whatever it is that appears 20% of the time but results in 80% of the casualties. Pick precisely. 

- It has to be nation wide. So do it over the country, or install international borders around Chicago. 

- Once you've isolated the cause and stopped more getting in, phase them out. Offer purchase price for hand ins. Then offer no jail time. Finally, increase penalties for hiding them or use in crimes. Have periodic amnesties and of course no bullets or repairs for these types of guns. 

Once you have done all of these, the negative effects will likely decrease by 80%. No, we're talking about mass attacks, which by definition terrorize every American, plus even foreigners, like the one writing this now. 

You're forgetting that you're free to buy just as many new guns after this - just not the ones that regularly contribute to massacres. Excuse the thin offering diet advice to the fatThe first thing the Australian laws' authors would have said was "this will only work if it's nation wide". 

No one would have voluntarily handed in their guns if a criminal with a gun could just drive in. 

Americans died for the right to *adjust* their Constitution democratically. Including the other experiment, "thou shalt not drink alcohol".Actually, the island part is not important. China is very close to Afghanistan, and is able to keep guns out. Drugs get into Australia and the UK fine. 

You just need a basic border for gun laws to work. With less guns around, the arms race fizzles out. 

The "overthrow tyrannical government" thing is funny. What you mean is "win a civil war", as the "government" would need millions of willing Americans to hold down even an unarmed country. 

There's never been millions of Americans willing to do that in its history, nor a need or possibility on any horizon. Who knows if you could beat the US Army if there was. 

So you're basically saying "I'm fine with 16,000 unnecessary deaths a year, to guard against an unlikely win against my unlikely fantasy".

Rubbish. CA limited mag size and it didn't lead to "treason and Civil War". Same thing. I would (and do) feel safer around Singapore police than US police, but here's the stats for Indonesia, China, Korea, et cetera. All countries with imperfect borders near violent areas, and all much more safer than the USA. 

https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_intentional_homicide_rateNone of those crimes went up a single iota Australia's gun laws. In fact they continued their downward trend. 

You're forgetting 80% of Australian guns remained, just those based around massacre use went. 

For a glimpse into this reduced gun future, Australians (like my family) immediately felt much safer from petty criminals and home invaders after the ban. 

A home invader, or mugger, was much less likely to have a gun, because carrying one meant their penalties were doubled. Also illegal ones cost 100 times more than they did last week.

Criminals too didn't need to own guns. Their competitors had less, and for protection from civilians they could now just run away, they were less likely to be shot in the back. 

We had all the same worries as you, and my father considered hiding his gun. But in every way, less guns just made everyone safer. 

Social policy generally takes a move to the left with time. That's what "progress" is - becoming more "progressive". 

Just like gay marriage, drug decriminalization, votes for women, removal of the death penalty, removal of the confederate flag from government buildings, removal of slavery, removal of segregation. Gun laws are an inevitable process, and California today is Mississippi tomorrow.  Well, you don't need to worry about that for a lot of steps!

Before that you have a popular newspaper column, and with that a large twitter following. 

Requests to appear on TV, podcasts and radio come from that, from your reputation or slant on things (gay, conservative, feminist, whatever), something controversial you said that went viral, or because you have a book to sell and your publisher just books you in :)The UK justice system was exported all over the world, through empire, and if you like the UK system, you'll like Canada's, Australia's, New Zealand's, and a bunch of others. 

Some today even have improvements over the UK system in some areas, and either way, these countries continually look at precedents in each other to update their own systems (eg. drug laws, gun laws, copyright laws, etc etc.). British police work in Australia, Australian lawyers work in Hong Kong, etc. 

I agree the UK system is excellent (especially in policing), but it's much of a muchness which of the ones I've mentioned are "best". America has dramatically increased mass shootings *relative to America*. Mass shootings in the US are higher than ever. Playing with stats to deny them can't help there.TL;DR: Everyone likes Americans, in person. 

But when anyone online says something silly or unTrue ("single payer means death panels", "guns make you safer", "the US won WWII", "evolution is False", "we're more free, wealthy and democratic"), then these sort of things necessarily get pushback. 

And it's a good thing, too. If there was no pushback, people would just go on saying sillier and sillier things. It's not exactly like you're saying (and thinking), though. 

Canada, Australia and New Zealand *were* the British Empire, they weren't copying it. There was freedom of movement, and like parts of London or the UK, it's impossible to divide. Australian lawyers went to London, British Lawyers went to Canada. Chiswick lawyers went to Greenwich. 

So it was all the same thing. Then, when these countries became independent, it became a symbiotic relationship, where they all influenced each other. The Australian and New Zealand systems influenced women getting the vote in the UK, for instance, perhaps the biggest legal change of all last century. And so on. 

So the "Britain first" idea you're saying is a Colonial idea, and very much False. The strength of all these systems is precisely the opposite - their ability to learn from each other - without prejudice or bias - and change. 

I think that's the UKAre you a bot? This collection of sentences makes no sense. By the old definition America is having more mass shootings, and by the new definition America is having more mass shootings. The widespread distress - and the reason we're talking about American mass shootings and not Indian or Chinese or Indonesian or German or Canadian mad shootings - is due to their increasing barbarity, banality, and frequency. 

Malcolm Gladwell in the New Yorker recently wrote an article describing how it is no longer just psychopaths, but a wide range of individuals that are shooting strangers, and more frequently. Including in churches, cinemas, on camera, after giving birth, and other unprecedented ways. 

If we leave aside the very real increased secondary trauma of the above for a second, and just look at frequency, what definition of mass shooting would you like to pick, and that we can compare?Is it True that that Prince is now the King of Saudi Arabia?No one would do that... I don't believe you. Work harderIt's largely to do with better reporting. 

You might remember a certain Australian backpacker being charged with rape for an alleged hole in a condom. Some "shithole African" countries outperform North America in certain quality of life statistics. Tinder is just more efficient than bars, and most single people already have a lazy hookup option, and/or an ideal partner we are pursuing. 

I'm not sure where she thinks a random person - who is neither ideal, nor comfortable and easy to manage - would fit in that new situation.I think we've argued on here before, but I tip my hat to you here. Great commenting. Under "Research" you should add http://AllMusic.com

Type in a favorite artist and see all the bands (a) they were influenced by, and (b) who is influenced by them. 

Click on your new artist discovery and it gives you their most representative and important tracks to listen to to see if you like them. 

Then repeat with all *their* influences you like, further and further down the rabbit hole. The romantic bonds we make with others are conscious and emotional, but underneath there are some deep, biological processes going on. 

You can deal with your emotions, to some extent, and you can deal with your thoughts, to some extent. But this will be a little like scooping up your bathwater from the bathroom floor as it continues to overflow for a while. These thoughts and emotions are going to keep on coming, and challenge even an experienced meditator. 

Some people get over breakups very quickly. I am not one of them! But I've learnt to turn off the overflowing bath I need a quick, mutually honest short term relationship with someone new. 

Actually, I need two of these, one after the other! After the second, my biological drives are well and truly focused on new situations, and I can deal with the rare emotions and thoughts about my ex when they come up. 

Just from your post I'd encourage you away from thinking "we had a perfect relationship. The only down side was sex". A perfect relationship often needs to have sexual compatibility as perhaps the *most* important element. Or it at least needs a mutually satisfactory way to deal with any differences. 

A Christian once recommended to me a book called *The Five Love Languages*, which shows really beautifully how sex (and other needs) can be a deal breaker for one partner, and yet almost invisible for another. Even if there is all the love in the world there. 

Good luck - it's one of the most painful things - and I have loads of sympathy for you. Remember that you have never been as smart as you are now, and your next relationships will only be more mutually satisfying and skillful. I'd recommend a book called *Mindfulness in Plain English*, which is a really easy to read, great start. 

Anything by the Dalai Lama is also great for a beginner. 

Enjoy!Well for starters, you're more likely to be murdered in the US than a bunch of African countries - Malawi, Senegal, Sierra Leone, and some North African countries. 

I forget the other statistics but there was a great "guess who does better on ____" article a while back, that was full of statistics that don't fit our "shit Africa" stereotypes. So you think this latest ISIS couple, or the Columbine shooters, all had a psychotic breaks, at the exact same time?

The truth is a lot more interesting. Have a read of the Gladwell piece, even if just as an interesting read. 

For starters it shows that "events" and "media reporting of events" are two linked phenomena, that influence and feed off each other. Amazing. 

http://www.newyorker.com/magazine/2015/10/19/thresholds-of-violenceBla bla about the size of Australia and smaller than Canada. We know. Some wording of that makes a weekly appearance on /r/shitamericanssay

Sometimes it's "we're the most diverse country on earth due to all the different people here", which is wrong by about 84 countries. In China they're both nothing. Actually Americans pay more healthcare taxes than some countries where healthcare is thereafter largely free. Check out the world's largest drug companies. Approximately half of them are European. It's just as True the other way around, and obviously folks are just as oblivious. 

Also, pharma companies are for-profit entities. Check out Switzerland. Massive drug industry from a tiny population. Or the opposite argument could be made because - like guns in private hands - less of them decreases demand. 

We just have different views about how to achieve safety. No, per capita is the issue. I do but only if I'm eating chocolate. You might have more. About half of drug costs go to marketing, and sometimes useful drug patents are deliberately kept off the market. 

It's been said that our current system is one of the least efficient ways to develop new drugs if the aim is to help people. Actually, look at mean wealth rates around the world. This is a better indicator of how most people will be after everything is paid for. Many Europeans do much better (Australia and Norway I believe are on top.)Mean is better than median. You're never going to be Bill Gates, or homeless under a bridge. I read once the US made the decision to reduce prices, over increasing people's wealth, as it was easier at the time. The rest of the West did the opposite. We're seeing the effects of some old decisions and it's up to you to decide which you want better. Just check numbeo or numbero or whatever it's calledPlenty of studies say single payer is the more economically sound system. However politics is rarely about what is more logically sensible.Independent umpire here. Between the US, UK, Germany and Switzerland I'll give this prize to Switzerland. 

(Seriously, we should have an Olympics for useful stuff, it would be awesome.)
Australians live 4 years longer than Americans, which is amazing. There are other issues too. You don't have to be as nice to your boss in Europe, and you can take two years off, because you don't have a "benefits" sword hanging over your head. Australian here. Australian tax + private health costs are waaay less than US tax + private health costs. 

And everyone is covered... by airplane across 1,000 miles if you need it. There are few discussions more important. This is kinda democracy in action (comparing options and becoming informed). Europeans probably invented the whole electrons over wire thing. Or at least made it do good stuff. Guys, guys, guys. Let's not argue. Britain invents the sports, and Australia becomes the best at them. I can't quit youtbh I think countries should be best thought of in pairs. 

Like Germany in summer and then Thailand in winter. 

Or the UK and Australia when the weather is best. 

Or living in Canada and regularly visiting the US, when you want to go and see some shows and amusement parks and museums and things. Umpire decisions: 

\u2022 US wins going upwards medal (manned flight, moonwalking and Air Force stuff). USSR solid silver medal. 

\u2022 Britain wins most other inventions, and universal healthcare.I'd be with you on the cars but now they have the Tesla thing. Not everywhere. In some countries everyone has enough for basic survival, and from there it's a personal choice between luxuries or independence/less stress/free time. Most Americans don't know single payer countries usually also have all that same private company malarkey if you want it. 

In Australia it's mainly only worth it to get free eyeglasses every year and maybe a massage. I was on holiday in France when my Australian girlfriend noticed a kidney stone. 

We went to a hospital and they got it out, then the doctors laughed when we asked if we had to pay anything. 

I think Australia's healthcare is free in *other* countries too, due to some kind of exchange deal. 

Super impressed with both countries. Every country has a combination of public and private costs, and that combination is usually less under single payer. 

Calling it "free healthcare" is fine, because good economics is a bit like magic. You can apply that answer to just about any topicYes, but in some countries they do that for *everyone*, even foreigners. They pay less healthcare taxes than you thoughGermany is the one I don't get. What do the homeless, slightly mentally handicapped, or *really chronically* unemployed do about healthcare? Perhaps if they don't have that much money?If you call the police versus a private bouncer, you'd probably just say you got help for free, too. Actually a lot of that stuff is a myth. Germany makes tens of billions out of Greece - lending money, but also their export industries would never survive on the Deutschmark. Germany has gained more from Greece than vice versa. It's just a term, don't take it so literally. 

Oranges aren't always orange but we can go with it. It's certainly cheaper. 

But sure you spend more on healthcare than you need to, but I'm sure there's other advantages from the US political system. Yes but you're a lot more stuck to your employer.You can get that anywhere though. Just pay for it. One casualty. That's actually what success looks like. So you have non profit companies then? One nonprofit iPhone please. They can live there though if they like it moreWatAnd Australia (wealth per person)I love America. Having the death penalty is a Third World hat, thoughAlso British tech. Polish spies and pilots. Actually a whole lot combined together. Personally I listen to most the person who nominates a country they *weren't* born in. 

Which country would you move to? Which do you "emotionally" like?Germany actually likes a low euro: exportsOk cool.

I'm not American by the way, I come from a country that has 100% free healthcare (i.e. you don't need to have an insurer, just pay your taxes if you earn that much.) Also free unlimited length unemployment payments. 

So, the unemployed German has a private insurance policy (with a company of their choice)? And the state gives them some money for that, every second week?

What about when they should be looking for work but they don't, do they ever get kicked off of payments? Could they not pay their insurance bill and not be able to have important surgery?It does though. It's a pretty amazing innovation. BMW are still 10 years behind from going all electric engines. It's a week old memory, but I'll try!

&gt;**\u2022 Paris writer's old edgy idea: Iraq War we know just TV creation.**

&gt;**\u2022 New Iraqi perspective: Paris attack just TV creation.**

It's kind of a well meaning bitchslap, second writer is saying "what you said in 1990 is True and useful now, but it stings a bit when it's said about you, doesn't it?"Welcome. 

You can also apply the old Paris idea to a lot of things:

\u2022 Las Vegas doesn't exist. When you're there, it's just a mass of tar and neon and street signs and taxis. The idea of "Las Vegas" is just in our head. 

\u2022 Arnold Schwartzenegger doesn't exist. When you're there, he's just muscle and hair and words and movement. "Arnold Schwartzenegger" is just an idea on TV and in our head. 

It gets edgier when you extend that logic to tragic events, that people really suffered in. 

But it's a useful way of seeing the world, and especially what we see represented in the media. Thank you so much!

Wow, I'll have to read that all a couple more times for it to all sink in. 

You can perhaps see why Germany is the harder one for foreigners to understand! 

\u2022 America: you're on your own. Ok if you're bleeding and poor we might stitch you up. 

\u2022 Britain: walk in and get treated with no forms. Ok, if you're rich you can also go private, if you want. 

I don't know if they are better or worse than Germany, but they have the benefit of being at least much simpler to explain!Hmm, thanks. This is really interesting. 

I'm actually thinking of moving to the UK or Germany next year, as a student. 

It seems like in the UK I just need to pay my taxes and that's it. But in Germany I actually need to physically make quite a big bit of money go out of my bank account each month to a company, or I risk health troubles. Which is very different!

But it's reassuring to hear they are similar. Nonsense, that's Al Qaeda. 

IS has been able to produce this rubbish because we've let them do it for too long. 

We need

\u2022 Encirclement, precision targeting, local incentivized clearing of their already financially crippled positions (with our special forces' help), and IS collapse.

\u2022 Rebuild the newly separate countries like Slovenia, Croatia and Serbia were, after their civil war.  Actually then you're killing a lot of imprisoned civilians. 

If you warn the civilians first, and they escape, IS collapses anyway, due to no tax revenue. Sure, I mentioned BMW because I knew they were one of the most advanced at moving their whole range across (and still project it will take 10 years).

It really is amazing what Tesla has done from nothing. Can you help me with this issue mods?

My /r/starwars posts disappear when I submit them (I assume to be moderated for a busy sub). But then they never appear again though. 

I don't think it's because of incivility as I'm just a regular Star Wars guy (I may slightly like the Ewoks more than is generally acceptable). (I've never received notice of an Ewok ban though.)

I also don't think it's anything to do with post quality either, as sometimes my same post appears a number of days later and is liked. 

Is it possible to find out why this may be? It's disheartening to just be a reader here, but not to be able to contribute with new Star Wars things :(I love this shot of Boyega - such a fan face!"Bound with chains of gold" as they sayHe's living in London! The BBC went up to him to ask him a question as "an average man on the street"&gt; out of being in the prequels

Well...Plus the information that Rian Johnson asked JJ Abrams to make a few little tweaks to the Force Awakens script... because he had something else in mind happening. 

It all just makes me all the more excited about the project. \u2022 Writer with a proven track record of highly critically respected films, we'll be ok. 

\u2022 Patchy writer and/or Colin "trying it out", disaster and maybe no new Star Wars after IX. 
That was some guy's theory, but idk how credible. If you look at targets there's an awful lot in Iraq that have nothing to do with Assad. When it's someone you don't know. 

The last IS attackers were surrounded by Southern Californians. Oh, I just wanted to see if this is what you mean by this "updated ban policy"Mayyybe three on Han Solo, as there's more than half good people working on it. 

Unless the whole idea of a prequel/origin story isn't doomed to failure - like the Prequel Trilogy, or Young Indiana Jones idea - which I fear it is.Of course they don't. I'm simply saying the idea that it's All Bad Greece is False. You itch my train too, buddyIf your favorite color was yellow and they painted it yellow, it would be hard to put your finger on what exactly was wrongWhat is this post about againSweeetI watched them all again recently. So good. The other way around is fine, it's like the USA and Canada. Which country puts a washing machine in a kitchen?Lol. True but upvote for vigor. It's probably like subsidized housing in Australia or the UK or anywhere else. Fine but a long waiting list.  A friend of mine was paying \u00a35 a week for his own place in London. Some kind of subsidized low income rent deal thing. Not silly though? 

However you word it, a targeted 20% gun removal stopped "strangers killing lots of people with guns".I'm in Australia and we have washing machines in the laundry. 

If you don't have your own laundry - say you're in a small one bedroom flat - the washing machine goes in a communal laundry area shared by a bunch of apartments. Or if there's not one of those, it goes inside your bathroom. 

What country puts washing machines in the kitchen before the bathroom - Germany? USA?Interesting! I've always wanted to get up there (my ancestors are from there), but the trains from London are so expensive and slow. 

How do you usually go from London to Scotland, by hire car or airplane?Well, it's pretty damn weird if we're all living in different parts of the world all the time. SchizophreniaWow. So interesting. 

So normal to some people, but absolutely freaky to me. 

Clean clothes and dirty plates - eww!Well, I think you already know the proper counterpoint for that statement"There can only be one winner"

"Wait, what about if we join sides?"Really? In Australia we say an Australian did heavier than air flight first. 

What's the Brazilian link?Yep. They'll shrug and correct you if they can be bothered. 

Never mistake someone from a smaller country for a bigger one is generally the safety rule. Your theory would have merit if you didn't already ban an enormous range of things, to precisely reduce the likelihood and severity of bad things happening. :(

I want to rub their belliesMost experts think it would be a *disaster* for more Middle Eastern countries - say Iran or Saudi Arabia - to become more involved. 

It's already one the worst sectarian proxy conflict of the century. The West can act precisely because it *isn't* predominantly Sunni or Shia. Sarcasm or not? Because you're going to have to tag itWe're taking our military strategy from cheeseball American TV now, are we? 

Perhaps we should ask George Costanza or the X-Files what to do. That's like blaming people in Vermont for the violence in MexicoSo... this is the level of knowledge about the Sunni vs Shia (vs Kurd) conflict in Iraq, after God knows how many years fighting there?

Imagine how much people knew *before* the war. That's crazy. You can practically see Syria from Cyprus. There are millions of refugees *in* Europe.

Even if you play the "which book do you pray to" game of international responsibility, there are Muslim majority countries in Europe. According to that logic, which Canadian city should we bomb to help end the Mexican drug war?By that logic Ukraine is Brazil's responsibilityI'd think that *particular* Muslim who thought that was a little simple minded. Not Muslims in general. I too think we should refer to the 99c store coffee cup slogansThere weren't any democratic leaders toppled by this generation though"We've thought of two dumb plans... it's all we can do."I'd say this attitude is exactly in keeping with the one you're againstI like how thinking has gone from "it's better for average people in the USA than in Europe" to "ok, it's worse but we pay for Europe". 

The second one is just as much made up nonsense, but it's an interesting shift.  Individual Canadians might feel sorry for lots of people, but there are limited annual places to get in, and it's a competitive system. 

Basically, you're in a competition with everyone else who wants to get in. 

I suggest you list your skills, fall in love with a Canadian, or get a job with an American company with offices in Canada and can transfer you. So might 1 billion peopleI'm not sure what this means, but Europe had similar things happening in the 1990s in Yugoslavia. We just need NATO, self determination for new countries, and peacekeepers. Sometimes borders get outdated. Sure you do. But the Met, Smithsonian, Getty, and MOMA are all pretty outstanding in North America, and up there with the world's best.Wow. It's almost like there was a Frenchman who very quickly went to the moon first, but everyone knows about Neil Armstrong. 

Or did the Wright Brothers do something that was incredibly unique and different to this?It's interesting how *The Force Awakens* discussion has been "oh my god look at this shot of someone being covered by a sheet while they walk from their trailer to a little bit of English forest yet what does Kira on their door mean if you rearrange the letters it spells the Hindu word for light does that mean the name of the production company is a clue for..."

*Rogue One* is more "meh, they're shooting somewhere. I guess they're making a movie."I've totally heard of that last one, but I thought it was in the US. Cool. But didn't your link say he was called Ader?Interesting. I guess that's the Spanish influence?I'd actually be pretty interested to find out I had an extra bagelCool. I only know it because of Americans going over it in barrels, and Superman having his honeymoon there. Fun fact. The attack on Darwin was twice as big as the one on Pearl Harbor, but hushed up do as to not affect moral. I grade first year art theory essays like that all the time, and it's a C. Only because an D is too much trouble to deal with afterwards. It will never go awayHaha. No it's new to me too. 

I bet he never thought "America is going to become the dominant superpower and nearly all trace of my achievement will disappear from most people's awareness". NOTE: ANALOGY OF THE ABSURD. NOT A REQUEST THREADThere is. Subsidies prevent it.

Not only direct subsidies - which are massive - but including the subsidy of one industry being able to hand over all its pollution costs to government to deal with. WatOnly a few. It didn't include a hell of a lot of African commonwealth counTruesActually a light Australian accent is the one used for most international airport announcements. It's the one found to be most pleasant for most nations' listeners (a US and UK accent was either difficult to understand some words, or had imperial connotations).That's brilliant. I'm bringing pomegranate back. Never enforced. The Australian Prime Minister laughs at the idea of criminal offenses for downloading. Lol, all the Australians think everyone will come to Australia, all the Brits think everyone will come to Britain, and I guess Canadians are the same too. 

Seriously, this was normal for most of our history (until the late 1960s), and should be normal again. Together they are a perfect combination of lifestyles, industries and weather. 

If the UK doesn't want to do it, then just let Canada join our AU + NZ one. At least until the nineteen sixties. Barry Humphries, Clive Adams and all that. How did you do it? Are you in some super skills shortage list, or super high income?Wow. And the richest (Australia) would be the most open to it probably (very pro immigration, and very pro moving abroad to live and work). 

Bring it on. Pretty sure we already have free healthcare agreements. Two of those countries have unemployment benefits and work rights. There's no logical basis for that. You may as well say the same about the US north and US south being one economy. In on other cooperation. Just not much agreement on the "what should be legal" questions. Study hard, and use the passport function on your Tinder. America is huge and every American suburb is like a whole another country :PBoth are incorrect. Australia has very strict *plant and animal* quarantine, you can't bring a pot plant in! But a massive proportion of the people in the country are tourists and it's fine. 

Australia is also has the third highest immigration rate of any country, double the rate of the USA. No one is more "more please" with setting people quotas. Deusas, where did that come fromAustralian babes sure are a great combination. 

Fun, relaxed, stick up for themselves, hawt. Jesus mate, you don't speak for the other 24 million of us.Gawd. See you at the rally. I'll be the one without the bad jeans on. That's silly. Jocks are bad everywhere. Wind blows most in the night, sun shines most in the day, and there are a plethora of storage solutions - everything from as simple as pumping water up a hill, to your house/electric car batteries storing energy while you're at work or sleeping. Actually much of the developed works is leapfrogging old technology - landline telephones and grids connected to power plants - and taking up mobile phones, and decentralized, local renewable power generation.

Some of the biggest uptakes of renewables have been in parts of the developing world. Speaking as from which country?

My guess would be a massive move between hemispheres chasing the weather, a bit like to and from the South of France. 

But all in a good, fill tourist places up with money, kind of a way.  That can't be right, I voted for this 70,000 times yes50% of Australians' *parents* were born outside their continentWHICH ARE (TOP 2) EUROPEAN HORSES AND BEESAs an Australian who likes Eastern Europeans, sounds good to me!It has already been calculated that we already have the technology available, we just have to implement it.

Hey what am I saying, we're even commenting on that link.Australian law is you can only due for actual lost business, not punitive damages. 

I'm not sure if anyone was actually taken to court, but if the downloader lost the case, they would have to pay the price of one download of the movie, around a pizza's worth. My father is an engineer who specializes in the economic feasibility of wind farms across the country. I'm told more about the obstacles and opportunities within this subject than just about any other. New nuclear plants are no longer economically feasible in the West and, read the article. Australia is the third most pro immigration country in the world, in terms of the rate of immigration it has consistently asked for. 

It has twice the rate of the USA, double the USA's immigrants per capita, and *more than half of all Australians'* parents were born abroad.

Continuing this maximum rate of immigration for nearly any country has broad bipartisan support. Maybe you're thinking about Alby Mangles Reddit is obnoxious sometimes. He works for an engineering firm, mainly mining, some wind and civil work. 

Engineers are conservative people in conservative industries. Read the link. Seriously, I've met some people more obsessed by New Zealand overseas than any other country. I often say "Australia's pretty good too..." but they're like lasers. Brits, Germans and some US tech folk, for some reason. You're right about the former, I think he's even said as much - ignore the letter (the Prime Minister was a lawyer). 

Not having massively punitive legal cases is also a pretty respected part of the Australian system. And it's seen as a civil, not legal, matter between two private entities. Malcolm Turnbull? Used to be a lawyer, and is pretty tech focused. 

Wanted to move government over to using Slack instead of email. You know Australia's one of the most pro immigration countries in the world, right? It takes in a greater proportion than nearly any other. The majority of Australians are related to an immigrant (usually parent).

The contrast to the UK is like chalk and cheese. But seriously, welcome over! Seeing people happy where they live is the best thing :)haha, Australian who wants to spend some time in the UK here! I think it would all work out pretty evenly. It's luxury (and I guess human nature) to want the thing you don't have already!Haha, no it doesn't work like that... you have to have a source for claims, not debunking them!

It's the producers who are putting pressure on other countries, not the other way around, of course.I live the next country over, and I still haven't :/

Time to book some tickets all around I think!Let's share the warm water stuff and the old whatnotHmm, perhaps they have a British grandparent, or they're on a young holiday visa?Your situation is so helpful, thanks!

I heard they have to advertise, and it has to be a job they can't find anyone else in the EU to fill... do you think this is True for you?

And were you in the UK when you found the job already?I appreciate your thoughts, but respectfully disagree. 

Most pollsters think Trump won't win the nomination, much less the election. Check Nate Silver for the reasons. There's no reason to think we know better than professionals here. 

Abroad, many countries have extreme candidates. France, Russia and the UK have their Trumps. Trump's message is louder because of the power of the US media, but it's no surprise to anyone that there are crazies in other countries. 

The only thing I agree with is that this does further damage domestically - to Muslims of course, but also the polarization of the electorate, general disenfranchisement, government shutdown and non-evidence based policies.Honolululion and lastobeth's "reasonable" quote:

&gt; If any of you watch the TV series 'Homeland', Quinn says something about Syria... He suggests 200,000 soldiers on the ground and an equal number of doctors and teachers. Told that that is not feasible and asked for another solution, Quinn says, "Hit reset -- pound Raqqah into a parking lot". Controversial. But there are your options.

It's one of the most laughably bad things I've read today, and I can't believe it's on TV. It's like the world written by 17 year old. 

For *five years* the President has said a full ground invasion, followed by US forces holding Syria, is never going to happen. A non starter after Iraq. 

Every interview, or address, this fact has been mentioned. Every news article the shows' writers might have looked at. Not even Republicans have advocated for it. 

The second "option", of course, is even more ridiculous. I don't think I need to even explain why, but you never know these days. 

In the meantime you have had endless experts saying "ok, we're never going to invade. But here are all these other, subtler options the President could consider". I could name 20 just off the top of my head, many are well known here. 

Yet the writers chose to ignore even the basic, *what the President is doing now* in the options. Just these lame-ass cartoon ideas even a high school kid doing an essay on "what the President is doing in Syria" would know are not serious. 

The President has just done *a TV address to the nation from the White House* - flags and everything - outlining all of this. In prime time, carefully, and in very simple words, so anyone can understand. 

How this is all not obvious to viewers, much less readers of this sub or *TV researchers* is beyond me. Thanks. Yes I think Ireland and the UK are in the same zone for these things. They're probably eligible for an EU passport. Some people are very lucky!No problem. Even despite all those horrible things, I'm actually pro Trump being the Republican nominee. 

He'll lose, and then we have the *chance* of evidence based policies being supported by both President and Congress. That's better for an enormous number of very important and long lasting issues.Gawd. Embarrassing.I'll make sure I generalize about what all Canadians are like when I meet some Canadian snowboarders then :/There are industrialized countries today operating on 73% renewable, and that is with old technology.

But anyway, life's too short to argue. Nuclear has been massively undercut by gas, and renewables are predicted to become cheaper than nuclear - given quickly changing prices and a plant's 30+ year lifespan. 

TL;DR: It's become smarter business to burn gas, close coal, rationalize existing nuclear, and lock up peak wind/sun locations from your competitors. You seem to have **missed the entire point of why Australia brought in its gun laws**, and why they are justly famous. 

Australia was already a very safe place. Less than one quarter the murders of the US per capita, and no pressing need for increased gun laws. 

Except for one statistic - copycat, US style, public mass shootings.

Australia's laws were specifically targeted at just this problem. 20% of the type of guns most used in mass shootings were removed, **and the less relevant 80% were left in circulation.** 

100% of mass shootings ceased for now 20 years. (I'm not going to argue this 100% figure, argue it with The New York Times, not me. Whatever you might twist it down to is still an amazing figure from such a small 20% gun reduction).

Your statistics on other crimes (which were unchanged) is irrelevant, as they were not designed to have any effect. Of course, banning abortions doesn't stop abortions. It just means they become DIY abortions *and* a proportion of dead women who try them. 

The world and most enlightened religions have worked this out already. I think it's theologically impossible to gleefully write

&gt; Have fun burning in Hell!

and be allowed into heavenWasn't it calculated that Florence Nightingale killed more than she saved due to some other error? Or perhaps injured soldiers did better out of the hospital than in it. 

I forget which, perhaps it's both.Also, a nice yet expensive holiday itinerary. I used to think it was just being especially motivated, but hadn't they also had more practice by this point?I like how you didn't try to defend Starbucks (I agree they are a plastic, antiseptic dystopias). But the Moby Dick thing is going too far :)The Jack the Ripper tour guide said the original Starbucks was in London in the 1700s, and was named after St. Arbuck, a saint from Roman times. After a full morning's surfing, velcroed loose in the back pocket of your boardshorts for some fries and a drink after? 

Because that's what an Australian $5 note is practically invented for. Every other developed country manages to care for and manage its wildlife without a for-profit company. 

It uses sea parks, rangers, volunteers and scientists working out of normal government expenditure. Somehow it manages to have healthy sea life without the torturing animals for entertainment.Like every other developed country. This sounded like a corporate shill even *before* all the cut and paste repeated answers :/Lucas whatever is probably getting paid a small consultancy fee to post some articles, and we're getting pwned in this thread.What an amazing coincidence that Sea World gets caught out for doing unethical stuff resulting in the deaths of animals, and people stop buying tickets. 

Then, in just about the time it takes a PR company to do some surveys, identify demographics etc, we get some stories by a "related but not working for them" person pushing an exact opposite image.

It's rhythmic, just like the thud of an orca trying to commit suicide by hitting its head repeatedly against the side of a small concrete tank. What aquarium do you work at? Normally Reddit is anonymous but in some cases disclosure is useful, for readers to check any paid alternate interests. You ring up the local parks and wildlife office, and trained rangers and vets go out and attend to the animal.

It's the exact same thing as when an oil spill happens, or an eagle gets entangled by a fence, or wildlife get burned in a wildfire. 

We don't suddenly go to Moose-Jumps-R-Us to solve the problem of an injured moose. If you think a couple of pipes with cannabis residue is wild, I suggest you read some books about what Elizabethan life was like.I think the proper instructions are:

1. Ridicule any alarmist predictions about what would happen with the same gun laws as other countries

2. Run

3. HideEditedOk, you seem like you're honestly trying to find the answer and to assist animals, so I hope this helps. 

The problem with your Sea World system is that it results in a lot more dead and injured animals.

System 1
Dolphin nearly severs its tail by fishing line. It is brought to sea world, where it lives out its days in a swimming pool. 

Pros: 

\u2022 Dolphin lives
\u2022 Fun for kids

Cons:

\u2022 Presumably some dolphins are euthenized
\u2022 Dolphins keep getting injured because it's not such a big deal - Sea World will give (some) a place to stay


System 2
A well funded Parks and Wildlife service is charged with counting, assisting, and managing the sea life in that state. 

It receives a call from a fisherman about a tangled dolphin. Vets come out and free and treat the animal, give antibiotics, assess the animal's health, and either release it or humanely euthanize it. If so, not a big deal for us for land animals. But a big deal for at risk sea populations. Probably an autopsy is made to judge its diet, health, et cetera. 

A report is made, with conservation recommendations. How's the population? How's its diet? Do we need bigger sea parks, to keep fishermen away? What about an education and littering campaign? Etc. All that you guys do, but a bigger budget and holistic responsibility. 

Pros:

\u2022 Science advanced
\u2022 Changes are made, less animals need help, and populations get healthier each year. 
\u2022 Recoverable wild animal suffering is treated

Cons:

\u2022 The richest have a 0.0X% higher tax rate
\u2022 Individual animals may be euthanized slightly more often
\u2022 Less captive dolphins for the kids (but perhaps more wild dolphins to see)

I know even states with a Sea World have state marine biologists and rescue programs. But you can see why I strongly believe a government system - that has conservation as its primary aim - still beats a company that has profit as its primary aim. Your government bans a massive amount of things to make people safer, as they should. 

The idea that giving terrorists military style assault rifles is good because it more safely keeps them from bombs is really one of the more laughable ideas I've heard. Wow. I think maybe I saw that QI, but you put it really starkly and affectingly too. Thanks for the reminder. I think in one of the revised looks at the time one joke is the enemy would have killed more allied troops if they had built them an extra hospital than spent it in more weapons for themselves. It was a jokeHe joked to us - the whole tour was like that. McDonalds was a Scottish guy, etc. I can't debunk every random claim made by Redditors. 

If you want to claim something ("Malcolm Turnbull wants to ban every downloading site"), then *you* have to provide your sources, not the audience. He's got lots of redeeming qualities. You're probably thinking about the previous Prime Minister. Haha. Rabbits are pretty harmless. The only dangerous one I know of is in *Monty Python and the Holy Grail*, where one of King Arthur's knights is savagely killed by one. Well, this is all pretty wrong. California has 40% renewable energy, and I'm pretty sure it has washing machines. Germany is higher, of course. New Zealand is approaching 75%. For the first time in history, the world's economies have grown but not greenhouse gases. 

Providing there is an even playing field (subsidies equal, and external costs accounted for, ie. carbon taxes), it's an eminently solvable problem. If you look at my other (long) answers on this page I've gone through in detail... I don't want to fill up the thread. But every other country manages its wildlife (marine and land) without a Sea World. Terrorists act under the same psychological impulses as the typical school mass shooter, and if we had no motive investigations we perhaps wouldn't be able to tell them apart. 

Ultimately focusing too much on ill-defined labels leads us away from a solution. Are you with a Christian version of ISIS?Swing and a miss guessing what other countries are like. Australia actually does care about people paying their legal amount of taxes 

http://www.abc.net.au/news/2012-04-30/tax-war-over-as-paul-hogan-settles-with-ato/3981546That doesn't say anything about how to have fun. Unless you mean transferring from a communal dining room to a restaurant. How you can have a fun on a cruise ship is still a mystery to me! I hope someone can chime in.I don't want to close down a business, I just want to laugh at people who naively think they do things for the goodness of their heart, or that they are somehow a respectable substitute for decent government services. 

I also definitely want to ban companies like circuses or water circuses making money out of denying large animals the ability to express their natural behaviors. You're incorrect, but it's a common mistake to make. 

You don't need a visa to apply for asylum. It's quite a different system than for wealthy business people or tourists. Dude, I didn't just read the article, I watched the whole however many hours of video. 

They are referring to it in the way I said. I'm so sad I couldn't find the original source. I would have loved to see the responses!The SA/Vic progressive thing is really interesting. There are signs in the Melbourne Museum calling for the government to provide work for homeless people in winter, in the first couple of decades in the colony. 

Seeing them really made me think maybe the character of a place is established at the beginning. I disagree. Australians are proud of helping Vietnamese refugees, that arrived by boat. The government announced 12,000 Syrian refugee places recently, to wide Australian approval. 

The anti boats stuff recently is a focused, politically instigated paranoia, and it's fascinating (and scary) how that was able to be created, largely with the help of the Murdoch press. Er, how about whistleblowing? These are anti whistleblowing laws, which we never had until we copied them from the USA. You must be American. Because they really *don't* do the things you've mentioned in the rest of the developed world. In fact, in Australia most of those things are illegal.Minim wage in Australia is something like $750 a week, and immigrants remarkably quickly become a net benefit to the economy. Interesting, thanks, I'm thinking of starting one next month. 

Besides cost, can you give me a few for points of the negatives, or things I should look out for?I know too man, but my Reddit strategy is to only answer nice people. That way there's only pleasant messages in your inbox ;)Haha. It's actually more for the economy than anything else. A high immigration rate is the fastest way to increase GDP, and Joe Hockey (hardly a progressive) was terrified when the immigration rate started to slip a little earlier this year. All except the low inequality part, the US has some of the highest in the West, I think. 

Granted it's not really an "authoritarian" statistic, but I couldn't really think of anything people might say is authoritarian in Australia to argue against. Apparently it's cheaper to buy than rent with interest rates so low. I found loads of rentals because everyone was buying instead (I can't say I felt smart, though).Lol, it's funny reading a lawyer being so confident, and wrong, about the law. Everything you're saying is what the general public believes, but is 100% incorrect. It's just funny hearing Americans always say they have 100% free speech, then the inevitable "ah, that's a tricky case" when some of the counter examples are raised. No one has free speech, and *every* developed countries' exceptions to it is a "tricky one". Laws are all a delicate balance against competing rights. Either they're giving away law degrees to anyone (which I've heard is True in the US), or you're not a lawyer.

Any country signing the 1951 Refugee Convention agrees that there should be no penalty to any refugee entering a country with or without a visa, if it can be shown that refugees acted in good faith - i.e. to escape threats upon their life or freedom - and if they swiftly declare their presence (Article 31, (1)).It's funny, because there have been studies that show computer use in class can *reduce* student outcomes. Engagement with other people (students and teachers) is far more effective than kids learning solo or via a program.It's compulsory to have hats in Australian schools. That's a skin cancer protection thing though, not a Renoir/ Wilco fashion thing.&gt;I still don't understand why they had both or why they named them differently

I blame the poor US educatation systembest one yetbeautiful, like a M\u00f6bius strip or somethingGood pickup, thanks.Check out the whole video. JJ goes into his relationship with Bob, how they go way back, and how Disney is being smart with Star Wars. 

Apparently Bob has had some ideas, but they've been good ones and not compulsory.Final cut (approval), not finished cut (completed).Well, there's always uncredited writers. Even big stars regularly have them attached to their projects.Funny, but that's not what this headline meansThat was lovely. Thanks for doing the archaeologyIt depends on the studio and contract of course, and anything's possible. Generally the more money a studio puts in, the more they add their own writers, if needed. You only really hear about them later, say if someone talks.

"Brick" was self funded, so obviously no extra writers there. "Bloom" probably two. "Looper" maybe also (it had a supportive studio), but it was a big budget and "Bloom" underperformed at the box office, so I wouldn't be so confident.

Star Wars is a completely different animal. You could think of the story group as a type of "uncredited writer", checking the universe is consistent. Some writers just do continuity, others specialise in jokes or action, others just work on a particular character/actor's dialogue (Matt Damon is a famous example... all of his lines go by his favorite scriptwriter).

It's not necessarily a bad or controlling thing, either. I imagine if there were five top-grade writers adding awesome lines and gags, that you could draw from (and take credit for), and working as a free safety net, that would be a pretty awesome thing.

Don't forget Stoppard coming in to "save" Star Wars Episode III, for a great example of this. Carrie Fisher also does this type of work.

http://mentalfloss.com/article/53410/9-films-punched-famous-screenwritersYes, that's usually deliberate though. Sometimes they get paid extra well partly because they can't use it as a credit. Other times the writers only take the job on *because* of the contract clause that they won't be connected to the film!

It's all part of the chaos and desperation that sometimes goes on behind the scenes with certain films.Also, spiders kill more people each year per capita in the US than Australia. Sure. Especially all those Vietnamese baby boomers. Actually John especially got into some big fights early on. Stu Sutcliffe was ultimately killed by one particularly brutal one. Mid century Liverpool was a tough place. you don't think that sounds like a bunch of stuff we read here?Oh, it's the 20 year "anniversary" for some of his quotes, and I just read some in the news. Amazed it fit so wellso True! really interesting when you start to give old quotes common labels... like "red pill" and "shitamericanssay"&gt; all of you anti-abortion religious cunts

that's not why she was originally denied an Australian abortion, of course. It was a (weirdly) hardline anti boat arrivals thing, that has thankfully been overruled. So much to choose from!

&gt; Roads... and the fact that we have those awesome signs that tell you what restaurants and gas stations are at each exit.

Writing is much better than yelling it out

...

&gt; The postal system: It's great to live where you can rely on strangers you will never meet to hypothetically take a package from a city on the Atlantic to somewhere on the Pacific

...

&gt; when we were fighting the Chinese in the Korean War (we) were kind of caught by surprise

...

I also found out they charge you if they rescue you at sea

&gt; A man at the fishing lodge I go to got rescued by a US coast guard helicopter... 11 grand.You're wicked

What's weird is it's not just abhorrent, it's even *outdated* and abhorrent!Be kind to yourself, don't try to repress things, be skillful, don't hurt people and try to help them if you can. 

In my opinion, there are more important things to worry about, and worrying about it can make things worse. Aldous Huxley (an early proponent of Eastern Religions) was also very pro Quaker. I've found them wonderfully humble, non dogmatic, and willing to help others. All the best with your search.It might help to realize that almost *everyone* from the West has felt something like you describe, our cultural backgrounds are strong. 

They are also powerful. I have no problem applying Buddhist concepts to Christian imagery and relationships. Indeed, the Dalai Lama recommends Westerners do such a thing. Faith can be a powerful tool.

Think of it more like you have two TVs, rather than having to throw out one. You can decide for yourself which in which room is the most skillful to use in any particular situation. Other Death StarBB was JJ's idea, not Disney's. So it was probably a creative, not a toy sales, decision. 

I see it more as just dealing with what would be all too obvious to a filmmaker: R2's inherent design flaws. It wouldn't be able to handle sand, forest floors, swamps, deep snow, or even running for spaceships at basic human speed. The flat areas for him to deal with those types of situations in the films were all too obvious. 

In contrast BB looks like something that would be useful to someone (rather than a liability) in the military/mechanical Star Wars universe. A fast rolling Swiss Army knife set of tools, it looks like. And BB's design is a great way to move the SW characters quite bravely forward, whilst keeping the overall look and what we really love about R2: his adorable scared/loyal/brave little personality. Agree, and I agree that's the problem with the PT in a nutshell (C3PO origin story? Really? I'd rather the rebels bought him new out of a catalogue). 

It makes me nervous for a Han Solo origin story, and a Death Star (plans) origin story. Besides everything else there's no suspense when we know the outcome. But we'll see how it goes with new writers and directors. And making the most incompetent things in Star Wars clones of the most competent thing? That made zero sense. I'm with you on all of the above. Plenty of creative people are able to say "yeah, that experiment just didn't work. Oh well!". 

Abandoning the prequels can be a sign of strength and knowledge how to do things better. I don't remember hardly anything about him. He shot someone from a long way away in the rain, he had blue shoulders, and his head was held by his kid. That's about all that has stayed with me. 

Whereas just about every little nod and line of dialogue of Boba Fett in the OT is seared into my brain for some reason. I liked your comment just for its randomness. Please no one spoil it by pointing out it was trying to make some sense. I like him in a cast of a bunch of bounty hunters, empire, and rebels. With a big enough cast he could keep his mask on. 

Vader did after all. Perhaps they could do a little nod to the OT by showing his mask going on once from behind, and coming off only at the very end. You sure meet some weird people on the internet. There has been a bunch of Leia leaks you Carrie casualCan we all just pause for a moment and acknowledge what a great little Lego figure that is as an object. I'm not so sure. Doctors are big supporters of universal healthcare outside the US, and I know a bunch of doctors who buy their own medicine and supplies, and spend a couple of weeks a year volunteering in the third world for free. One - a plastic surgeon - even said it's because he feels guilty being paid so much. 

Perhaps it's a chicken and egg, or Catch 22, scenario. A predatory system makes predatory attitudes, which makes a predatory system. Conversely, an altruistic system makes altruistic attitudes, which makes for an altruistic system (etc etc). Other Death StarIt's been quiet in Door Head Ant News for far too longIsn't hers the next line in that comic though?I originally thought that was a US serial killer, and it seemed like way too much information. We don't have rabies here, but isn't it based on if the animal has rabies, not if the bite is "bad"?What's the Imperial equivalent based on?As a student I've studied near the pokies room at a bar and eaten the free food all day. So there's that. Why respond to ignorance based bigotry, with ignorance based bigotry? There are plenty of moderate Muslims, gay Muslims, feminist Muslims, etc. With now over 50% of Australians having an immigrant parent, even the right wing nut jobs know someone they like who is of a different race. It's hard to be a nazi when the guy at the deli is nice to you, and the doctor, and a teacher, and your mate from primary school (etc etc). 

Muslims are more of a Murdoch paper thing and/or hidden from them in real life. Buddhism isn't. They're not even allowed to put a $5 bet on their national sport\u2022 Freedom to bet on national sports events

\u2022 Freedom to be rescued at sea without receiving a billMagnets!Yes, but it wasn't originally based on the kilogram, hundreds of years ago, was it?Ah right, degrees of light bites... not a light bite versus a mauling. 

Australia is rabies free. Are you kidding?

Never go full Ted, Lucy. Did it list the top 10? They said Australia and Japan had faster improvements, did one of them take Canada's place?Making up your own IP is higherTrue, but we don't know who's writing IX yet. It might be someone good. The one came on TV that had R2D2 flying through the robot factory. It was one of the shittiest things I've seen in a Hollywood movie.He's flexible. Watch Super 8 for a pretty competent 1980s Spielberg. Kasdan will help there. He's completely comfortable writing completely new Han Solo dialogue, etc. And unlike Star Trek, Star Wars has a large amount of completely new characters. I saw Phantom Menace in the cinema. With a few caveats (skinny robots) I liked the first scene (light saber through the blast doors). Then it started to go downhill as soon as they made it to the planet. I remember thinking "uh-oh, this isn't working, how embarrassing and a pity."I like how he said "the best Star Wars film that could be made *at this time*". That's a lot more nuanced and aware than "the best film in the saga". Which is impossible to tell yet (it's unfinished), and may be impossible to tell anyway. 35 years later we are in a different era, and are interested in slightly different things. The real life reason is Lucas didn't originally realize what a great character he had in Vader; he was merely a Flash Gordon style evil henchman, that was to meet his just desserts. Friends pointed out how great Vader was, and suggested that Lucas keep him alive at the end of ANH. 

With the success of ANH, his importance increased. One way to make Vader more central was to make him Luke's dad in ESB. This necessitated an Emperor figure, to make a more cut and dry "villain" for Luke et al to battle against and ultimately defeat.  Oh mySweden scores higher on a development index because it's really Sweden plus the US. The US is just the US and still kicks ass. Agreed. Reading people laying in with boots to victims of the holocaust is not very fun. 

You're dealing with a pretty well informed group here though, I think.  If you think so, please find a racist sub to hang out in over this one. It's not a cool thing to say. The concept of jaywalking was invented by car companies to put blame on pedestrians, not cars, for accidents. Before that it was the other way around. Doesn't the Swiss Guard (Vatican) go back to Roman times, when the strong Swiss tribes protected the Roman Emperor?There's no good sources that's the case. Interesting, I'm going to think on that rather than jump in and argue. There are reports of Lucas looking to other trusted people to help with the script - including Kasdan - as I and II were being so panned. Lots of people said no. Stoppard saying yes very late in the process was a "save", in that context. 

III is generally considered the best of the PT, and the things that are good about it can also generally be seen in Stoppard's work, rather than elsewhere in Lucas'. 

The fu details are not in the above source, but if you hunt around you can find better evidence of his involvement than I can provide from memory here. I think there was reports of a being kicked scene. BB, er, rolls with it. Not only - Indigenous Australians had (and still have) such constellations.

&gt; A constellation used in Aboriginal culture in Australia is the "Emu in the sky", a 'constellation' that is defined by dark nebulas (opaque clouds of dust and gas in outer space) that are visible against the Milky Way background, rather than by stars. The Emu's head is the very dark Coalsack nebula, next to the Southern Cross; the body and legs are other dark clouds trailing out along the Milky Way to Scorpius... On autumn evenings, the emu in the sky stands directly over her portrait (on rocks north of Sydney), just at the time when it's time to gather emu eggs.

Aboriginal culture in Australia is particularly old - 40,000\u201380,000 years (compared to the Lascaux cave paintings produced 20,000 years ago). Indeed, Australian aboriginals and related Oceanic peoples may have even brought their astrology to South America.

Edit: As this has been challenged, note I said MAY. Genetic (see the nature study), archaeological (paintings possible before Asiatic settlement), and anthropological studies have been put forward with Aboriginal to Amazonian settlement as a possibility.

http://www.nature.com/nature/journal/v525/n7567/full/nature14895.html

http://www.nature.com/nature/journal/v525/n7567/full/nature14895.htmlVader/ father has been debunked, I think... he was originally just a villain with a nasty "death invader" sounding name.Even if True it doesn't matter - creating your own is many times more highly regarded. 

I'm guessing that's partly why there's no Spielberg, Tarantino, Lynch, George Miller et al *Star Wars* movies.Tweety source: https://twitter.com/rianjohnson/status/653443417788317696Wow. I never thought through how close it was. 

Kind of like that old infantry tactic of lines of soldiers all in different stages of firing and reloading.

http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-OXOXjScEkQU/Un50r3rdepI/AAAAAAAAAv8/jxbVXPADK0A/s1600/French+Fire+By+Ranks+Diagram.jpgPost-abbott for 3 weeks :/http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/sci/tech/430944.stmGenetic, archaeological, and anthropological evidence suggests at least a good chance South America was settled before Asiatic tribes from the North.

http://www.news.com.au/technology/science/genetic-study-challenges-americas-settlement-theories-by-linking-amazonians-and-australasians/story-fnjwl2dr-1227452095278Star Wars sure attracts the kidsYes, Cameron and Scott seem to have a competitive thing going onIslands FTWWeird thing to say. Australians are very pro immigration - #3 highest per capita intake in the world.More than half Australians have at least one immigrant parent... about one in three are immigrants themselves (loads from the UK). 

So yes, not really such a thing as Australia outside of immigration.I've thought about something similar, but put it down to fashion, more than JJ. Old films often used wider shots, and were slower - contemporary films are often in your face and much faster.

I can imagine Disney (and even Lucas, in the PT) would see it as a bad broad audience decision to have a slower, more spacious Star Wars film like in the 1970s... like it was too retro or boring or something (even though I'd prefer it).

I see it a bit similarly to the "snap zoom" effect that was added to the Falcon entering the downed Destroyer (that was taken out after negative fan reaction). Perhaps it's a subtler version you're talking about.Right, me too. IMHO we're going to see a more classic cinematic style on VIII. Rian's super conscious about those sorts of details (from his past films, but also the films he's showing his crew). What drives me nuts is folks saying Australia is dangerous (animal rubbish). It's so super safe, it's hard to express.Yes, there are, because they are humans. Go hang out in the theatre, film, dance, art or the music scene. Visit the Maldives or certain towns in Indonesia. Go to writers' week and hear a talk from a young Muslim author. 

That's the thing about generalizations, they simultaneously insult the subjects, and the person making them. No, not at all! Forgive me if you thought that. It was meant to show how stupid your comment was. I had no idea you had personality issues. My apologies. Yes, I like him a lot. The right mix of talent, modesty and generosity. It can't be easy to maintain all that with managing something as huge as SW. Oh man. Wrong sub/ person to say that to. Oh really? That's some deep level intel! Do you have a source, I'd love to read more. There will probably be a bit of that. I'm hoping the storyboard artists, cinematographers, editors, SFX people etc have been told "make it look like the original films" that that will be mitigated. 

I think that Abrams' skills (casting, the practical effects stuff, passion for the genre) still make him the ideal person for the job, even more than the original creator, which is really saying something. I'm predicting it to be darker than others are thinking, as JJ loves ESB too. And it will be interesting to see what the others take and reject from his film with their own. 
Thanks for your very generous answer! I really appreciate it.

&gt; Future TEFLs need academic knowledge. They do not only need to know how to do something, they also must know WHY it should be this way.

I'm a native speaker, and I definitely don't have academic knowledge about my language. I'm guessing - and hoping - this is in the course notes, though. 

&gt; Future TEFLs also should be able to stand before the audience, have enough confidence in their skill to avoid stuttering

I can speak to this point! I was a nervous student, who became a teacher, and was worried about this. The strangest thing happened though.. *on the first day* of teaching, my nerves went away. There's something about being supposed to be up there in that role that makes all the difference.

&gt; You should know how to work with problematic students without slowing down the progress of faster students.

This is also something I learnt on the job too... I'm not sure any of us can be experts until we have practice?
Uh-oh, my troll is broken :(Of course, people are being thrown off roofs, or made to have sex changes, for it - whilst there is a rampant culture (in some muslim societies) of having sex with underage men.

But saying "I don't like Islam because I'm a gay" is straight up response to bigotry with bigotry. Moderate and LGBT muslims (there are even at least five openly gay imams) need our support.
If he had said "I don't like Judaism because I'm a gay", I definitely would have brought up Christianity. The latter is the blatantly obvious problem in the largest religious community that we're probably both writing from.Nice job!

Even more Beatles, somehow, than the original.That was great, thanks!

I liked the Rey stuff also. That's funny, the only kids I know who were traumatized by their foster parents went to fundamentalist ChristiansI read he invaded Britain, but the invasion consisted only of sailing there, marching around a bit, collecting seashells (as evidence), declaring victory, and then going home. 

Bringing seashells back to Rome and declaring victory over nothing was embellished into the story we have in the TIL. In the UK version though they had unlimited healthcare.Even Iraq managed universal healthcare in the 70s.https://www.reddit.com/r/ShitAmericansSay/comments/3ntfvq/this_sub_sucks/cvr356h

Even later on board than Sir David Attenborough!&gt; You're extremely statistically unlikely to get murdered anywhere

You're statistically 5 times more likely to get murdered in the US than most of Europe. Iraq is only 8 times higher and it's a war zone.Because they expected it to be continually amended according to new knowledge and conditionsLeaving out the difference in laws (and the almost religious US gun culture) higher European gun owning countries Finland, Sweden and Switzerland have a disproportionately high amount of gun deaths

Chart:

http://4.bp.blogspot.com/-W9LkhCs6ib4/Vhi6mB06y9I/AAAAAAAAIn0/4KoXL5iNehE/s640/imrs.php.jpgIf you leave out our worst parts not theirs, we're actually the best!This is all really useful for me to think about now, thanks so much.38 Australians were just having a holiday too. But thanks for your message - it's really hopeful.you're my red team! thanks also

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Red_teamReplaced dumb gun law reference with dumb healthcare reference - thanks.It's definitely *not* an academic journal, which we take as critical, independent peer review. It is (in their own words) "student-edited... the nation\u2019s leading forum for conservative and libertarian legal scholarship." i.e., a young Republican place to post their own essays.

The pro-gun lobby has been making "independent research" websites for years (whilst stopping *actual* independent government research). This is another case of muddied waters to protect the status quo.Both sides of government (Julia Gillard, Malcolm Turnbull and John Howard) have long wanted an Emissions Trading Scheme... modelled to be the cheapest way to bring down emissions.

A few years of Carbon Taxes was the independents' condition for forming government, mercilessly and politically exploited by Abbott.You are aware that other countries have crime, drug trades, and better and worse suburbs or cities involved with their statistics? 

It's intellectually dishonest to say "our problem is just these areas", and remove them from your stats, but leave other countries' equivalent worst areas in their stats. 

If we are discussing which is the driest country, we can't conveniently leave out Arizona and California and call ourself wet. 
I'm saying America needs to fix its gun violence problem, Estonia has to fix its (I assume) alcohol fueled violence problem, Iraq has to fix its car bomb problem.

You'd have to have severe tunnel vision to look at that chart and admit America doesn't have a gun violence problem. Greater inequality is not an opportunity to remove the worst half from one's statistics. 

"Look like those European countries" is a misnomer, because each European country has diverse rates. The UK doesn't get to remove Glasgow and Belfast, for instance.

http://i.dailymail.co.uk/i/pix/2013/04/24/article-2313942-1974CEA5000005DC-275_634x635.jpgIt's True mate!I used to watch it because it was the only ST on, and I've gone back and watched all the "highest rated" ds9 episodes again, to see if they stand up. 

There's something intangible about events not happening on a starship. It's like a Jaws movie without a shark, or Star Wars without The Force. It's hard to put a finger on when you're missing, but it's there. Absolutely there was zero point.Sure. It doesn't belong though - plexiglass and vinyl cutouts (like Hoth and Yavin 4), please!Thank you, that is very interesting - especially the Biblical connection. 

I'm thinking less about retaking the whole Roman Empire here, and more just preserving one's life, in any way possible - a pocketful of coins, dressing as a peasant, negotiating a retirement - which seems like a very basic human thing to want to do. Perhaps past motivations are just unknowable. It could just be "we're repeating a kind of Tatooine conceptually - a desert planet a young hero is stuck on at the start of a film - just a little more so".You were going great with that comment until you went full redneck. Not the time for thatThe US is the only Western country to still kill people, I wouldn't use that example. There are 20,000 Saudi princes, it almost is "a normal Saudi man". This. One of the reasons every other Western country ended executions isn't just to stop innocent people being killed. The deterrent effect is negative - i.e. murderers are less likely to surrender, and more likely to shoot it out with police. Good for you. Mentioning it in this thread is a little autistic, though.Or, you know, you could just employ people who know how to deal with cinematic sources in a controlled and informed way. 

It's the epitome of what Lucas did with his sources for the original Star Wars films (Kurosawa's wipes, John Ford's landscapes, 2001's palette, depictions of space and planets) - and a big part of what made them great. Hmm, I'm with you - it doesn't really *feel* like my cup of tea, either. Yet books are expensive, and I love not looking at a screen for once. I'd love to find some way to cleverly use it, that isn't taking the slow (or confusing) way around. Nope. That's the US system, that leads to random people being killed, along with more police killed (folks don't surrender as willingly).

There's a reason why every Western country abolished it 50 years ago, and it wasn't because they were too liberal then. Folks that forget our history need to be reminded.Ok, that makes sense! It helps me put a finger on why it's such a slog :)Buzzfeed or listicle it ain't!lol91.4 centimeters

I thought this conversation was supposed to go the other way around?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YnwkE4trA48Yes, folks were already very nervous about the prequels before they began. We had not too recently gone to the cinema to see all the original trilogy films be "Special Editioned", and they were *awful*. 

I remember a cinema full of people laughing at how bad the CGI Jabba the Hut looked (and Han bouncing over his tail like a computer game character). The extra creatures over Mos Eisley was also a busy CGI trainwreck. So we knew what we were in for. 

Seeing the new films were about a kid made us all the more apprehensive.

Only *very* slight issues:

- The color palette is different to *Star Wars* (bright reds, and multicolor flags). There was something very beautiful about Lucas' original restraint there... greys, blacks, whites, orange and earth colors. 

- It seems to have rebooted in a very "high emotion and excitement" tone. The original SW had both, of course, but there was a lovely quiet zen, and camp about them. Obi Wan was killed, and *a whole planet* blew up, yet we only paused for a few seconds after each, before back to the fun. Every emotion wasn't squeezed out like a Spielberg film (who JJ admires).

- Some aspects seem a little overdone visually, too. The star map displays over Han in the Falcon, masses of ships fighting, etc. This was a prequels mistake - Less is often more.

But casting and many other aspects look good, and we'll have to see. Of course the trailer shows spectacular things. And we probably couldn't have had a better person to do the first one than JJ (better than Lucas isn't too bad)!

And I'm *extra* looking forward to VIII, Rian has a slower, much less frenetic style that should suit SW well.Hmm. I think it depends on what you call "good":

\u2022 If it's a subjective thing - about which film you *like* best - then no two people will ever agree, so each to their own :)

\u2022 If it's judging by box office, then that's Gone With the Wind (a terrible movie, by today's standards), that made the equivalent of $1,685,052,200 today. 

\u2022 If it's critical reception - say aggregated critic scores - then SW loses again, to the Godfather et al. (Actually amazing scripts, acting, etc.)

In my opinion, the best way to judge *Star Wars* is that 

(a) parents still love the originals, and they pass them on to their kids (generational love), and 

(b), SW did something really interesting with the history of film, mashing up very different genres ("unchewed", if you like), and made a new genre out of them. A lighter, geekier, more fun version of Quentin Tarantino's project almost.

I hope it does the latter two things. And if the second has *already* been done - I hope it keeps to that interesting formula. The worst outcome would be that it becomes generic sci-fi action movie #2438.Right. They paced them out, too, so it was like:

\u2022 Go to the movies, excited for an EXPANDED ANH. Oh, that sucked - outcry - maybe they'll pull back a bit next time?

\u2022 Go to the movies later for ESB. Oh - that sucked - outcry again - surely they'll pull back next time?

\u2022 Go to the movies later for ROTJ. No!! That sucked. 

Then you couldn't even *get* the original versions on DVD any more, which people were upset about, too.

The whole "Lucas is destroying my childhood" thing was already well established before we all went to the cinemas, nervously, to see TPM. 

(Edited for unreliable childhood memories on the timeline.)No, I agree with you. *Luke* is. But as an audience member, *we're* not all that upset. 

Ben's is one of the "lightest" deaths on screen, ever. He is seemingly happy to go, and there's not even a body to weep over. He's even talking to Luke straight after, insinuating he's still around - the famous "run Luke, run!". 

I have a feeling when the main character dies in TFA, it's going to be drawn out, and full of so much tears it's going to be traumatic. Perhaps not, perhaps they'll be fun about it. But I hope they remember their origins in 1940s B movies.Ah cool. It seemed much more. Did all the DVDs come out so quickly too, or were they paced more?

I can't imagine how I went to so many, then. But I remember getting my tickets to all of them.lol. it's already *gone* in modern society... almost three generations gone, now. one holdout doesn't change that.
Anything by Elliott Smith. Much more subtle than those examples. IMHO don't swap hours for dollars. Invent a product (themes, guides, how-to eBooks). Or else delegate the work. It's a rat race otherwise. I seem to have missed the Rambo section of the OlympicsOne of those long things with a paranoid person at the end of it?Ok, that's interesting. Thanks!By that time the UN chemtrails have done their work and woosh: gay marriage concentration camps. Maybe they have a magic constitution too and shouldn't touch it70 people saved - more people should know about that. Total respect.Actually I think there's a bunch. One's more like a puppet (they CGI the wires out), one's remote, etc etc. 

After filming was finished they worked out how to do just about everything in the one unit, which is the one that came on stage at Celebration, and will likely feature in VIII. Mah onion freedomHe knew the Jedi would never suspect their own troopsYou're just out of our canoe snakes' rangeThis is so cool. 

This race has been going since I was a child. Now finally the idea of electric cars and solar energy is becoming mainstream (not in the one unit of course).Don't forget the wisdom of having a teacher and role model. Seeing them laugh as they treat things lightly is a great lesson in itself. The half smile of the Buddha in paintings and sculptures is also a reminder to keep this attitude.Interesting point. I find it physically different to do - it's not easy to do five minutes. Twenty would be impossible. Yet more powerful perhaps?True. It must be an amazing thing to have a direct knowledge and meeting with the people you've saved, though too. Interesting. I kind of feel the opposite about ST. I loved the TV shows, but felt none of them ever worked in a cinematic format. ST worked like a quick sketching of lots of different ideas each week, not an oil painting. JJ's first was a masterpiece, IMHO. He turned it into a meditation on making a reboot, which gave it real depth and importance. 

I can see he's doing something similar to SW - a meta discussion on fandom and time - which is a risky move. Partly because SW worked great as films already. And partly because they were already meta about *other* films. 

I'm willing (!) to let him try anything, because the good will outweigh the b